THE SILVER BOTTLE.
BY PROFESSOR J. H. INGRAHAM.
CHAPTER I.
My name and parentageHow Dame Darwell kept a famous InnDescription
of the Inn and of Dame DarwellHow she happened to be left a widow
Dame Darwell, like other folks has a hobbyComes to the resolution to change
the sign of the Quart MugHow a certain carriage arrives and ends the
chapter
.
I am
`Little Marlboro'.' That is my name, I may as well say at once. I
dare say there are better names, and I dare say there are much worse names;
but good or bad my name is Little Marlboro', and neither more nor less than
Little Marlboro'! But let me begin at the beginning! for as I intend to write
a true and veracious history of my life, I wish to start fair with my reader,
giving and taking no advantage in the outset.
As my memory does not extend farther back than my third year, I must, in
common with all my readers, take the tradition of others touching the
circumstances
of my birth and infancy. But it will be very soon seen, that, in
reference
to my birth, I am fully as much in the dark as an anxious son would care
to be respecting such a personal matter; as I am not able, with any certainty, to fix upon any progenitors until I reach my father Adam and my mother Eve,
who are the only parents I can positively lay claim to.
But the reader shall know all that I know touching this interesting matter
of my parentage. The knowledge came to me through the good woman,
Dame Darwell, who is to be hereafter mentioned, and to whom I owe all the
cares and duties, which should have been mine from the hands and heart of a
mother. I will begin the narrative of my earlier years after the fashion of story
writers; though so far from writing a story I am penning a veritable history,
in which there may, nevertheless, be discovered before the end no little
romance
.
There stands on the road-side not far from the Third Turnpike Gate on the
old Providence and Boston stage road a small but neat Inn. It has nothing
particular to attract attention but an indefinable air of
snugness
and comfort.
The practised traveller as he came near could see from its well swept stone
step, the glimpse of its sanded tap-room floor, its dimity curtained windows,
with a pot of geranium on the sill, and the shrub rose bush beneath, and the
woodbine creeping above the humble portal, that there were to be had within,
clean, well-aired beds, abundant and well cooked viands, and home-like
welcome
;
and his expectations were not disappointed. The Inn was situated
close by the way side, and few travellers passed it by without giving Dame
Darwell a call. Her apple pies, her pumpkin pies, her peach sauce, her golden
butter, her rich cream and snow-white cakes long dwelt in the memories of
those who had once had the happiness of being her guests. Although she
lived but nine miles from Boston, where travellers might be supposed to be
best provided for, those who `knew her fame,' in journeying in chaise or on
horseback (for rail-roads were not in those days) from Boston, would delay
their breakfast till they reached `The Silver Bottle;' or if going into the city,
take their supper earlier than usual to get it served up by the tidy and
hospitable
hostess of this popular Inn. The house was a long, rambling edifice of
one story, with every room on one floor; it had a large garden half encircling
it, and spacious barns in the rear; two elms of great age and majesty grew
before
the door completely covering the Inn with shade and green leaves. A
red pump of icy cold water stood at one corner, beneath the spout of which
was a huge watering rough known to every horse and hoof for half a mile
around. The cattle seemed to love the pump at `The Silver Bottle' as much
as traveller's loved the entertainment within. Pleasant fields and green
meadow with woodlands and sparkling streams were in sight from the ever open
door of the Inn, and the birds loved the trees and the shrubbery about Dame
Darwell's house better than any other; for there were more robins' nests and
grey wrens' nests and yellow birds' nests in her trees than in those of any body
else; and from earlier spring till the last leaf of autumn fell, the song of birds
was heard around her doors and windows. Dame Darwell had no need to keep
birds in cages.
Such was the Silver Bottle Inn at the time of which I write. Dame
Darwell
,
as Hetty Caton, at eighteen had reigned a rustic belle; when bluff
George Darwell won her heart and hand from many competitors. George was
the only son of a substantial Inn-keeper and heir to all his father's possessions,
and after Hetty became his wife he took her home and made her landlady of
the Inn. It had, in his father's time, been called the `Quart Mug;' and George
retained the old sign and style. But Hetty, his young bride, who had certain
refined ideas very execusable in a belle, good natured and sensible too, as she
was, did not like the name and did not hesitate to tell George as much. But
George could not see the matter with her eyes and very kindly and very firmly
refused to change it.
`My father enriched me, dear wife, under this old sign of the `Quart Mug,'
and placed me in a situation to wed the best and fairest of all the maidens my
eyes ever looked upon! But for that `Quart Mug,' Hetty, I should not have
had the happiness of calling you my wife and making you the mistress of this
comfortable house!'
Hetty could not utter a word in reply to such arguments as these, and so the
old sign board with its picture of a quart mug was suffered to swing as of old
beneath the branches of the old elm that overshadowed the pump.
But although these reasons given by George were conclusive, they did not
wholly set to rest the matter in the mind of his loving wife. She, however,
said no more about it, resolved to yield her own notions to her husband's
wishes.
For six years this happy couple lived together in the most perfect harmony,
the idea of the vulgarity in the sound of `The Quart Mug,' gradually fading
from Mrs. Darwell's mind. With years she had grown less fastidious; yet in
heart, if she could have had her way she would have yet taken down the old
sign and replaced it by a new one with a more pleasing sound. The sixth
anniversary of their marriage had arrived and George rode into Boston to
purchase
his wife a gift of affection, as had each year been his custom. But
when Hetty's eyes beheld him in prideful joy ride gallantly away from the
stoop, mounted on a noble, high spirited horse he had just bought, they looked
upon him alive for the last time! That evening he was brought back to the
Inn, he had left in the morning with such buoyant feelings, a corpse. His
horse had been suddenly affrighted by the explosion of rocks near town, and
becoming unmanageable had dashed off with him at full speed and turning a
corner hurled his rider to the ground and fell upon him. The unfortunate
man was taken up insensible, but never breathed again!
I will pass over the griefthe anguish of sorrowwhich overwhelmed the
bereaved widow. For many days she refused all consolation; for her heart
was bound up in her love for her dead husband! But time which heals all
wounds of the heart, gradually restored tranquility to her mind; but a shade of
tender melancholy, I can remember, was never banished from her fine features.
Good, benevolent, and noble woman! how shall I ever recal thee without
tender
emotionswithout tears of gratitude? I now sympathise with thy
widowed
sorrows, though then God had not given me being. I will do thee
justice
,
thou kind of heart and true; for I am about to speak much of thee and
of thy goodness to me! At thy few failings the reader shall smile! for thy
virtues he shall praise thee!
For five years the widow of George Darwell remained hostess of the Quart
Mug. During this time, more than once had she been tempted to make a
change in the name of the Inn: but the memory of George withheld the act;
though still the idea grew none the less prominent in her thoughts. At length
as years passed by, and she gradually separated her identity with the dead, as
the living, and particularly widows, in time naturally do, she thought less of
George's wishes and more of her own. Dame Darwell, as she was now
generally
designated, was in her thirty-fifth year, buxome, handsome, good
natured, and the very soul of kindness and benevolence. She had got the
reputation
of her house spread wide for its neatness, good taste, and comfortable
entertainment, and the `best company of the land,' as she often used to say
stopped to dine or sleep there. Five Governor's, and a score of Judges at
least, and Councellors without number, going to and from the Capital and the
Courts, had been entertained by her. For the sake of this respectable order
of her guests, the name of the Inn troubled her very much. The idea of
changing it was her hobby. We all have a hobby of some kind or other, and
this was Dame Darwell's hobby.
One pleasant afternoon in June, the good lady was sitting in the front door
of the Inn knitting a very shapely stocking out of blue and white yarn. The
air was warm and balmy with the breath of flowers; the windows of the tap
and the little parlor were all up; the birds were twittering in the cool shadows
of the branches; the water trickled from the end of the spile of the pump into
the trough; the fields in front were green and waving; the sky was without a
cloud, save a little group in the west sleeping upon the horizon like a pile of
pillows. The cook was seated in the kitchen door dressed up and mending
her Sunday gown; the cat was crouched on the stone step; the poultry were
lazily picking about the door; the cows stood in the coolest shadow of the
barn; the hostler and his boy were lying idly and half asleep upon a heap of
hay in the sun, by the stable door: the old dog was drowsing on the grass in
front; and peace and quietthe sweet tranquility of a summer afternoon
reigned around. Dame Darwell's heart was at peace also; and her soul
reflected
all the serene beauty of the hour.
She sat so, that, as she occasionally lifted her eyes from her stocking (for
she was `closing the heel,' which was an operation that demanded a little more
attention than usual) she could not only see some distance from the road, but
was also in full view of the old sign of `The Quart Mug.' In every earthly
Paradise there is a temptation! The old sign was the apple in this. That
very day, Dame Darwell's cousin, Mariah, an old maid, who being homeless
had kindly been given a home by the benevolent hostess, knowing the widow's
foible, and having similar tastidious notions of her own about the matter, had
been hinting to good Dame Darwell as plainly as she dared, `how much more
respectable it would be to have another name for the Inn.' Mariah and her
aunt Keezy, another protege of the charitable widow who also made the Inn
her home, were out that afternoon to attend a sewing-circle for sending clothes
to the naked little heathen, letting the naked little heathen in the streets go
naked, in the name of missionary charity! Dame Darwell preferred staying
at home and clothing the Christian beggar whom Providence might send by
her door!
The sign, as we have said, was in full sight of the good Dame as she sat in
her porch, and she could not help looking up to it very often, especially as a
robin with a worm dangling from his yellow bill, had perched himself upon it,
to rest a moment before he should fly across the `Inn yard' to his nest in the
old apple tree by the corner of the kitchen. Every time she looked up she
thought the old sign was more and more vulgar; and at length it took such
hold of her mind that it appeared to her, as if there could not be found in the
whole English language, two words so unsightly and so low in their meaning.
The good dame's hobby had at length fairly taken the bit in its teeth.
`Well, I declare it
is
a very vulgar name for a genteel Inn,' said Dame
Darwell laying her stocking down upon her knee and looking very positively
at the obnoxious words! `It might have done very well in old Captain
Darwell's
time, and even when George was alive! But things are different now!
Inn's are out of fashion even in some places and every thing is called `Hotel!'
But whatever change I make, I will always have this an Inn! It means
comfort
and a home. But there is no need in having such a name for it. `The
Quart Mug!' How coarse it sounds! I wonder how I could bear it so long.
George wont feel it now, and besides the sign is getting old and will soon fall
down, and I
must
have a new one! Yes, I must get a new sign that is a
certain
.'
Here the good dame's countenance lighted up with pleasure. She had hit
upon a new idea! She must have a NEW sign, and that would be an excuse
far putting on a new name. Her satisfaction at having hit upon this idea was
plaudy visible in her face.
`Yes, it is settled,' she said with emphasis. `I will have a new sign within
three days.'
It chanced that at this moment John Blake the carpenter from the next
village
came by carrying a saw in one hand and a window sash and some pieces
of board in the other. She instantly called to him, and in five minutes had
bargained for a new sign of precisely the dimensions of the old one, to be
completed the next day.
`And shall I give it to Brown when it is done, to paint the old mug on it,
ma'm?'
`No: tell Brown to paint it sky-blue, as the old one was before it got so
rusty, and then I will call and let him know what I am to have on it.'
The carpenter went his way, and Dame Darwell resumed her knitting with
an air of peculiar satisfaction on her features; every little while as she would
knit a needle off she would glance up to the old sign with a sort of triumphant
air; yet not without feeling a sort of guilty sense of being about to do a very
wrong thing in taking down the sign under which she and her husband and her
husband's father had so long prospered. But she defended herself against her
conscience with the reflection that the sign was ready to fall, and a
new
one
must
take the place of it. While she was thus employed in her thoughts and
with her fingers, a four-wheeled chaise with two horses attached appeared on
the pike in the direction of Providonce, and as it was advancing at very fast
speed, it, the next moment, drove up before the porch of `The Quart Mug.'
CHAPTER II.
How a gentleman and lady alighted at the InnDame Darwell's curiosity
defeated
The
gentleman orders a strange beverageThe guest and Dame
Darwell
converse togetherThe departure of the guests
.
The
old mahogany clock in the tap struck four precisely as the carriage
drew up before the little vine-covered porch of the Inn, in the doorway of
which Dame Darwell was seated knitting, and busily engaged in her thoughts
in inventing a new and agreeable sounding name for the sign she had ordered
John Blake to make for her. The carriage, as she relates the story, and as I
have heard her tell it, at least three hundred and one times, was a sort of
baroache
,
painted yellow and lined with drab; a very genteel, convenient
traveling
chaise for two persons. The horses were well-fed bays, but came up
white with foam; and the harness was brass mounted, with a gilt eagle
treading
upon a serpent on the blinders. Of this Dame Darwell was positive. They
were driven by a black man, who had a black cockade in his hat, and was
dressed in a blue coat in gilt buttons, with an eagle on them, white waistcoat
with flaps and drab breeches, He was a
very
black man, and also very much
of a gentleman in his manners, said Dame Darwell. He wore yellow gloves
also, and had a white pocket handkerchief, the good Dame noticed. But the
horses, the harness, the gilt eagle on the blinders, the yellow barouche, the
black driver in his gloves and cockade, were all a secondary matter, and only
for a moment diverted the attention of the critical eye of the worthy hostess
from the occupants of the chaise.
These were a gentleman and lady. The gentleman were a black cloak,
and was dressed in mourning, and the lady wore a deep mourning veil which
concealed her face. They both seemed young. Dame Darwell judging that
the gentleman, whom she never failed to say was `remarkably handsome and
civil-like, and very
acrostick
in his manner,' could not have been above eight
and twenty. On the boot was a large round topped trunk of buff leather firmly
strapped to the foot board, and in the carriage at their feet, a large traveling
basket with a cover.
Dame Darwell, long practised to judge of her guests at a single glance,
observed
all that I have described, while the black driver was letting down the
steps of the barouche. The gentleman sprang out first, and bowing to the good
dame as she stood in the door with her knitting, asked,
`Are you the hostess, madam?'
`Yes, sir,' answered Dame Darwell, with a smile of welcome that never
failed to detain all comers, if not to a lodging at least to a meal,
`Can I be accommodated here to-night, with my horses?'
`Certainly, sir, with pleasure. I have nice, pleasant rooms, and sweet beds.
It is many a gentleman, and lady I have had the happiness of entertaining, and
they were sure to come a second time, though I say it, sir, that perhaps shouldn't.
And the good hostess smiled so pleasantly, that the gentleman smiled too, and
said he would like to be her guest until the next morning.
`It is your lady, I presume air?' said Dame Darwell, who was very
particular
in some things.
The gentleman colored, glanced at the lady who still sat in the carriage
veiled
,
and then nodded to Dame Darwell very slightly, as much as to say that it
was a thing of course. Dame Darwell was satisfied by the nod and invited
them in.
`The lady will at once go to a room,' said the gentleman, as he handed her
from the carriage, Dame Darwell now saw that she was elegant in person,
and her air very lady-like.
`I will show you the room, madam,' said Dame Darwell, preparing to
precede
the gentleman and lady; but the lady lingered until her traveling basket
was taken out by the black man, who now, that Dick had been waked up by
the carriage, and had taken the horses' heads, was at liberty to follow them;
which he did, with the basket, carrying it very carefully. Dame Darwell
observed
that the lady kept turning back as they walked through the long
passage
and watching it with great anxiety, speaking more than once to the man to
be careful, until the gentleman spoke sharply in a low tone to her, when she
was silent. The room was on the same floor with the tap, but at some
distance
,
quite at the end of the house; one window opening into the garden and
two facing the turnpike, but covered with woodbine and honey suckle in full
flower. The chamber was spacious and neat in its arrangements, with white
coverlid, white bed hangings, white window curtains, and neat strips of carpet
laid upon the snow-white floor before the bed, and the little looking-glass stand.
All was neat as wax, and yet comfortable and home-like. Two old fashioned
stuffed arm chairs covered with needle-work invited the weary traveler to
repose
his limbs, and antiquated rocking-chairs, with cushions of rich
embroidery
,
stood on each side of the tiled fire-place, which was now filled with
branches
of asparagus placed in a china flower-pot.
Dame Darwell having opened the door in this neat apartment, which she
used to call the `Court Chamber,' because the Judges always occupied it, she
curtesied and asked them when when they would have tea.
`I will let you know in a few minutes, Madam,' said the gentleman: and
the hostess taking this for a polite intimation that they desired to be left alone,
she curtesied, smiled, and retired to the tap room, followed by the black man
who had left the basket.
`You have driven fast, Mr. Coachman,' said Dame Darwell as she reached
the porch, turning and addressing the black.
`Yes, marm! Massa al'ays luv drive 'im fas',' answered the negro, touching
his hat and passing out of the door to his horses.
`Come from Providence?'
`No marm, New York!' answered the black. `Now, if you please, sar,' he
continued addressing the hostler, `lead dese horses to de stable and leave the
carriage here; when I on-strap dis trunk and carry im in to massa, I go help
you take car' ob im!'
`Your master is going to Boston, I suppose,' said Dame Darwell, after the
horses had been taken out and led away.
`I don't kno', marm. Master nebber tell niggar whar he go; only he say,
dar
de road! and niggar drive 'long de road what afore him face, and dat all
he kno' 'bout whar massa go to!'
Dame Darwell says she looked very closely into the negro's face on
receiving
this reply, with the suspicion that the fellow knew more than he would tell.
But when he saw she was observing him, he turned his face away and went
very busily engaging himself in unlashing the trunk from behind the barouche.
At this moment the gentleman made his appearance. Dame Darwell said he
was a tall man, with a fine hazel eye, chesnut colored hair, a fine smile and
white teeth. `He was as perfect a gentleman to look at as I ever wish to see.'
Dame Darwell never failed to add, when she came to this part of the recital.
I will now continue it in her own words:
`He comed to me as I was looking at the wooly negro man, and as he had
no cloak on now, I saw he wore a black satin vest, and taking out of a little
fob in the breast of it the handsomest gold watch I ever see, he said, perlite
and civil, as one could wish to have a gentleman,
`Madam, it is now a little past four! We will have tea at five, if you will
take the trouble to order it!'
`Certainly, sir: it ie no trouble in the world! You can have it earlier if you
choose,' said I.
`That hour will answer, especially as I have concluded that I will ride on
instead of stopping for the night as I intended.
I said at onct, not a little alarmed,
`Don't my rooms and the accommodations suit you and your lady, sir!'
Perhaps
I spoke a little quick, for he looked as if he saw that I did.
`No apartments could be pleasanter; and I assure you we are the losers to
leave such pleasant accommdation for others which are uncertain. If any
thing could urge us to remain it would be the temptations held out by your
agreeable house. The night is cool and I wish to take advantage of it to
pursue
my journey.'
I was perfectly satisfied at this explanation, though I felt sorry not to keep
them till next day; for I had somehow taken up a strange curiosity about 'em,
I wanted to gratify; and besides they looked like such nice people I wanted
to have them in my house. And what was more I hadn't seen the face of the
lady yet; for she kept it closely veiled all the time going through the passage.
I only heard her voice speaking to the black coachman about carrying the
basket
,
and it was such a sweet one, I was on a tenter to get a sight of her face.
It was pitiful to see her in deep mourning, and doubtless, I thought to myself,
she is in great sorrow. Perhaps she has lost her only child; and when I
thought of that I felt tears coming into my eyes; for though I hant any little
blessings myself, I could sympathise with mother's as had 'em and lost 'em.
Well, to the gentleman! When I told him I was sorry he could not stay, he
said I could not regret it more than he did; and then after a minute he asked
me if I had any fresh milk. I told him that I had morning's milk, but that if
he wished I would have one of the critters milked. He said morning's milk
would do if it was sweet; and asked me if I wouldn't boil a little and let him
take it to his lady.
`A glass of good fresh milk would do your lady more good, or if you will
wait five minutes, I will get her a cup of nice green tea,' says I.
`No, you are very kind. Boiled milk would be preferred! Please have it
prepared and I will wait for it and take it in.'
`Oh, sir, I would rather take it to the lady myself. I can't bear you should
carry it to her!'
`She prefers I should wait upon her,' he said smiling; I could not help
noticing
that though he smiled often when he spoke, yet he always smiled sadly;
and when he said any thing to me, he seemed to be thinking of something on
his mind.
Well, as some ladies love to have their husband's wait on 'em, especially
young brides, I wasn't surprised, and went and got the milk boiled,
wondering
too, why a lady should prefer boiled mornings milk to fresh new milk right
from the cow, or a good nice cup of Hyson, with loaf sugar and golden cream.
But you'll see the reason by and bye; and then you wont wonder no more than
I did afterwards!
I got the milk and brought it to him in the tap where he stood waiting for it
with a newspaper in his hand which he had been reading.
`I had better take it, sir,' I said.
`No, I prefer to carry it. Have you some white sugar?' he asked.
I gave it to him, putting the milk on a small waiter in a pitcher, with a
tumbler
and the sugar bowl and a tea-spoon. Well, he took it and thanked me,
and carried it to her, while I went to see about their tea. I had it ready at
five o'clock, the table nicely set for two in the little back parlor, and every thing
delicious on it. I was then going to the room door to call 'em, when he came
in and said,
`You have,' says he `every thing very nice here. Mrs. Hostess, and I regret
the lady (`he always said
the
lady, not
my
lady!' added Dame Darwell) cannot
come out to the table! I will take in a cup of tea and a little toast on a waiter
to her.'
I was sorry she couldn't come out, because when I get a table nicely fixed,
I love to have people set down to it and enjoy it. But the poor lady it seemed
must be ill, and so I cheerfully put on a waiter a little of every thing nice, and
poured out a cup of tea with cream and sugar; and then I said I would take it
to her.
`No, you are very kind, madam,' (he always said `madam' so perlite and
foreign-like), says he; `I will take it to her myself and urge her to eat
something
.'
`Is your lady ill, sir?' I asked him.
`Fatigued, and a
little
indisposed,' he said. `As we start again so soon she
wishes to take all the rest she can.'
`This was all very reasonable,' continued Dame Darwell; `and so he took
the waiter to her, though it did look strange to see such a nice dressed
gentleman
carrying in a waiter. But then when I thought how it was for his sick
wife it didn't appear so strange to me as it did kind in him. In a minute or
two he came back and sat down, but first politely asked me to take the head
of the table. So I sat down and poured out his tea for him. He ate a little
while in silence, and then began asking me a great many questions about
myself
;
how long I had been keeping the Inn; how long I had been a widow; if
I had any children? and he asked them so very civil-like that I couldn't help
answering them all, 'till he knew as much about me as I did about myself. He
then said he thought I must be a very happy woman, `inasmuch as Providence
had blessed me with a competence and a kind heart.'
`Perhaps, sir,' said I laughing, `if you should hear me scold in the kitchen
and at the stable boys some days when we are pretty busy, you wouldn't think
I had a very sweet temper.'
He laughed, but sadly as he always did, and said, `I am quite satisfied that
you are kind and good! It is a pity that such excellent qualities as you seem
to possess, should not have been bestowed upon one who, as a mother, could
exercise them to the happiness of her children!'
When he said this in these very words, I felt as if I could shed tears. He
had touched my heart where it was the tenderest. He saw I was affected and
said,
`Your regrets are that you are not a mother, I perceive. But Providence
may yet realise your wishes, at least in a degree!'
I don't know whether I blushed or not, but I felt my face glow, he was so
plain spoken: but I said, trying to laugh,
`I shall never marry again, sir! I love the memory of my poor George too
well ever to give the hand that he once loved to another!'
`Perhaps so; I doubt it not madam,' he said, taking a spoonful of my white
honey to eat with his fresh bread; `but Providence sometimes affords the good
and benevolent objects of affection by means that are unforeseen!'
I looked at him very hard: for I had no idea what he meant, and could not
understand him. He saw my looks and then said,
`I mean, madam, in this way. A good wife once who desired offspring in
vain, found one morning at her door, a babe in an open box. She could find
no parents to claim it and adopted it for her own, and became a mother to it;
and doubtless she loved it as if it had been her own!'
`I have not the least doubt she did,' I said warmly. `I am sure, if it had
been a pretty baby and a boy too,
I
should have loved the little dear as if it
was my own flesh and blood!'
When I said this he looked at me very earnestly, and then seemed gratified.
He soon finished his supper, for he talked more than he ate, and didn't seem
to have any appetite, though he praised every thing. In a little while he got
up and after saying he should like to have his servant provided for, he went to
the lady's room. Well, I didn't see either of them again until about dusk
when he came into the tap. He was looking very pale and very grave. He
called for his bill and settled it, giving me a gold piece, and I gave me the
change in silver. I then asked him when he would have his horses; and he
said as the moon rose soon after sunset, he would thank me to have them
harnessed
as soon as it rose. He then spoke to his servant to see that they were at
the door at that time, and then went back again to the lady's room. I tried to
get something out of the negro about his master and mistress; but he didn't
seem to know anything. I don't believe he knew his right hand from his left;
yet he was the perlitest nigger I ever saw afore or since. Well, the moon rose,
and the horses were put in, the negro went for the travelling basket and placed
it in the carriage, and the gentleman and lady, the latter after delaying a good
deal and three times going back for something, came out, she leaning
heavily on his arm, and weeping: for I distinctly heard her stifled sobs. She
still wore her veil, and I tried to see her face, holding a candle in my hand
purposely
;
and as good fortune would favor me, her veil caught the door catch as
she was passing out and was drawn aside! It left exposed a sweet, lovely face,
pale and tearful, and that of a person not more than two and twenty. The next
moment she was seated in the carriage. The gentleman got in by her side
the black man shut the door and mounted to his box, and the horses dashed off
at full speed along the turnpike in the direction of Boston.
CHAPTER III.
How Dame Darwell and her relations discuss the strangersAunt Keezy gives
her opinionCharitable stockings for the Flat Foot IndiansThe beggar
woman and Dame Darwell's lesson to her Aunt and CouzinThe true
charity
of Dame Darwell contrasted with the false charity of the othersThe alarm
.
When
good Dame Darwell got to that part of her story with which we have
closed the last chapter, she was accustomed to clasp both of her hands together,
lift her eyes towards the heavens and shake her head several times very
mysteriously
;
and then say to her auditors,
`What I have told you is nothing,
nothing
to what is now coming. The
carriage drove off, as I said, but I could see by the light of the moon that the
lady leaned out and looked back towards the Inn till she was out of sight.
Poor lady! I did not then know what she was looking back for. Well, I went
into the house, and just as I did so couzin Mariah and aunt Keezy got home
from the sewing circle, and we all sot down in the porch together because it
was a pleasant moonshiny evening, and when they begun to tell me about the
sewing circle, I stopped 'em by beginning to talk about the handsome
gentleman
in black and the beautiful lady in mourning; and how she wept.
`I expect,' says aunt Keezy, `she's just lost her father and goin' home from
the funeral.'
`Perhaps her husband treats her bad,' says couzin Mariah; `I shouldn't
wonder, 'specially as he wouldn't let no body wait on her but himself.'
`He waited on her coz she preferred it,' said I something quick; for couzin
Mariah, because she was an old maid, was always making a slur at husband's,
and I always stand up for 'em for dear George's sake.'
`It's very mysterious they should propose to stay all night and then go away
at dark,' says aunt Keezy shaking her head. `Did you find out their names?'
`No,' said I, `but I saw on the brass plate on the trunk three letters, F. R. M.'
Aunt Keezy repeated the letters over and over, and so did couzin Mariah,
but they nor I could make nothing of them. Well, we than began to talk about
the sewing circle. Aunt Keezy said she had in all made two shirts, a gown,
and hemmed four cotton pocket handkerchiefs to clothe the nakedness of the
little Sandwich Islanders with; while couzin Mariah said she had made three
waistcoats, three children's frocks, and knit six pairs of garters since spring for
the Flat-Foot Indians. Both then began to talk of the virtue of charity and
benevolence, and couzin Mariah particularly said how immodest it was to let
the heathen go stark naked, and if she could she'd have 'em all put into
trowsers
rite off. She had such pity for 'em. While we were setting talking in
this manner and they were unrolling and displaying what they had made, a poor
woman and three children came along the pike and stopped at the door. The
woman, it could be seen by the moonlight, was in rags, and her old gown was
slit so that the bare knee was visible; while the two little girls and boy were
half naked, one of them only able to keep her tatters upon her by holding them
up with her hands. The poor woman, who was Irish, said that she was from
New York where her husband had died, and was going to Boston where she
had a brother; and that she begged her way, for she hadn't seen the color of a
penny since many a weary week. I al'ays suspected aunt Keezy's and couzin
Mariah's charities were like the Pharisee's prayers, to be seen of men, so I
didn't say any thing but waited to see what would come to pass.
`Its a plizzint evenin' ye are enjoyin' in the door leddies, and God bliss ye
and long kape the roof o'er yer heds,' sez she; `for its long since the roof has been
over me and mine! I bliss God ye have the home and the nice cloathin', and
no doubt plenty food to yer hunger. It's me and mine is starvin' and is naked!
God gives the sparrows feathers, but to clothe his childer he puts sweet charity
into the hearts of the rich. Is it a shelter and a bit of bread ye'll give me for
my babes, good leddies?'
The words and appeal were so pathetic I could not help the tears coming
into my eyes; but I hardened my heart a little minute or two till I should see
what my couzin and aunt Keezy would do; for I knew what I would do! So I
got up and went into the tap as if for something.
`This is a tavern,' said aunt Keezy sharply; `and no one need expect to be
entertained here without pay.'
`Yes; go to some of the farmer's houses, if you want help,' said couzin
Mariah. `I am really shocked to see you go about so, woman, with your bare
knee sticking out so! How immodest! Why do you not sew it up?'
`Its niver a stitch 'll stay, but the first step I take tares it out, the cloth is so
rotten. I am modest, leddies, if I am poor! If you could give me an old bit
dress, or'
`We have nothing here for you, so tramp with your brats,' said aunt Keezy
sharply.
`You'll find lodging among your own class somewhere up the pike.'
I now came out. `Poor woman,' says I, `you seem very destitute. Have
vou no other garments than those rags for yourself and your children?'
`None, marm, so help me the swate virgin.'
`They are not sufficient for decency.'
`That is what I have been telling her,' said couzin Mariah with warmth.
`Indeed, woman, I am shocked you should be seen so. You can't be a fit
object
of charity to have so little modesty. That little boy too! Fie! You ought
certainly to be ashamed to bring such objects before decent people.' And
couzin Mariah covered her eyes to keep from seeing such shocking depravity.
I was now roused. I am never angry except at such things as this. So I
said, but very quietly so that she need not suspect,
`How many gowns did you make at the sewing circle for the Sandwich
Islander's
,
couzin?'
`I made three child's frocks, three waistcoats and knit six pair of garters,
they are all to be sent out in the first ship.'
`And how many things did you make, aunt?' sez I.
`Two shirts, a gown, and hemmed four pocket handkerchiefs.'
`Let me see them,' said I in the same quiet way, as if I wasn't thinking at
all about the poor woman and her children who stood so pitifully outside the
door. So they handed them to me without any suspicion, thinking I was
going
to admire their work and praise their industry; for the idea of any
really
charitable destination of their articles never once entered their narrow and
selfish
minds. I unrolled the gown and the three frocks, and to my delight I saw
that the frocks were just the children's sizes and that the dress would be just
the thing for the mother.
`They are very nice garments,' said I. `These are to be your free gifts
for the Sandwich Islanders and the Flat-Foot Indians, are they not?' said I.
`Yes, we give them in charity,' both answered with a sort of Pharisaic
exultation
,
wishing to give me a high notion of their charity. But I knew them
both quite as well as they knew themselves, and I always hated all hypocrisy.
So I said,
`Then Heaven has rewarded your charity by bringing the Sandwich
Islanders
to your door instead of waiting to have the clothes take a long voyage to
hunt them up. I will be the dispenser of your charity, good aunt. Here, poor
Sandwich Islander,' said I, turning to the woman and handing her the gown,
`here is a gown this good lady in spectacles has just finished for you. Take
it and give her many thanks for it.'
The poor woman took it, and knelt right down before aunt Keezy and poured
out a volume of the most grateful benedictions upon her and her children and
her children's children. In the meanwhile I had unrolled the three frocks,
and given one to each of the children, saying to them,
`My poor little Flat-Foot Indians whom Providence has sent to my door,
here is a frock for each of you this good lady (pointing to couzin Mariah) has
made for you. Take them and thank her for thinking of you in your
destitution
.'
The children took the frocks, (they were ten, eight, and six years old, the
boy being the least) and all three imitating their mother dropped on their
naked knees down before couzin Mariah. There is no describing the
consternation
and utter astonishment of both aunt Keezy and couzin Mariah. They
first looked at me and then at the poor woman, then at the gown, which the
next moment she took forcible possession of, abusing the innocent women as a
thief and an imposter; while the latter looked as angry as she dared to be; for
she caught my eye and saw that I was not only in earnest but very indignant.
But for that she would have rescued her frocks also.
`Give back the gown, aunt,' I said firmly. `It is the woman's. You made
it, or profess to have made it for charity. Charity has sent hither her
hand-maid
to receive it. Restore it to her.
Aunt Keezy sulkily obeyed, and both looked angry and mortified. I
continued
,
`This is your charity! This is your pious benevolence! Spend your time
making up clothing for heathens on the other side of the world who may never
be benefitted by them, and letting the naked heathens that God sends to your
very feet perish! This kind of charity is not of Heaven! It is not angel's
charity! A truly benevolent woman's heart will bleed for the naked Irish
woman
as freely as for the Sandwich Island woman. `Give while thou hast the
poor with thee,' is the language of the Holy Scriptures. Deliver me from that
morbid charity which sheds tears because savages go bare-foot, and turns a
deaf ear to the prayers of the poor in a Christian land! Tell your sewing-circle
they will find Sandwich Island savages and Flat Foot Indians around their own
doors. If you had given to this woman but a pocket handkerchief, or offered
her food, I would have believed in your Sandwich Island charity! But now I
would not give a fig for it. I could put all the true charity you both possess in
the eye of a cambric needle and then you couldn't find it with double patent
spectacles.'
`You will see I was up,' said good Dame Darwell in recounting this affair,
`but if any thing moves me it is meanness and low views in people who pretend
to be saints. Aunt Keezy and couzin Mariah wanted the minister (who was a
bachelor) to think they were so very charitable; and also to have the merit of
it in the world: for every body knew who gave to the Sandwich Islanders and
knit stockings for the Flat-Food Indians; but nobody knew who gave to the
poor in secret! Well, they looked at me and at one another; and then
couzin
Mariah burst out a sobbing and aunt Keezy looked as angry as a thunder
clould.
`I declare, couzin Hetty,' cried Mariah, `this is cruel and shameful.'
`It is outrageous,' thundered aunt Keezy.
`Very well,' said I very quietly; for I was calm again now I had my say;
`who gave you the calico for the dresses, aunt Keezy?'
She didn't answer and I replied, `Wasn't it I? Didn't I give you both
material
for allthe cotton, yarn, thread, and even the needles? In a word, is
there any thing either of you have on your backs that I did not give you. Have
you not been fed, lodged and clothed by me, one of you for five years, and your
aunt Keezy for seven? What I have given these poor people is my own.'
`You ought to be ashamed to throw up our dependence on you to us,' cried
aunt Keezy, now fairly mad.
`It is ungenerous to boast of your charities in this manner,' cried couzin
Mariah.
`I did not boast. I spoke of them to humble you, and to show you that you
are just as dependent upon me as that poor woman, for lodging, food and
clothing to night. What you have on is mine; and it would be just to make
you both take it off and clothe this poor woman with it!'
Here both burst out a crying and took on so that I told them they should
both go at once if they did not stop, when they made shift to be quiet. I had
given them a good lesson and a good lecture, and that was all I wanted; for I
would sooner have gone out of my own house than turned out poor aunt Keezy,
who though a close, narrow minded woman was too simple to take any care of
herself; and couzin Mariah I liked all but for her being over religious. But
the lesson I gave them did them both good. It made them more humble, and
gave them a better notion of what was true charity.
`Now,' says I, `that you needn't call me unjust and accuse me of being like
an Indian in taking back what I have once bestowed, if to-morrow you will
price these articles according as the society values them, I will pay you the
money for them. Now, good woman,' said I, `come in with your children,
and let us try on the dresses, but first they must be well scrubbed.'
`So I took 'em through to the kitchen and first gave them a hearty meal, and
it did me good, and the poor mother too, to see the little brats devour the bread
and butter. After they had got through I had them all put into a tub and the
cook and her girl washed them from head to heel. I then put them all in one
bed next the kitchen, meaning to get something ready that night to complete
their wardrobe when they got up in the morning; for not a rag they had worn
was fit to put on again, and I made Dick burn them in the stable yard. The
poor woman I let sleep in the same room with her children, meaning to help
out her wardrobe in the morning from mine. The grateful creature! I could
hardly get her off to bed for her blessings and prayers. Well, Aunt Keezy
and couzin Mariah set to work altering and making up little articles for the
children to put on, glad of an opportunity to redeem their credit with me. We
sat up till it was quite late, cutting out and sewing together; and the clock
had just struck ten, when couzin Mariah, who had uncommonly sharp ears,
stopped and listened and said she thought she heard a child crying.
`It is one of the poor woman's,' I said; `I will go and see if the little one
has'nt fallen out of the bed.' So I took a light and went out of the little parlor
across the kitchen and opened the door of the room. They were all asleep,
the poor woman having her little boy fast asleep by her side, no doubt having
got up to get him to lay by her. All was still. I went back to the room and
had hardly taken up my work, when we all thought we heard the cry of a child.
We paused and listened. It was not repeated, and aunt Keezy set down the
the sound to the cat.
`It was like a cat,' said I, `but there is the cat on the chair under the
window
.'
`Then what could it have been?' cried couzin Mariah, looking pale.
`Perhaps some strange cat,' said I.
I had hardly spoken when I heard it again louder than before. It was a
sharp, loud cry, but seemed a good way off. We all started and looked in the
direction of the sound and listened attentively and with beating hearts.
`It must be the boy,' I said, after waiting a little while. `He has probably
cried out in his sleep.'
`It did not sound like a boy's cry,' said aunt Keezy. `It was a baby's, if
ever a baby cried in the world.'
`No neighbor has a baby within half a mile of here. It can't be,' I said
positively.
`There it is again,' exclaimed Mariah, running to me and catching firm hold
of my shoulder.
Sure enough we heard it now loud and distinct. It was plainly the cry of a
good lusty baby. It did not now go like the wail of a cat, but emitted full and
clear notes that were not to be mistaken.
`It comes from the further end of the house,' said aunt Keezy, who had now
caught hold of couzin Mariah as fast as she had hold upon me.
`From the Court Chamber,' gasped the latter.
I was perplexed and contounded. The child continued to cry, and wholly
at a loss to explain it, I took up the light and determined to proceed at once
in the direction of the sounds. Aunt Keezy would have dissuaded me,
asseverating
that it might be a ghost, especially as my husband George had died
in that distant room. But I knew George hadn't a cry like a six month's baby
and I resolutely resolved to see the matter to the bottom. Afraid to be left
alone and yet equally afraid to accompany me, they followed me with
trembling
steps along the passage from which the cries still came louder and louder.
CHAPTER IV.
How Dame Darwell led the way to the Court ChamberHow all but the good
hostess were frightenedWhat was discooered in the Court ChamberThe
Silver
BottleDame Darwell's sympathyThe note and packageThe ill-will
of aunt Keezy and cousin MariahThe Quart Mug succumbs to `The Silver
Bottle
.'
`The passage you know,' said Dame Darwell, continuing her narration,
from my little sitting room to the Court Chamber is very long; so it took me
some time to get to the door of the room, especially as aunt Keesy was
holding
on by one arm and cousin Mariah by the other. I hadn't been in the room
since the strange gentlemen and lady had left it, intendin' to leave it till
morning
to be cleaned up. Well, the cries as I got to the door were right lusty
and strong, and there was now no mistaking it for any thing else
but
a baby.'
`Don't open the door for the world!' cried aunt Keesy trembling behind me
in every limb.
`It may be an evil spirit in the shape of a baby,' said cousin Mariah pulling
me back.
`I do not fear it if it is,' I said boldly. `I have a clear conscience. It is a
baby and a real one, of that I am positive; but how it ever got into the Court
Chamber is a mystery!'
I then tried to open the door and it was locked! This startled me, I confess.
The key wasn't in the door, but I saw it lying on the floor at my feet. I
picked
it up and put it into the lock, resolved at once to see the end of all this.
The child, hearing perhaps the noise of the key, stopped crying.
`It's gone,' said aunt Keezy.
`It's frightened away whatever it was,' echoed cousin Mariah; but neither
of them seemed to have gained any more courage with this idea.
`It has only stopped crying to listen,' I said; and then unlocked the door
and threw it wide open. I must say I was a little trepidous in my nerves,'
continued Dame Darwell, at this crisis of her story, `on opening the door,
because
it
was
so odd a baby should be heard crying there at that time of night
and no mother in the room that I knew of. So I stood in the door way a
minute
and looked in before I entered. I held the candle above my head to take
a view of the room. All seemed just as it should be. The easy chair stood
in its corner; the stuffed rocking chairs sat up one each side of the mantle;
the things in the chamber were just as neat as if the gentleman and lady had
not been in it. But I could see no baby. The white dimity curtains of the bed
were down and drawn close as usual. I could'nt therefore see into it, and so
I kept my eyes fixed and listened. I could hear nothing and began really to
feel queer about the cry we'd heard coming from the chamber, when all at once
we heard it from behind the curtain's of the bed so sudden and so loud and
clear that aunt Keezy yelled out louder still with mortal fear, and cousin
Mariah
screamed `murder' at the top of her lungs and sunk right down on the
floor in the door way. I must confess the cry was so sudden and sharp in the
silence that was a moment before it, that my heart leaped into my throat. But
I was not frightened, only startled. The cry was not only loud but right down
angry, as if the baby after stopping and listening a little while and then
hearing
nothing more had set up afresh. I walked straight to the bed and lifted
the curtains with one hand and put the light in with the other, and there sure
enough lay a handsome little fat baby about seven months old, right in the
middle of the bed with a pillow each side of him to keep him from rolling out.
He had kicked the coverlid down and lay there with a silver nursing bottle
held tight in one of his dimpled hands. As soon as he saw the light he
stopped
half way in a vigorous screech and looked right up into my face, the tears
glistening like little diamonds of dew on his cheeks.'
`If ever I was surprised at any thing,' said Dame Darwell, `it was when I
saw this little fellow lying in the middle of my best bed without my knowing
no more how he ever came there than the man in the moon! I didn't scream
nor faint, but stood a full minute kind o' petrified, looking down at the dear
little innocent. There he lay looking at me a minute and then smiled, and
then thrust the tube of the silver bottle into his mouth and began to suck away
vigorously for a little, when being reminded that it was empty he set up a
pitiful
cry and looked at me so imploringly! I couldn't resist stooping right
down and kissing the little dear, and I believe I dropped a tear on its little
cheek, it looked so innocent and helpless. I then told aunt Keesy, who was
looking at the baby with wonder and fear, to hold the light; and took up the
little fellow in my arms and held him off to take a good look at him to see it
I had ever seen it before. But I had never seen any baby like it, and my
curiosity
was roused to know how it came there. The little stranger, however
was resolved to give me no time for the indulgence of curiosity; for he put
up his pretty lip and began to show cry, and then thrust his little silver bottle
into its mouth and began to draw at it. I saw at once what the little fellow
wanted and sent cousin Mariah, who had got over her fright and was trying to
guess who the baby belonged to, to make up a fire in the kitchen and boil it some
milk.
I hadn't more than got the words `boiled milk' out of my mouth when the
boiled milk the gentleman had ordered flashed on my mind! I then thought
how I had found the child in the room they had left, and that the mystery was
solved! The boiled milk must have been ordered for this very baby! and they
had gone away and forgotten it!
It was queer enough! I couldn't think a mother and father could forget their
child and leave it behind at an Inn; but then there was the child in their bed
and they had departed. I mentioned my surprise to aunt Keezy.
`It may be their's if they had brought a baby with 'em and went off without
taking it again,' said aunt Keezy. `Did they have a baby?'
`Not that I saw or heard,' said I, quite struck aback with this doubt; for
sure enough they had not brought any baby with them. This I confessed to
aunt Keezy, who said very sensibly,
`Well, if they didn't bring no baby with 'em I don't see how they could have
left one.'
`It might have been born here,' called out Cousin Mariah from the passage,
she having overheard aunt Keezy's remark. I've read of such things in novels.'
`It couldn't have been born six months old,' said I laughing; `for the child is
full that if not more.'
`How can you tell its age, cousin Hetty?' said Mariah, vexed at my
laughing
.
`I am sure all babies looked the same age and have the same looks to
me.
I didn't care to argue the matter with cousin Mariah, who would probably never
be any wiser about babies than she was then, being such a confirmed old maid as
she was: and as the little fellow began to grow very impatient for his bottle to
be filled I told her to hurry with the milk, while I sat down in a rocking chair
and began to sooth the little fellow, wondering all the while where it had come
from, for I had gave up the notion they had left it. While I was thinking and
admiring it, for it was so fat and chubby with black eyes and a good deal of
silky brown hair, what the gentleman had said to me at supper about Providence
sometimes ratifying our wishes in more ways than one, flashed upon my mind;
and for a minute or two I began to feel very superstitious, and began to think
that the child had come to my roof in a supernatural way. The more I thought
upon it, the less superstitious I felt, but the more the idea began to take hold of
my mind that the babe was his and that he had sounded me with the intention
to leave it with me. I mentioned my belief to aunt Keezy, who said, in her
way
`It is all very probable
if
the gentleman and lady had only brought the
child with them.'
Here I was all afloat again. That they brought no child with them I was
very well assured. Yet here was a child left in their roomshere was a
sucking
bottle in his hand, and boiled milk had been ordered! It all looked very
like being their's, but then, as aunt Keezy said, `if they didn't bring a child
how should they have left one, at least one six months old? If it had been a
new born baby then it would all have been easily accounted for.
By this time couzin Mariah had heated the milk, sweetened it, and brought
it in and I filled the silver bottle, and put it to the impatient little rogue's mouth,
who could hardly be kept quiet till it came. As soon as he found he could
draw something from the tube besides air, he began to pull away with a vigor
and zeal that made us all laugh. Now, he was quiet, I had time to talk over
the whole matter about him. Aunt Keezy first proposed carefully to examine
his blanket and robes, for he was wrapped in a fine merino blanket bound with
blue silk ribbon and his dress was very elegantly worked. We made a thorough
search but there was no name or initials upon them.
`I will look about the bed and see if those who placed him here havn't left
some articles,' said couzin Mariah, beginning the search with commendable
curiosity.
`And I will look round the room and see if any thing is to be found in it,'
said aunt Keezy. In a minute afterward couzin Mariah drew out from
beneath
the counterpane a large and neat package tied with scarlet tape, and at
the same instant aunt Keezy discovered lying on the pincushion under the
glass a billet addressed to
Mistress Darwell
,
Hostess
.
Both uttered exclamations and run to me with their prizes.
`Now we shall see?' cried couzin Mariah beginning to untie the parcel. But
I took it from her.
`The mystery will be cleared up,' exclaimed aunt Keezy, who had a perfect
horror of every thing at all mysterious.
The note was unsealed, and written with pencil. The direction was written
in a delicate hand, perfectly lady-like. I could not help thinking of the pale,
sweet face in mourning as I looked at it. I opened it and read, first to myself,
for I did not like always to make aunt Keezy and my cousin my confidants,
and then read aloud:
Dear Madam:
I am stranger to you! You may never behold me again, yet I am
about to cast myself upon your heart! I am about to entrust to you what is
dearer to me than lifemy infant child! Circumstances of the most painful
character, which I cannot at present control and which may bind me till death
releases me from this sad world, compel me to deny myself longer the blessed
privilege of a mother. I must separate from my child, perhaps never more to
clasp it to my bleeding bosom. I have been three days seeking somewhere to
leave it,alas, to leave it among strangersunknowing and unknown. But
no where could I desert it hitherto. The hour of delay cannot be extended.
Providence I feel has brought me to your roof. Your heart is kindfor your
voice and face are kindly and benevolent. I have had repeated to me your
language at the table, and my heart has confidence in you. To you, then,
dear madam, I entrust my little boymy babe! my heart's idol. God forgive
me, if I am committing a crime. But it is not mine to choose. I
must
part
with my babe. I shall leave it in the bed. With it you will also find a
package
of its clothing. Take my child, cherish it tenderly for the poor mother's
sake who is denied the trust, she now makes over to you with a broken heart.'
This was all. The paper was blistered as if with tears fallen upon it, and
the handwriting though delicate was tremulous, and toward the last, hurried.
When I had done reading it we all looked in silence at each other and then
opened the package. It contained a dozen beautiful infant robes and slips,
caps, and under robes, and all was rich and beautifully made up.
`Now, only think!' ejaculated aunt Keezy, lifting both her hands and lost
in amazement.
`Was ever the like!' repeated couzin Mariah in a tone of unlimited wonder,
when I had laid open the contents of the bundle.
I sat silent and thinking with the note in my hand. I was wondering how
that baby had got into the house and I not know it. I made known my
perplexity
to aunt Keezy, who said
`Did they not bring it it in under a cloak?'
`No. The lady wore a close habit; and the gentleman threw off his cloak
as soon as he got out of the carriage.'
`Perhaps the child was brought in in a trunk!' ventured cousin Mariah.
`The trunk was not brought in,' I said. `But I do recollect now
what
was
brought in, and that was the very thing! It was a large travelling basket,
like a champaign basket. The negro man carried it and I noticed that the
lady was very anxious and careful about it and spoke to him three or four
times to be careful how he bore it! That was it! The little dear was in that
basket!' I exclaimed with satisfaction.
`There is no doubt,' said aunt Keezy, shaking her head.
`How very extraordinary'! exclaimed couzin Mariah, looking at the same
time very grave.
`That is the way it was,' I said. `The basket was carried back to the
carriage
just as it was brought in. Now I can see why the poor mother came
back three times to the room before she could finally tear herself away. I
shouldn't wonder if they had been trying to leave it at some place all along
the road, but her heart couldn't trust any body with it.'
`It's a pity she hadn't left it somewhere else than here,' exclaimed couzin
Mariah looking coldly upon the little fellow as he lay upon my lap happily
sucking
away at his silver bottle and looking round at times with his handsome
black eyes on each of them and then smiling up into my face as if he thought I
was his mother. I shed tears for the poor mother when I read the note over
again and saw him smiling up into my face, and kissing him I said
`You shall be mine now my babe. I will be a mother to you from this time,'
said I. [And nobly did you keep your promise, good, kind Dame Darwell, for
but I am going in advance of the story.]
`Why do you wish he had been left somewhere else?' I asked cousin
Mariah
,
continued the good dame, when I heard her say that.
`Because it is likely to be a scandal in the neighborhood to have it here.'
`A scandal?' I repeated.
`They will not believe the story, and people may say it'sit's' here
couzin Mariah hesitated.
`Whose?'
`Mineor aunt Keezy's.'
I didn't laugh, for I was too sorrowful on the poor mother's account; but I
said
`People will be no more likely to believe the one story than the other!'
I don't know whether they took this reply of mine as a compliment or not. I
did not mean it for one, for I was vexed at their suspicions. `The child shall
be mine and be
called
mine if people like,' said I.
`Perhaps it was not born in due wedlock,' said aunt Keezy. `In that case
it is a disgrace to keep it. I speak for your good, niece.'
`The child is entrusted to my protection. Whether its mother is married or
not is nothing to the purpose. The child is just the same childand has the
same eyes, lips and smile as if it had been born in wedlock. When you can
show me that it is not a helpless baby and does not need my protection, I will
then talk with you aunt Keezy. Providence has sent it to me instead of
giving
me one of my own, and from this day I am its mother.
They both wanted to say something more; but I wouldn't suffer them to
speak; for I well knew that the legitimacy or illegitimacy of the child didn't
trouble their consciences. They were only thinking how that the child might
possibly be a rival in the possession of my property, which on my death they
had expectations of inheriting between them. So I took the baby to my own
bed room and from that night I never knew any difference between it and one
that was my own. I forgot to say that on the silver bottle of the dear boy was
the same engraving of an eagle treading on a serpent's head, I saw on the
harness
and door of the carriage, and that the letter W was underneath. The
next day when the painter came to me and asked me what name he should
paint on the sign board, I told him to paint a `silver bottle,' and put the words
`The Silver Bottle' under it; and ever since then the Inn has been called
`
The Silver Bottle
.'
At this point good Dame Darwell used to end her story of my `discovery
lying
between two pillows in the middle of the best bed in the Court Chamber.'
CHAPTER V.
How certain evil persons would slander Dame Darwell touching my birthHow
couzin Mariah and aunt Keezy were vexed that people wonldn't slander them
Dame Darwell receives a call from the ministerA question arises touching my
having been christenedI am at length christened
.
The
foregoing narrative of my `discovery,' not birth, I have given in the
words of the excellent Dame Darwell, as I have a hundred times heard her
relate
it not only to me in person, when I was old enough to understand, but also
to all her neighbors and most of her old guests when they came again: for
not one of them ever failed to ask her why she had changed the name of the
Inn, to `The Silver Bottle,' which inquiry always gave her a fine
oppportunity
for relating my story.
There were some envious, ill-willed people who said that Dame Darwell
knew more about that baby than she pretended to. But their slanderous
whisperings
had no effect upon the respectable and discreet portion of the
community
,
who rejected the suspicion at once; for no character stood fairer than
that of the hostess of the Silver Bottle Inn. These suspicions and whisperings
of slanderous tongues did not even happen to fix upon `aunt Keezy' or `couzin
Mariah,' whereat, if I may credit the good Dame, they were not a little vexed:
for, although, they would have indignantly denounced any one who would
insinuate
that they, either of them, knew more about that baby than they would
like other people should know; yet when they found no body even thought or
hinted about the child's mysterious appearance in reference to themselves,
they were not a little chagrined.
By the third day after my
discovery
, not a soul that knew Dame Darwell but
had heard of the baby left at her Inn by a gentleman and lady in black who
came in a double barouche with bay horses, and went away after dark: and
every body paid a special visit to Dame Darwell to see the baby and hear her
account of the strange affair. She took every body into the Court Chamber
and showed them the bed and just how the child was lying in it, and then
showed them the silver bottle and the clothing and read the note to them
Among these visiters was the minister, who coming home from a journey on
the afternoon of the third day and hearing of the matter, put on his hat, took
his cane and walked across the meadows to the Inn.
Dame Darwell who was sitting at her window with the baby (that is
myself
)
in her arms feeding it with pap, while couzin Mariah was making a night
gown for it, and aunt Keezy cutting out a night capboth being perfectly
broken in by Dame Darwell to submission outwardly, but inwardly hating the
little stranger with all their hearts.
`I declare if there isn't the minister crossing the style,' said the good Dame.
`How glad I am to see him.'
The minister who was a mild looking, plainly dressed man of five and forty,
with a large nose and spectacles, entered and saluted the hostess.
`Good evening, mistress Darwell! So I hear you have had an addition to
your family.'
This was spoken in such a sly way that Dame Darwell blushed, looked down
and laughed, and then answered,
`Yes, Doctor! Here he is a fine seven-months boy-baby as ever was seen!'
And she held up the little fellow, (that is
myself
,) to the view of the minister.
He looked at me steadily through his spectacles, says Dame Darwell, full a
minute without a word; now peering at me this way and now that; now
examining
my eyes, then my nose, and then my mouth; then taking a general
view, as if he was trying to find out a resemblance between me and some of
his parishioners. But he was foiled, for he slowly and negatively shook his
head.
`A fine boy, mistress Darwell.'
`He is indeed, sir, and good as he is good looking. He sleeps all night
without waking and takes a two hour's nap before dinner. He has hardly cried
once since I have had him.'
`That speaks well for your care of the little stranger,' said the minister.
`But you seem to have come by him in a very singular fashion, Mrs. Darwell.'
`Yes, indeed, Doctor, you may well say that, the little dear. See how he
rolls his black eyes round as if he knew we were talking of it.'
Dame Darwell then began to relate the whole story as the reader has it,
from the first appearance of the carriage on the pike driving up to the door, to
my discovery in the `best bed' lying between two pillows grasping a silver
sucking bottle and tears glistening on my cheeks. After she had got through,
the Rev. Doctor placed his hands across the top of his stick, rested his chin
upon his hands and began to look very thoughtful. After a little time, he
raised his head, looked Dame Darwell full in the face and then gazing upon me,
said,
`This is very,
very
extraordinary.'
`Unheard of,' echoed `aunt Keezy.'
`Strange enough,' said cousin Mariah.
`It's a blessed Providence,' added good Dame Darwell benevolently.
`Let me look at the note, worthy mistress Darwell?' asked his reverence.
He took it and read it over twice. He examined the texture of the paper
and the handwriting with great particularity and then returned it to her,
saying
`It is lady like and scholarly in its style and appearance. The child's
mother
was an educated woman. She was also a feeling woman. Some
circumstances
which none but Providence can fathom, have led her to this seeming
act of cruelty. There have been circumstances in families which render the
concealment of the birth of children expedient. It would seem they were
man and wife, or why travel together and leave it together with such unity. If
the child had been illegitimate there seems no necessity why the father should
be a party to its desertion, or why the mother should feel herself compelled to
act as she has done, and evidently against her heart. If she had not been
married to him she would not have deserted her child to have followed him. It
is all very inexplicable,' he said, after a moments' silence; `and the more I
examine into the motives that led to this act, the more difficult I find it to
reconcile
it with any plausible cause. We must leave the event to Providence
who will watch over it with the same care as if its parents had not deserted
it; for whatever relation the parents may stand in with reference to each other,
the infant is one of God's creatures, and of those of whom Christ said `suffer
them to come unto me and forbid them not; for of such is the Kingdom of
Heaven.' Think how you have there entrusted to you, Mistress Darwell, an
heir of Christ's Kingdom, and you will not need any other motive for the
exercise
of your well-known benevolence.'
This view of the matter taken by the minister was deeply gratifying to Dame
Darwell and not a little humbling to the two spinsters, who had taken a very
different and less charitable view of the affair.
`I knew you would say I did right in keeping the dear child, Doctor,' said
Dame Darwell with tender emotion; `some of my friends advised me to send
it to the Overseer. But I could not listen to such a proposition. While I
have a house over my head and a bed and food to eat, this little fellow shall
share them with me!'
`Your feelings do you honor, Mistress Darwell,' said the minister! I should
have looked for no other course of conduct in you, knowing you as well as I
do. The little stranger is truly fortunate in finding so excellent a protector. I
doubt not that parents had previous knowledge of you, good Dame Darwell,'
added the minister with a benevolent smile.
The worthy hostess colored and looked down; for it always embarrassed
Dame Darwell to be complimented upon her qualities of the heart. If she
was complimented for her good looks she would laugh and say something
pleasant back again; but when she was praised for her charities she looked
down in modest silence.
`Is there no mark on the dresses left with it, nor any clue to the child's
name?' asked the minister in an earnest tone.
`Nothing except the eagle and the letter on the silver bottle,' said Dame
Darwell.
`Let me see the bottle.'
`Cousin Mariah, bring the Doctor the bottle out of thecupb oard I am
trying
to wean it by giving it pap, Doctor, for I think now its got no mother, the
best thing will be to wean it; for I think it is full seven, if not eight months
old. Here is the bottle, sir They filled it and left the child sucking it and
he went to sleep I suppose; and it was when he awoke and found it empty that
he set up the cry that we first heard.'
The minister took the silver bottle and closely examined the cypher, which
was an eagle with one foot upon the head of a serpent and the other talon
grasping the writhing folds. Beneath was the letter M, beautifully eugraved.
(I have it before me while I write.)
`This would seem to be a means, though a very uncertain one,' said the
minister, `of ascertaining the parentage of the child. By an advertisement in
the papers accurately describing this cypher and the initial letter, perhaps the
family name might be discovered. I would advise this course to be at once
taken.'
But to this step Dame Darwell was decidedly opposed. She said she
already
loved me too much to think of giving me up, and that if any body came
for the child it certainly would not be the parents who had left it; and as for
resigning it to any relations she positively would not. `If it wasn't necessary
their child should have been left here, they would not have left it,' was her
argument
,
`If they want it again, they know where to come for it. Who is an
advertisement to benefit, but, perhaps some wicked relation, the poor mother
has broken her heart to hide her child from! No, Doctor. Let me keep the
child as Providence and its parents have entrusted it to me. I am able to
support
it, and to do by it handsomely when I die!'
Here Dame Darwell saw aunt Keezy and cousin Mariah exchanging secret
glances and then look very black at me, though they did not dare to betray
openly their feelings. Dame Darwell only smiled, for she loved to punish
their selfishness, which would have barred and cast a cloud over her charities.
The minister after a little reflection approved of her course, saying that the
only way was to leave the clearing up of the mystery to that Providence which
governs and unfolds all events. Suddenly an idea seemed to flash upon the
good man's mind. He looked very seriously a moment at the child, and then
said,
`Is it possible this child has not been baptized, Mrs. Darwell. What name
do you call it.
`There was no name given to it in the note, and I thought of calling it
Georgy after my dear husband; for I resolved if I ever had a boy he should
be called George. But I have another name for it;' and the widow smiled.
`George is doubtless a good name; but it is a pity if the child has ever been
christened its name should not be known to you. You are quite sure there was
nothing in the package of clothing to give any clue to his name? Not an
article
marked?'
`This was the wrapper the clothes came in. You see it is a piece of buff
paper without the scratch of a pen on it. This bit of printed music paper, the
caps were wrapped up in! You see the tune on it is `Little Marlboro',' a
favorite
of George's and mine!'
And as the hostess spoke she handed the minister a leaf of a singing book,
on which was the tune of `Little Marlboro',' the name of the tune being on the
page in large letters. The minister looked at it a moment, and then in the
face of Dame Darwell, and said,
`They evidently were christian people and orthodox, to have this music book
by them. They doubtless christened their child.'
`I have thought of giving him that name,' said Dame Darwell, slightly
hesitating
.
`What name?' asked the minister.
`That on the paper. It was what first struck my eye when I unrolled the
caps, and it seemed to me that that was the name Providence sent for it.'
`It is a very odd name for a child,' said his reverences miling.
`I confess it is odd; but there it is on the paper, and it seems as plain to me
that it ought to be the child's name, as if his mother had writ it there.'
`So you mean to call him `Little Marlboro',' and nothing more?' asked the
minister.
`Yes if there is no objection to it in the christening,' answered Dame
Darwell
;
`for I want him christened and properly named; for no one knows
whether he has been christened, and I should be uneasy if I thought it was a
little heathen!'
`Little Marlboro' is a very good name, and is the title of a tune which I am
partial to. A very good name for a tune, Mistress Darwell, but not so
appropriate
for a child,' he said with a quiet smile.
`Now I think it is very pretty,' said Dame Darwell, looking affectionately
down upon me as I was laying in her lap perfectly comfortable. `
Itty Marly
dear
itty Marly! See him smile! The dear little fellow knows his name
already
!'
`Well Mrs. Darwell, you are at liberty to do as you choose, and if you will
prefix George to the Marlboro' I have no objections to baptizing him; for he
will need the George when he is too much grown to make the `Little'
appropriate
.'
`Little Marlboro' is my fancy, Doctor,' said the good hostess smiling. `There
it is on the paper and it seems somehow to belong to him.'
`Well then I will humor you, Mrs. Darwell. Bring the babe to church next
Sunday and I will christen him `Little Marlboro'.'
The next Sunday `Little Marlboro' I was christened, not a little to the
amusement and surprise of the congregation, who thought doubtless that
name was quite as much out of the common way as way my mysterious
appearance
in the `best bed' of the Inn kept by the worthy Dame.'
CHAPTER VI.
My name causes remark, but Dame Darwell explains and satisfies curiosity
Aunt Keezy and cousin Mariah conspire against me, and open war is declared
between usMy victory and Emma FieldA battleA new and painful view
of my position
.
The oddity of the name by which good Dame Darwell had had me
christened
,
created not a little curiosity and amazement; but when the worthy
hostess
explained to inquirers how the caps had come wrapped up in the piece of
music called `Little Marlboro', they one and all agreed with her in the
propriety
of bestowing upon me a name, which Providence seemed in a particular
manner to have designated as that which should belong to me.
Such, then, as I have narrated in the foregoing chapter, was the manner, not
of my birth exactly, for that remains still an impenetrable mystery, but of my
appearance!
From that time Dame Darwell became a mother to me. She
never failed to have me dressed in my best `bib and tucker' when any of the
more respectable order of her guests arrived, and brought into the room; when
she began to relate my history, a thing she was very fond of doing. In this
manner I soon got to be quite a hero before I was one year old; and Dame
Darwell always ended her narrative with the assertion of her firm belief that I
should yet turn out to be some great personage, and she hoped to live to see
the day when I should ride in my state carriage. She never failed to declare
her intention of making me her heir, which assurances did not tend to elevate
me very greatly in the affections of `aunt Keezy' and cousin Mariah.' These
two personages soon began to regard me with the most decided demonstrations
of hostility, and to look upon me as a little heathen that had surreptitiously
crept in between them and the twelve thousand dollars at which Dame
Darwell's
fortune was estimated. But their fears of the good dame prevented
them from openly exhibiting their malevolence; though they did not fail to put
their heads together against me when alone, and plot how they should get me
out of the way without absolutely putting arsenic into my milk. But their
conspiracies did not, it would seem, arrive at any positive head inasmuch as I
reached my seventh year alive, hale and thriving as any urchin in all those
parts. I can, however, distinctly recollect sundry privately administered
pinches
and ear pullings from these two good ladies whenever they would meet me
in the passage, or be alone with me; which led me to take a very decided
dislike
to their society, a disposition I was by no means backward in manifesting.
I was too spirited even at seven years to complain to Dame Darwell of their
persecutions, but used to retaliate in my own way. I took pitch and with it
fastened nut shells on aunt Keesy's cat, and turned her into their bed room at
night, where her clattering footsteps up and down the floor terrified them out
of their wits; and Dame Darwell used to laugh while they cried, for the good
dame, in the first place, never thought any thing I did was wrong; and in the
second place she well knew their dislike of me, and connived at any tricks I
saw fit to play upon them. I would resent `cousin Mariah's' treatment by
putting
honey on a stick and bringing into the house a cloud of bees and wasps
of which she stood in the greatest terror, and at the sight of which she would
drop everything and run screaming to shut herself up. I put bees under her
dinner plate and hornets in the lining of her bonnet. One Sunday she heard
a well known buzzing and angry humming in the crown of her bonnet. In
such cases cousin Mariah lost all presence of mind. She did so now! She
jumped up in her pew, tore off her bonnet, snapping the strings and flinging it
into the aisle, and then uttered a shrick that paralyzed every body in the
meeting
house.
I may be censured as cruel and unfeeling. But that very morning she had
pinched my ear till the blood came, without any provocation, and daily the two
were exercising their wits to annoy me and give me pain, well knowing I
would not complain to Dame Darwell; who, had she known what I endured
from their malace, would have sent them both away from beneath her roof.
Thus under the necessity of defending myself, I early learned to regard them
as my natural enemies; but I will say that in all my resentment, my revenge
was without malace and often playful though severe. In my seventh year, I
was sent to the village school, having already been previously taught to read
fluently by my more than mother. From this time up to my twelfth year
nothing
of importance occurred to vary the monotony of a school boy's life. I
had studied hard and improved all the privileges good Dame Darwell conferred
upon me. Perhaps, however, it will be more modest to speak in the third
person
of my accomplishments at this period, and use Dame Darwell's words, as
she spoke of me to the chief Justice who stopped one day at the Inn.
`He is now twelve or thereabouts, your worship, but as you know he came
to me so singularly I don't know when his birth day is, and so I always keeps
that I discovered him on. He is the most affectionate and generous boy you
ever saw. He loves me with all his heart and returns my affection with as
much fondness as if I were his own mother. He has grown so tall and
handsome
with large, sparkling hazel eyes, brown curly hair, and such a pleasant
voice and smile. I never hear him speak but I don't think of his mother's; for
it sounds just like it. He has his father's forehead and eye, and I think will
be tall like him, but he'll make a handsomer man, I think. He studies so hard
too! He is at the head of all his classes in Latin and Greek, (for you know
I send him to the Academy now) and has got through Ceesy's Commandment's
and Vigil's Enidy.'
`Cesar's Commentaries and Virgil's neiad, you probably mean, madam,
politely observed the chief Justice.
Up to this time the course of my life had been smooth and happy. My little
warfare, with couzin Mariah and aunt Keezy had given zest to my existence
without in any degree affecting my tranquility. Dame Darwell did me
justice
in saying that I fondly returned her affection. I well knew the history of
my life from her lips; and many is the hour I have sat at her knee, and heard
her tell about my father and mothermysterious persons to my youthful
imagination
.
I felt all my obligations to her, and loved her not only from
gratitude
,
but for herself. I tried hard by close application to my books to make
her some return for her kindness: for I knew that every medal, every honor I
obtained would gladden her heart.
But there was now a change to pass over the hitherto unruffled surface of
my existence. I had at school become the rival both in Latin and love of the
only son of a physician of the town; a lad who prided himself on his father's
wealth and respectability, and who, thereupon, assumed a superiority over those
boys whose parents did not move in the same exclusive set with his. He was
a good scholar, and a youth of good deal of cleverness; and no doubt would
have been a favorite, but for his insufferable arrogancy. This feeling he did
not hestitate to show at any time, and on every occasion. If he was talking
with one whom he considered his equal, and I or any lad whom he did not
regard
as such should approach, he would immediately turn his back and walk
away. This conduct amused me and excited only pity. I did not seek his
acquaintance, however, and we seldom spoke. There chanced, at length, to
be an exhibition and a competition for Latin prizes. I feared only him and he
feared only me. We both struggled hard! I did my best, resolved to punish
him by getting the victory! I succeeded.
As I left the Academy a lovely little girl of eleven years came up to me
with a bright smile, and holding out a boquet. I knew her name to be Emma
Field, for I had often seen her pass on her way to a boarding school near,
though I had never spoken with her. Yet her sweet image had made a deep
impression upon me, and I never passed her without coloring deeper (young as
we both were) and without seeing her beautiful face all that day mingling like
sunshine with my Latin verbs. I had several times seen Russel Carryl join her
and walk with her, and felt a rising emotion of cordial antipathy to him for
that very circumstance. Emma Field came from Boston, and belonged, I was
told to one of the most wealthy and aristocratic families in that city, of wealth
and olden lineages.
As she approached me, I felt my face glow and expressed a mixed
sensation
of timidity and delight; for her eye was upon, and her smile was directed
towards me.
`Here, master Marlboro',' she said in a voice as musical as a robin
red-breast's
,
at the same time presenting me with the bunch of flowers; `here is a
boquet I gathered expressly for Russel Carryl, because I expected he would
gain the medal; and as I gathered it and brought it on purpose to present to
the victor, you and not he are the one entitled to it. Will you please accept it!'
This was spoken with such grace, such sweet propriety of manner, and the
flowers were proffered with so frank and gracious a mien that I was both
charmed and bewildered. I hardly knew where I was, and stuttering out some
clumsy reply and blushing up to the eyes, I received from her the boquet and
placed it in my vest.
`There, sir Russel Carryl,' she cried, laughing and turning towards this
personage whom she had passed by to reach me, and who saw the act: `I
gathered that beautiful bunch of flowers to bring to the exibition to give to
you, because you told me you were to be the victor; and only because I
expected
you to win the prize did I promise it to you. But as you have lost I
have bestowed it upon the winner.'
Thus speaking she bowed and laughed, nodded to me and bounded away to
join a group of her school-mates who with their governess had walked from the
Boarding school a mile distant to witness the exhibition. As soon as she had
turned away leaving my heart bounding wildly and full of sweet joy (for I then,
with school boys of the same age, felt the first delightful emotions of that
sensation
which a few years later I knew to be love) I could not help glancing
with a triumph in my looks I did not wish to conceal towards Russel Carryl.
He was glaring on me with a scowl of hatred and defiance. No sooner did he
catch the exulting expression of my eye, than he came up to me, and said in
an imperious tone,
`Give me that boquet, sirrah?'
`It is mine,' I answered with a smile. `If you wish it you will have to take
it from me, for I shall not resign it.'
He clenched his fist and cried,
`Give it to me or I will knock you down.'
I knew him to be as courageous as he was proud and vain, and that he would
not hesitate to make the effort to do what he threatened. He was a year older
but no taller than I. I had never tried my strength or skill with him, but I felt
all at once a disposition to do so.
`I shall not take a blow from you,' I answered very positively.
He looked steadily in my face a moment, and then with a sudden movement
of his hand snatched the boquet from my vest. I instantly struck him a blow
in the left temple and he reeled. But he recovered himself enough to dash
the bunch of flowers to the earth and grind them into the ground with his heel.
This act called forth all my indignation. I attacked him with well directed
blows, which he met with courage and returned with no little skill. For at
least ten minutes we fought there on the green surrounded by a ring of boys.
and both excited by as determined a spirit of rivalry in love as ever inspired
the breasts of two rival knights' errant. It was a drawn battle, for seeing the
Preceptor and one of the tutors coming we ceased. Seeing that the battle had
torminated the teachers passed on their way without approaching nearer.
Russel
Carryl picked up his hat and was instantly surrounded by a party of his
fellow `aristocrats' who were loud in their expressions of resentment against
me: for he had a black eye and was bleeding freely at the nose, while I had
not received a single mark.
I was also surrounded by a party of my friends who were rejoicing in my
success.
`I wouldn't have fought with such a low fellow,' said one of the aristocratic
consolers to my wounded antagonist.
`He is only a tavern keeper's boy,' said another.
`I wouldn't have fought with the bastard,' said Russel Carryl! `But the
fellow dared to carry in his bosom the flowers she had given him.'
Had I heard aright? All the blood in my heart rushed to my brain! I
walked firmly up to him and fixing my eyes upon his, I said
`What term was that you applied to me, Russel Carryl?'
He hesitated a moment and then answered boldly
`I said that you were a bastard!'
My hand was clenched to strike him to the ground. But suddenly the
mystery
hanging around my birth rushed full upon my mind! My fears seemed
painfully to whisper that he might have spoken the truth. My clenched hand
relaxed. I felt my bosom bursting with my feelings. I made no answer. I
opened not my pale and trembling lips; but turning away I walked homeward
at a rapid step, which under the increasing excitement of my wounded and
insulted
feelings, soon increased into a run. I had gone but a few steps before
they began shouting after me and calling me boldly by that epithet of infamy,
and even some of the boys of my own party I heard taking up the cry. Such
is human nature whether manifesting itself in the boy of twelve or the man of
mature years. On reaching the Inn which had been the only home I had ever
known, I threw myself into the arms of Dame Darwell weeping as if my heart
would burst and poured into her maternal ears the bitterness of my young
soul. She was indignant, and vented her anger in no measured words; and
did all she could to soothe me, by assuring me that she was as certain that my
father and mother, whoever they were, were as much husband and wife, as she
and George Darwell had been! I listened to her reasons for believing this and
became calmer. But I firmly refused to go back to that school again. This
weakness the kind woman indulged me in, and in a few days afterwards sent
me into Boston to the Latin School in School street, with the arrangement that
I should come out every Saturday and return every Monday.
CHAPTER VII.
The green silk purseI enter at HarvardMy meeting with Russel Carryl
The effect of my menaceA sudden change in the bearing of my classmates
Henry Seaford calls on meMy determinationThe midshipman's
warrant
arrives
.
I remained
at the Latin School two years, during which time I was fitted
for the Sophomore class at Cambridge. I had left behind me in the village the
mystery touching my birth, and the name of `Little Marlboro';' passing for the
son of Dame Darwell, under the name of Marlboro' Darwell. By this name I
was now known. Yet not a day passed while I was at the Latin School that I
did not labor under a nervous apprehension that the skcret should be discovered,
and that the epithet I had heard applied to me by Russel Carryl would be
repeated
.
But during the two years I was known only as Marlboro' Darwell, and
not even suspected of being other than the son of Mrs. Darwell. At length,
as I have said, I was fitted for the university and returned to the Inn and to my
more than mother. Noble woman! how my heart fills while I speak of thee
and recall thy goodness to me! During the two years I was at the Latin
School she liberally supplied me with money, a liberality I never abused; and
clothed me very handsomely. Twice during those two years I had met Emma
Field. The first time was in Washington street, directly opposite the Old
South. I was going to school with my green sachel over my sboulders, as she
was tripping along with a little green silk purse in her hand. She knew me
as quickly as I recognized her and smiled, and stopped. I myself was passing
by, blushing, for I would not have been so bold as to have spoken to her
first
for the world.
`So you've come to Boston to school, Master Marlboro'?' she said in a voice
whoes sweet tones I have never forgotten.
`Yes,' I stammered out confusedly.
`I am sorry my little bunch of roses should have caused such a battle
between
that quick Russel Carryl and you. I heard of it; he told me all about
it, and how he tore the bouqet from you and trampled on it. I was very angry
with him, and told him I was; and said it was a very ungentlemanly act. We
are not friends now on account of it! Will you take this little green purse
instead
of the bouquet. I netted it myself. There is no money in it, for I have
just spent my last penny, but I know you will value it, you fought so bravely
for the bouquet!'
This was spoken with a
naivette
I am unable to describe. Her manner was
frank, friendly, and more like that of a sister or a cousin than a stranger whom
I had never spoken to but once before. I took the purse and thanked her with
a flow of glowing words, not one of which can I now remember. Indeed I
could not have told five minutes afterwards what I said. I only recollect that
she smiled, bowed, and the next moment was tripping away. I was only
recalled
to consciousness by one of my classmates asking me `if I had found a
purse?' I hastily thrust it into my pocket and making some embarrassed
answer
,
joined him and went toward the school.
The second time I met her was full a year afterwards and only a few days
before I was to return home. I was passing down Beacon street and saw her
at a window. She recognized me, waved her hand, bowed, smiled, and then
disappeared. My heart fluttered for twenty four hours afterwards, and her
image
was constantly present to my mind. I saw that she had grown taller and
more lovely, if possible, for she was now full fourteen. I being now in my
fifteenth year. The evening before I was to quit Boston I walked down and
up Beacon street several times, in the hope of once more seeing her at the
window
;
but in vain. I was forced to leave town without obtaining sight of
her.
On reaching the Inn, and there talking over with the good Dame Darwell my
future plans, she told me it was her wish that I should enter at Harvard and
after that become a lawyer; for the worthy hostess had a great reverence for
legal gentlemen, and considered a Judge the greatest personage on earth next
to a King. I had, however, no fancy for the law; though I had no objection
to the collegiate course, for I had a passion for study. My prepossessions were
exclusively for the sea, and to enter the navy was my ambition. This, I knew
Dame Darwell was not ignorant of; and I, therefore, did not hesitate to
mention
it now. She answered by speaking of the honors and emoluments that the
bar would give me, and by commenting upon the perils of the sea.
`I want you, my son,' as she always called me, `I want you to be a
respectable
and an honored man. I have money enough to pay your way handsomely
to the law, and it will give me a pleasure to spend the last cent I have for your
benefit. But, I also want to have you happy. Now if you prefer the sea why
I won't oppose it, especially if your heart is set on it. I would rather have you
here, where I can see you every week, for you know you are the same to me
as my son, and are all my dependence. But then, dear boy, I don't want to
have you do what you have no liking for. I would rather make a sacrifice
myself
than you should be disappointed when you've set your heart.'
Thus did the good lady discourse with me upon the subject; and as I had
certainly a dislike to the law, and a decided partiality for the sea, we
compromised
matters, by my promising that I would pass through college, and then, if
I could overcome my prejudice against the law, I would study it; if not, I
would go into the navy if I could get a midshipman's warrant. This, she said,
she knew could be easily obtained by her influence with Judge , the
Senator
,
who had for twenty years in traveling, put up at her house. On leaving
College I should be but eighteen, full young enough for a middy, and with the
advantage of a superior education. Secretly I resolved I would enter the navy
when I graduated, for I felt I could never overcome my repugnance to the bar.
This matter being amicably adjusted I was in due time admitted to the
Sophomore
class at Cambridge. I passed my examination with honor, and saw,
with gratification, that I had made a favorable impression upon the examining
professors. Dame Darwell had my chambers furnished in a very handsome
manner, and in point of dress and personal comfort, I was not inferior to the
wealthiest in College. I had returned home after my examination, to pass the
time before the term commenced, when I punctually made my appearance at
Harvard and reported myself. As I was descending the stairs of my tutor's
room, I encountered a fashionably dressed youth ascending. Our eyes met,
and there was an instantaneous recognition. It was Russel Carryl! We had
not crossed each other's paths since the affair of the boquet, nearly three years
before. I met his glance tranquilly but firmly. His eyes flashed hatred and
defiance. He was passing me with a haughty air, when I impulsively caught
his arm and held him. The sight if him there filled me with an instant
consciousness
that he would endeavor to cast a cloud of infamy, if in his power,
around my way through College. I shrunk at the idea. I was sensitive on
the point of my mysterious infancy: and recoiled at the thought of being branded
with the epithet he had once before used in connection with my name.
`Russel Carryl, I have a word to say to you,' I said in a deep tone.
The halls were deserted as were all of the rooms on that floor, none of the
occupants
having yet returned from their vacation. I did not fear interruption or
of being overheard.
`What do you mean?' he asked, turning pale.
`I mean this, sir,' I replied resolutely. `You once applied an epithet to me,
which I did not resent. I have not forgotten it. Dare, while in the university
to breathe it to a human ear, or hint it and I swear that I will take your
cowardly
life. I will seek you out till I avenge myself. I am here a student and mean
to remain here. If you whisper aught that shall bring infamy upon my name
that hour you have to die. My character is as dear to me as life can be to you.
I balance one against the other! Now remember, sir, if the story get abroad, I
shall hold you accountablefor it will assuredly come from you.'
Thus speaking I released him and descended the stairs and sought my
chamber
,
which I paced to and fro for many hours, trembling lest the disgraceful
term I had once had applied to me should follow me to the walls of the
University
.
I hoped, however, much from the bold and determined position I had in
the outset assumed with reference to the only enemy I had, who had the will
and the power to injure me. I knew that Carryl would have got a story
circulating
at once if I had not threatened him, and that he could now do no more;
and I had a pretty strong confidence in having intimidated him. The result
showed that I was not in error. He remained in College two years, during
which time, though we daily met, we never spoke; and during this period I
had no reason, from the manner of the students towards me, to suspect they had
ever heard the disgraceful term I so dreaded coupled with my name. But after
two year's residence in College, Russel Carryl was expelled for a gross
misdemeanor
,
and soon after went to New Orleans. He had not been absent but a
few weeks before I discovered a marked change in the conduct and bearing of
many of the students with whom I had been on terms of intimacy. Some of them
openly avoided me, and others coldly acknowledged my salute. Sensitive and
alive to suspicions touching the point nearest my feelings, I began to suspect
that my name at last had got to be coupled with an infamous epithet! My
suspicions
were at length confirmed (for I was getting feverish and in constant
mental agony under the insulting bearing of my class mates, who did not
hesitate
openly to shun me) by seeing after coming from recitation, the word `
Bastard
,'
written in chalk, upon my door.
It would be impossible for me to express my feelings on seeing this fearful
word! It at once explained all the cold looks, and open insults, the scornful
laughs and jeering gestures I had been for some days the subject of! I entered
my room and locked the door. I threw myself into a chair but instantly rose,
for my brain was on fire and I could not be tranquil! For a little while I was
perfectly insane under the rush of emotions that overwhelmed me! All that I
had feared had at last come upon me! and at a time too when I was winning
golden honors in the very front of my class. In a few months longer I was to
graduate, and common fame had already awarded to me the highest honor. All
these high hopes were at once crushed.
I at length became calmer and was able to reason and reflect upon what had
happened. I felt that the degrading light in which I was now regarded was
owing to no act of mine! I felt the proud consciousness of innocence. But this
was not enough to sustain me against the prejudices and malice of those with
whom I was daily thrown into contact. I knew that I was looked upon as a
degraded thing; and that from that day, if I remained in college, my path
would be a solitary one! I should be the mark for the finger of scorn and
buffoonery
,
and shunned and despised. The thought was madness. I could not
endure it for an instant. My proud spirit rebelled and my wounded heart
shrunk at this contemplation.
`No,' said I, `my course is decided. I leave College this very hour never
more to return. I will fly from the ignominy that surrounds my name.'
I had one friend in College whom I greatly esteemed for the purity of his
heart and the strong wisdom of his cultivated mind. He was the son of a
country clergyman, and a beneficiary. We were intimate, and he was the only
person I had ever made the confidant of the mystery which surrounded my
infancy
.
This knowledge endeared me to him still more; and he truly loved
me. He had few associates, for he was poor and a charity student. This led
me first to notice him, and to seek his acquaintance. His name was Henry
Seaford. While I was uttering my determination he knocked at the door. I
knew his knock and opened it to him. He entered and sat down. I saw he
was deeply moved.
`You have seen what is written on my door?' I almost sternly demanded.
`Yes, Marlboro'. It was a cruel and unfeeling act. I heard you walking
over-head (his room was under mine) and knew something had greatly agitated
yon. I came up to see, half suspecting the cause, when I saw the writing on
your door. The infamous thing has been whispered about some days, but I
only learned it this morning!'
`I have felt a change in the manner of many towards me for the week past
and suspected the cause,' I said bitterly. `I thank the hand that wrote that on the
door, it has relieved my mind and led me to adopt a course of action. I leave
Cambridge this evening.'
My friend would have dissuaded me from this step, but finally yielded to my
mode of reasoning and acknowledged I could not remain and be happy. He then
told me that the report had been started by means of Russel Carryl who, before
sailing from Boston, had written a note to one of the class, stating that he well
knew me a boy at school and that I was there well known as the illegitimate
son of Mrs. Darwell who kept the Silver Bottle Inn. On hearing this I could
hardly restrain indignant tears. I forgot myself in the injury thus done that
noble hearted woman! Seaford sympathised with me fully, but could afford
me no consolation. I could neither prove my birth nor disprove the charge,
and I resolved at once to leava. I presented Seaford with all my books,
furniture
and bedding, embraced him warmly and took the stage that very evening
for home, leaving a note with Seaford to give to the President, in which I briefly
stated that circumstances had rendered it necessary for me to take up my
connections
with the College.
That night I mingled my griefs and angry feelings with the gentle words of
comfort and hope with which the good Dame Darwell strove to heal my
wounded
spirit.
The next day application was made by the benevolent woman to Judge ,
in my behalf. He at once wrote on to Washington; and after waiting but three
months I was so fortunate as to receive an appointment accompanied with an
order to join the sloop of war Lexington at Norfolk.
CHAPTER VIII.
Prepare to join my shipThe conspiracy of Cousin Mariah against the Parson
Its successMy departureA cruiseI pass my examination as Passed
MidshipmanThe supperThe insult and my resentment
.
When
the hour came for my departure to join my ship, my heart was
oppressed
with sadness and regret at the idea of parting with that noble hearted
woman, who had been to me more than a mother. To her the prospect of
parting
with me for a period, perhaps, of three years, was an event of the deepest
sorrow. Yet she felt that it was best for me to depart; that it was necessary I
should go forth into the world; and that on board ship I should be secure from
the fears which had harrassed me touching the ignominy which had been
charged
upon my birth. For my sake she tried to suppress her overwhelming
emotion
,
and to assume a degree of cheerfulness she was far from feeling.
Dame Darwell at this time was just past her forty-seventh year, and still
retained
traces of that rustic beauty which had captivated the heart of George
Darwell. Her eye was still dark and lively, her smile full of sweetness and her
step light and bouyant, though she had got to be something fleshy. Her
attachment
and devotion to me seemed to increase with her years and my difficulties,
and in parting with her I felt I was about to rend myself.
Aunt Keezy, who was now a thin, prim, spectacled old lady of sixty-one,
having thus far in vain tried to outlive the good dame, professed a great deal of
hypocritical sorrow for my departure: though I well knew in her withered old
heart she was praying I might never return to rob her of Dame Darwell's loaves
and fishes which she was clinging to life with the hope yet to enjoy. Cousin
Mariah was not at home now. This discreet maiden seeing that Dame Darwell
grew each year more hale and hearty and that I had escaped the croup, scarlet
fever, rash, meazles and mumps, and promised to live out my full years,
resolved
to commit matrimony. For this purpose she set her cap for the minister, a
slovenly bachelor who had succeeded the Rev. Dr. who had officiated at my
baptism. The minister came to the Silver Bottle to board, and this
circumstance
inspired cousin Mariah with the idea of laying seige to his heart. The
lady in question was about nine and thirty, tall and slender, straight and thin,
innocent of bust and bustle. She had sandy brown hair, which she always
wore in two bunches of frizzled curls on each temple. Her ears were very
large and cartiliginous; her eyes pale blue; her nose inclined to turn up, and
the corners of her mouth down. She was remarkably plain altogether, with a
visage that seldom relaxed with a smile, but on the contrary expressed habitual
discontent. Such were the beseiging forces that were contemplating an assault
upon the solitary stronghold of celibacy within which Parson Buckhorn had
entrenched
himself. The parson was about forty-four, six feet one inch high,
loosely jointed and hugely ungainly. He wore sheep skin slippers and a
tattered
morning gown, spectacles, and a short pipe; for the latter was so
constanly
in his mouth it may be reckoned among his attire.
Cousin Mariah began by a series of little attentions. She darned his hose
she starched his cravats; she burnt out his pipe; she patched his gown, she
kneed his pantaloons and elbowed his coat; she brought him hot water to shave
and brushed his hat and surtout. In a word the designing maiden managed to
make herself so useful to him that he was dependent on her for every thing.
Dame Darwell saw the game and winked at it; for she was nothing loth that
the minister should take her off her hands; for couzin Maria was not the
pleasantest
tempered person to live with in the world. After she had got the good
man as dependent upon her as a child, she suddenly took it into her head to
make a visit of a few days to a distant relation. This was her
coup de main
The poor minister was utterly lost. He had no one to darn his hose, to starch
his cravat, to fill his pipe, to knee his trousers and elbow his coat, to get hot
water for him to shave with, and brush his hat! He was completely lost. She
had well played her part.
`Good Mistress Darwell, when is your couzin to return?' said the poor
ensnared
Minister the second morning after her departure.
`She may be gone three or four weeks, perhaps longer. I should'nt wonder
if she should get a husband there and stay away altogether!' said Dame
Darwell
mischievously.
`Impossible! It can't he!' said the good man; and then he filled his pipe
and tried to console himself smoking. But it would not do. He became
restless
and impatient; lost his appetite; forgot his sermons, and altogether
showed
the symptoms of a bachelor bewitched. Seeing affairs in this condition the
good Dame thought it best to send for cousin Mariah, whom, as I have said, she
was secretly favoring and encouraging in her hymenial conspiracy. On the
fifth day cousin Mariah returned, and, to make an end of my story, in ten days
afterwards they were published, and in due time married, greatly to the joy of
the good dame. It was not a part of my foster mother to let cousin Mariah live
with her now she was married; and so giving her a handsome wedding present
of fifteen hundred dollars, she assisted them in going to housekeeping; and at
the time of my departure they were living in a comfortable dwelling at the
other end of the town. Cousin Mariah had now been six years a wife but not
a mother.
As the stage came up to the door to take me from the roof which had been all
my life my maternal home, the minister and cousin Mariah appeared to bid me
farewell. The good man gave me good council and his blessing, and cousin
Mariah said she hoped I would do credit to her and her cousin and all the
relations
,
considering `as I had no relation to do credit to!' I was in no mood at
such a moment to resent her malicious reflections upon my unfortunate
infancy
,
being too much oppressed by the open grief and fast flowing tears of my
beloved
foster mother Closely she pressed me to her benevolent heart, prayed
Heaven to protect me and in safety return me to her arms.
The coachman had secured my baggage and got upon his box. I embraced
her tenderly and sprung into the coach. The next moment I was borne
rapidly
away from the home of my childhood, from the only true friend I could trust
on earth, and fairly launched on the wide world of action, trials and struggles.
I was now eighteen, tall and well formed, and as dear Dame Darwell used to
say, `with fine hazel eyes and rich brown hair; a handsome nose and mouth
with a complexion inclined to brunette.' The change of scenery soon divested
my mind in a measure from the burden of parting sorrow, and I became more
tranquil and capable of reflection.
I felt I was now truly alone in the world! I did not know that a kindred
drop of blood flowed in the veins of any human being. I could call no one
father, mother, sister, brother, or cousin or kindred. I knew not even my name.
These reflections came full upon my mind and I gave the rein to the ideas and
emotions they suggested. From my boyhood, from the time that I had first
heard from the lips of Russel Carryl the approprious epithet of `Bastard'
applied
to me, I had felt a feverish, restless, growing desire to learn who my
parents
were! I panted to unfold the mysteryto learn the
truth!
This ever
living desire mingled even in my dreams; and many and many a nigh
t
have I
dreamed I saw my mother and father!she pale and beautiful, weeping and
clad in deep mourning; he tall, noble in person and with a countenance bold
yet pleasing. But I knew these were only the vision of memory recalling in
sleep the descriptions of good Dame Darwell. But once, and the very night I
left Cambridge, I had a dream that made a deep impression upon my mind, and
which yet gives a complexion to the future whenever I look forward to it. I
fell asleep dwelling painfully upon my disgrace, and the curse of man that
seemed
destined to follow me, and cast a cloud over all the brightest prospects of my
life. I dreamed that I was standing in front of a stately gateway over which
was an escutchcon on which was an eagle trampling upon a serpent. I stood
gazing upon it, I remember, trying to recall where I had seen it before. While
doing so a man dressed in black came to the gate and invited me with great
respect
and reverence in his manner to enter, at the same time holding open the
gate with one hand. I passed in and found myself in an avenue lined with noble
trees of great antiquity. It led to a beautiful edifice that seemed to me to be a
palace. This man preceded me and ushered me up the steps of the magnificent
portico into a hall of great size and beauty.
On the wall at the extremity I saw a bas relief in green marble of an eagle
with his claw upon the head of a serpent. While I was looking at it and
wondering
,
and trying to recall what connection that eagle and serpent had with
something which seemed to weigh upon my memory, but which I could not
recall
,
a double door was thrown open beneath the marble escutcheon, and two
ushers coming forth, bowed to me, and then pointed forward through the door.
I advanced and entered a circular apartment of great splendor. It was hung
with tapestry worked in gold thread. At its extremity on a sumptuous couch
reclined a female form. By her side kneeled a tall man. I approached them.
The female was dead. He was gazing with tears upon her cold features. She
was about forty with a profile of exquisite beauty and heavenly expression still
resting upon her mouth. I involuntarily knelt on the opposite side of the couch.
The gentleman, who was a noble looking man of about fifty, looked up and
gazing
on me tenderly, and without any surprise said,
`You have come too late, my son! The spirit has just flown!'
`I gazed upon her! I knew that it was my mother, and casting myself upon
the body I wept.
I awoke! My cheeks were bathed in tears; and a sadness lay heavily at my
heart. The dream made a deep and singular impression upon me! It has given
a tinge of melancholy to all my thoughts of my parents, while it has led me to
believe that I shall never again behold them living; that I shall go down to the
grave without ever knowing to whom I owe my being.
I reached Norfolk in time to join my ship. In a few days we put to sea, and
I entered with zeal and alacrity upon my duties. Our destination was the
Mediterranean. After cruising in those agreeable latitudes for a few months, I
joined the North Carolina, 74, and after a cruise of three years, returned to the
United States. I did not delay an hour in New York, but at once hastened to
my foster-mother, who had regularly written to me, and whom I now found
perfectly well, and now that I had returned, perfectly happy. Aunt Keezy
met me with a warm welcome, but couzin Mariah looked as if she were sorry I
was not safe in the bottom of the sea. This feeling doubtless had its origin in
the fact of her having presented the good parson a little pug-nosed baby boy,
whom she had christened George Darwell and in whose way she felt I stood.
I had now acquired a good knowledge of seamanship and was so fortunate as
to be ordered to Philadelphia to prepare for examination. While there I
devoted
myself wholly to study and passed the ordeal midshipmen so much dread
not only without difficulty but with flattering commendations from the Board
of Examiners. Up to this time from the hour of my entering the navy
nothing
had transpired that could lead me to believe that the mystery of my birth
was know to my fellow officers. But the evening of the day on which I passed
my examination showed me that I had not been forgotten by my implacable
enemy Russel Carryl. The `Passed' Midshipmen partook of a supper. I was
of the party. There was also present a midshipman who for some reason or
other had taken a dislike to me. He had
passed
with difficulty and I had
answered
invariably every question to which he had failed. This irritated him, I
saw at the time. At the supper, observing he looked at me from time to time
with a clouded brow, I felt a disposition to conciliate him, and said pleasantly,
`Frank, I will take wine with you!'
`I drink wine only with gentlemen,' he answered in a haughty and most
insulting
tone.
I was thunderstruck. Every eye was turned upon us! In reply I threw my
wine into his face and sent the glass after it. Every man sprang to his feet.
My antagonist drew his dirk and leaped across the table. He was seized and
disarmed. I did not draw. A terrible feeling rushed upon me. It was the
idea that his insulting words had some connection with a knowledge of the
mystery hanging around my infancy! I was rendered almost insensible at the
thought. The excitement was very great among the young men. All
condemned
him and acquitted me; while they demanded of him his reason for
using such language.
`He is no gentleman, I repeat,' was the answer of the incensed young
midshipman
.
`You must prove this or fight him,' said one.
There was a loud murmur of surprise and every eye rested full on me. I
stood silent and pale as death. I felt that the curse of my destiny had followed
me. I did not speakfor I could not! my limbs and tongue were paralysed!
The cold sweat stood in large drops upon my forehead My emotion was
witnessed by all. It confirmed my degradation.
`You see he does not deny it,' said the midshipman with scornful exultation.
`I happened to be a school-fellow of Russel Carryl, a young fellow now in New
Orleans, and to day I got a letter from him, in which he states that he knew
Darwell when a boy, and that he was then notoriously known to be the
illegitimate
son of a woman Darwell who kept an Inn. He says he wrote to me,
seeing
by the papers that I was here a candidate for `passing' and Darwell's name
also; and supposing this
gentleman
might possibly try to cultivate the intimacy
of respectable people he put me on my guard.'
On hearing this there was a general burst of indignation. Every eye was
fixed upon me with menace.
`Infamous,' said one.
`Degrading to the navy,' cried a second.
`He deserves to be broke for his audacity in getting into the service,' cried
another.
`Can this tale possibly be true?' asked a fine young officer approaching me
with a look of surprise and sympathy.
`It is false,' I cried, instantly aroused and my whole spirit kindled. `He who
asserts it is a liar and a ruffian.'
`I assert it,' retorted my antagonist.
`Then are you a liar and a ruffian,' I answered calmly but firmly. The
young man became pale as marble.
`You must fight him,' said several, `you cannot pass this by.'
`I will not fight a degraded fellow like this.'
`Then defend yourself, coward,' I cried, advancing upon him with my
dagger
,
for I was beside myself with anger.
A circle was opened for us and for several moments we fought with our dirks,
giving and receiving wounds. At length he fell! I felt my arm firmly taken
by the friendly midshipman and his voice in my ear, said,
`Fly! You have slain him.'
CHAPTER IX.
My determination taken to leave the NavySunshine amid the gloomMy
resolution
formed to devote myself to one purposeI return homeMy plans and
intentions communicated to Dame DarwellI prepare to enter upon my several
duties
.
The
wounds were not mortal which I had inflicted on my antagonist. In a
few days he was out of danger and the intelligence of this fact relieved my
mind from a great weight. It is true I had been greatly provoked, but this
would never have excused me to my own conscience if he had died. Besides,
I could not but reflect in my calmer moments that what he had said
might
be
true. Indeed the idea began to take such hold upon my mind that I became
wretched and filled with gloomy despair and borne down by a painful sense of
degradation.
I had left the coffee house in company with the friendly midshipman and
gone to his rooms to remain until I should learn the issue of my rencontre. He
learned from me my whole story, and comforted me greatly with the confident
assurance of his belief that I was honorably born. My affair with Frank
had occurred among us midshipmen alone and did not reach the Department, as
it was kept as secret as possible by those who had witnessed it, lest all should
suffer. I did not fear a court martial, therefore; yet I resolved at once to
resign
my berth in the navy. I felt that I could no longer remain in it without
experiencing daily insult and a sense of infamy. I felt that the word of
disgrace
had been spoken and would fly from lip to lip. I therefore resolved to
quit the service; and at the same time I made up my mind to enter upon no
other pursuit, to devote myself to no other profession, but to give myself up,
from that moment, to endeavor to ascertain my parentage. I felt until I could
establish my birth I was, in whatever career I might enter upon, a banned man
an object for the finger of contempt and scorn! In the secret chambers of my
soul I solemnly formed the resolution to give myself no repose until I should
unravel this mystery! To this pursuit I sacredly dedicated myself and all my
energies!
I was seated at the window of my friend's apartment on the third day after
the rencontre, when I came to the resolution. The hour before he had brought
to me the gratifying intelligence that the wounded young man was considered
in no danger. I had been wounded also both in the left hand and in the breast,
but slightly, however, and suffered no inconvenience therefrom save the
necessity
of wearing the arm in a sling.
Having formed my secret determination I penned a brief letter to the
Secretary
of the Navy tendering my resignation, and then with a certain feeling
of freedom and hope I resumed my seat at the window. I had hardly done so
when I saw two young ladies walking by on the opposite side of the street.
As they passed, one of them turned her face and, I know not by what accident,
glanced up at my window. My heart ceased to beat! I recognised the
beautiful
features of Emma Field! She evidently recognised me, for she half
arrested
her steps, and a glow of surprise and pleasure flushed her lovely
countenance
.
I instinctively touched my lips and waved a salutation. She veiled
her face and hastened on, and I was overwhelmed with pain at the idea that my
audacity had offended her. But with the regret was mingled an emotion of the
deepest joy that I had once more seen her who lighting from time to time crossed
my heart's dreary way. The last time I had seen her I have not recorded. It
was the year before in Summer street, in Boston. I was passing down and
noticed
a carriage finely appointed driving up. At the window I beheld Emma
Field. She smiled, bowed and waved her fair hand. Before I could recover
from my surprise the handsome equipage had rolled onward, and I had the
satisfaction
of feeling that I must have looked very stupid not even to have had
self-possession to return her gracious salute. She was then about seventeen,
and beautiful exceedingly. I saw her no more until I beheld her passing my
window on Walnut street. A year had, if possible, added to her loveliness.
Every charm that woman possesses seemed to have become her rich
inheritance
.
It was but a transient glance, but I saw that she was surpassing fair.
Her figure was just tall enough to be graceful, and she walked with the step of
a sylph tripping over beds of flowers. After she had gone by a shadow seemed
to have fallen upon the street. It soon cast a gloom over my soul. The thought
of this charming girl whose form had mingled with all the happy day dreams of
my boy-hood and maturer youth, deepened my bitterness of heart! The idea
that I was degraded and outcast, and forever, perhaps, destined to approach no
nearer the idol of my adoration, filled me with grief and anguish inexpressible.
I rose and paced my chamber, and felt like cursing my destiny! I was tempted
to utter execrations upon the parents who could thus cast upon an unfeeling
world their offspring! But I restrained the utterance of these feelings; for,
ever had I cherished a tender and superstitious reverence for those unknown
parents! But the more I compared my present degraded position with that far
removed from me, of the beautiful creature who had just appeared before me
like an angel of light and with whom forever to unite my destiny I felt would
be the highest happiness I should on earth aspire to, the more deeply and
painfully
I realised my unhappy condition. But instead of giving myself up to
despair
I was strengthened in the purpose I had just formed; for in addition to
the incentive held out by the discovery of my birth, in itself, was the sight of
the bright star of love in the distance guiding me to success!
From this hour I was changed in feeling and character. A new spirit seemed
to take possession of my being. Instead of being broken and despairing I was
buoyant with hope. Love had renewed me and given me courage. I felt
inspired
by her idea, and resolved that I would win her or perish.
But what step was I first to take? My success depended on the proof of my
honorable birth, without establishing which I felt I was bound to consider
myself
,
as all men regarded me, degraded. This proof I was not to make to her,
or for her satisfaction, for she was yet ignorant of my passion. It was to be
made to the worldto those who had ejected me from their companionship! It
was to re-establish me among honorable men, from which position alone, could
I dare regard her. Love then, as well as a feverish desire to ascertain my
parentage
and an honest ambition to assume my proper station in society, was the
motive for entering upon my task; a task that seemed hopeless, if I for a
moment
began to reason upon it and weigh the difficulties and enumerate the
chances against me. But love was strong; and hope lighting her torch at the
fires of her altar went forward confidently in the search.
After a while deliberating upon the course I should first adopt, my heart
instinctively
turned towards her, in whose affection and truth I could trust, and
who had always been my guide, my friend, my judicious counsellor. Need I
name my good foster-mother? I felt the need of a friend and adviser, and
resolved
at once to proceed home and lay before her all my plans. The next day
I left Philadelphia, but not before I had contrived to ascertain that the
charming
girl whose image was enshrined in my heart, was at a fashionable school in
the city and living with an aunt. I did not meet her again before leaving town
though tempted to call upon her. But the consciousness of my equivocal
position
in society led me to reject the thought and to resolve manfully never to see
her until I could do so without any ignominy upon my name.
The reader who has kindly condescended to follow me thus far in my
narrative
,
will have seen that my present unhappy condition was no fault of my own.
That I was degraded without having committed a single error or wrong against
society. This consciousness while it naturally sustained me during my
persecutions
,
served also to render me impatient under them. I could not help
feeling
that I was sacrificed for another's act, and that I was ill-treated by my
fellow-men
!
Yet I could not prove that I was
not
what I had been represented;
which, if I could or should yet prove, would degrade me as much in my own
eyes as I was in theirs. My situation was in every respect a painful one; and
as I was both high spirited and sensitive, it was a source of the deepest anguish
to me. Peace no more, I felt, could be enjoyed by me, unless I could have in
my hands the disproval of the charge brought against my birth. This proof I
resolved to obtain.
In three days after leaving Philadelphia I reached `The Silver Bottle' Inn.
My foster-mother met me with a cordial affection and sincerity that drew tears
of gratitude from my eyes. She had heard of my having successfully passed
my examination, as I wrote to her the same day. Pride, therefore, mingled
with her love for me and her pleasure at my return. I was not unexpected, as
I told her I should visit her as soon as I had `passed.' Her quick eye of
motherly
affection at once detected a sadness in my air and tones as I replied to her
numerous inquiries touching my health.
`Something unpleasant has happened, son,' she said in a tone of anxious
solicitude
after we were seated alone in her little parlour. `Don't keep any thing
from me, but tell me all, dear.'
`I will conceal nothing from you, my more than mother,' I answered; and
then related to her the events that are already known to the reader.
She wept and tenderly embraced me when I had ended. `Do not mind it,
Marlboro,' she said warmly; `your birth will one day be established and you
will put all your enemies to shame. Mark my words! Don't let it trouble you.
This is a cold-hearted world and people do act strangely, as if you yourself were
not just the same whether your mother was wedded or not wedded. I am so
vexed that this should come upon you so and make you unhappy. Cheer up,
and the clouds will give way to sunshine. Now you will stay at home with
me. You shan't go any where else to be wounded in your feelings and have
your happiness broken up this way. You shall now be with me, Marlboro',
and I dare say you will be more contented here than among men.'
`I desire no happier homeno pleasanter condition than this, dear mother.'
I answered overcome by her kindness. `In truth, I have no disposition to go
into society. It has spurned me and I shall not at present court it.'
`Here you shall have what you want. I am worth full twenty thousand
dollars
and when I die it is to be all your own, except a legacy for poor aunt
Keezy, if she should outlive me, and a small annuity for couzin Mariah, if she
should ever become a widow. You shall have all, my son. And if it is too
lonely here for you and you want to live in Boston, I will go there and live
with you.'
`You are all goodness, noble and excellent woman, my more than mother,' I
answered; `I only regret that circumstances which have been beyond my
controul have prevented my continuance in a career in which I trust your
heart would delight to follow me with its approval. It is my intention to remain
at home a few days till I am in little better spirits and then enter upon a duty
which I have solemnly imposed upon myself.'
`What duty, son?' asked my foster-mother with surprise and anxiety.
`To endeavor to ascertain who are my parents. You start and look with
doubt and compassion upon me. I feel that there are great difficulties in the
way; but my desire to disprove the ignominious epithet men now attach to my
name, will give me a spirit more than human to prosecute this search. I have
come to see you and talk with you upon the subject. The idea has long been in
my thoughts, but the purpose is now indelibly fixed in my soul.'
When I had ended she shed a few tears, which she said were caused by the
thought that I might possibly find my parents and then forget her. But on my
assuring her that if my mother then stood before me, my
heart
would only
acknowledge
her
as my mother, she was tranquilized; and in a few minutes
afterwards
she entered with kind readiness into all my views and wishes. I caused
her to repeat once more to me all she knew of my history; to describe the
carriage
and horses; the gentleman and lady; the year and day they came and
every thing that had any connection with their appearance. The substance of
which was, and my only ground to start from, that in a pleasant June afternoon,
1822, a yellow barouche drawn by a pair of dark bay horses drove up to the Inn
door. A gentleman and lady both attired in deep mourning alighted and
followed
by their black coachman bearing a large traveling basket entered the
house and were shown to the `Court Chamber.' The gentleman wore a black
cloak, was tall and of fine appearance, with dark eyes and hair and about
eight-and-twenty
.
The lady was not above two-and-twenty, graceful in person, with
a face very lovely but pale and sorrowful. That he at first said they should
remain
all night, but after ten ordered the carriage and departed as the moon rose,
taking the turnpike to Boston. The door of the carriage and the blinder of the
horses were ornamented with an eagle trampling upon a serpentprobably a
Crest. Several hours after the carriage had departed the hostess hearing the
cry of an infant followed the direction and entering the `Court Chamber'
discovered
lying in the bed a male infant about seven months old. In his hand
he grasped a silver nursing bottle, on which was the same device of an eagle
treading upon a serpent, which had been upon the carriage and harness.
Beneath
the crest was a cypherthe single letter `M.' This initial with two
others preceding it (F. R. M.) were upon the brass plate of a trunk behind the
carriage. With the infant was left a note and bundle. This note, written in a
delicate, though trembling hand, gave no clue to the mystery, save to confirm
the first suspicion of the child's having been left by the gentleman and lady who
had occupied the room.
Such was the testimony and ground which I had to start upon in my resolute
purpose to clear up the mystery enveloping my birth. It was slight and
uncertain
.
A long period had elapsed, and each year that had passed lessened the
chances of discovery. That I should have been suffered to remain so long (for
I was now in my nineteenth year) under the pretection of Dame Darwell, by
my parents, the more I dwelt upon it, the more it surprised me and deepened
the mystery. It could not be because they did not know where I was?
Perhaps
my mother had watched me year after year unseen, and that I had often
met her unknowingly. What could have been the nature of the extraordinary
circumstances that not only first led them to leave me at the Inn, but which
rendered
it necessary for them for so long a period, to keep aloof from me? The
more I dwelt upon it the more the whole subject was involved in painful and
impenetrable mystery. This mystery I, however, resolved to clear up, and
immediately
prepared to take the first step towards the object to which I had now
sacredly devoted myself.
CHAPTER X.
I put an advertisewent in the papersMy impatience to learn the resultThe letter
I depart by Post for PhiladelphiaI obtain-a new clue to the line of my destiny
The crest and torn letter
.
Having
formed my resolution, I lost no time in acting. I felt I could not do
much with the slight materials I possessed towards effecting my end; but as
these were my only ground of hope, I determined to make the best of them.
Upon the Silver Bottle I placed my chief dependence. It was the shape and
size of a flattened oil flask, made of the purest silver, with a curved silver tube.
On one side of it was the device before described, of the eagle trampling on a
serpent, his claw crushing the head; a bold, spirited design. Beneath was the
initial `M.' This crest having been on the carriage and on the harness, led me
to believe that the persons who had brought me here travelled with their own
equipage; and the fact of their having a black coachman led me also to believe
that they were Southerners. A coach with that device upon it was wholly
unknown
,
hitherto, in that vicinity; and no traveler to whom Dame Darwell told
her story of my discovery, had ever heard of such a crest. Whoever my
parents
were it was evident that they did not belong in the part of the country
wherein they had left me. It was naturally a source of gratification to me to
be assured that they at least belonged to a good condition of society.
The `Silver Bottle' Dame Darwell had made me a present of when I left for
sea, saying, at the time, it might one day be the means of ascertaining who
were my parents. This idea I now seized upon with lively hope. Retiring to
my room I took it forth from a locked case in which I kept it, and began
examining
it with great care and painful interest. I searched to see if it could
reveal
any thing further. To my surprise I found on the bottom nearly
obliterated
by being worn smooth;
the maker's name!
It was with great diffiulty that
I could decypher it. But I succeeded in doing so with great joy, believing that
this discovery would materially aid me. It was
Beufort & Co. Lon
' The
name of the place where it was made was nearly obliterated, but I had no doubt
that it was London. The reader will at once see what advantage this would
give me provided I could ascertain if there was such a Silver-smith's House in
London, and learn from it to whom the Silver Bottle had been sold! This I
resolved
to leave for my last resort, atter trying every means this side of the water.
I now sat down and wrote the following advertisement,
`
One hundred dollars reward will be paid to whomsoever will forward to the
addresses beneath, the name and residence of any family whose carriage plate, or
seal bears the device of an eagle, with his claw upon a scrpent's head, and
grasping
the folds with the other talon
.
Address the initials `M. D.' at the office of the Boston Daily
.'
This advertisement I read to my foster-mother, and mounting my horse
galloped
into Boston with it, the Inn as I have already said, being but nine miles
from town. I left instructions with the publisher to request the certain papers
in New York, Philadelphia, Baltimore, Charleston, Savannah, Mobile and New
Orleans, to copy the advertisement and forward their bills to him for adjustment,
at the same time leaving him the amount for this purpose. He stared on
reading
my advertisement, and remarked if such a crest belonged to any family in
the Union, the offer I had made would bring it to light. He asked me no
questions
.
I gave him no explanation and left the office I was now relieved of
much of the weight that oppressed my spirits. The messenger of inquiry had
gone forth, and might return like the dove bearing an olive leaf. I did not
remain
in town, but at once returned home and informed Dame Darwell what I
had done. She looked pleased and expressed her sincere desire that I might
succeed; and I saw that she had thrown aside every feeling of a selfish
character
,
and looked only for my own happiness even, if the discovery of my parents
should, in the end, lead to a separation from me. But she knew I should love
her
no less. Seeing me elated and full of anticipations of the result, she bade
me not to be too sanguine, as I might he unsuccessful, and then my spirits
would be crushed forever. I must acknowledge I had very little ground for
elation
;
but my spirits being naturally buoyant I was led to hope against hope.
From the day the advertisement appeared, I was in a state of feverish and
nervous expectation. My anxiety was so great that, too impatient to wait the
tardy mail from town, and tired of riding in every day to learn its fate, I took
up my lodgings at a private house. I avoided the hotels, lest I should meet some
who had either known me in college or in the navy, and had heard of my
ignominious
position before men. For the same reason I shunned public resorts
and confined myself almost wholly to my room, once a day visiting only the
office
of the paper. Three weeks elapsed and no notice had been taken of the
advertisement
.
I had in the meanwhile seen it copied as far South as
Charleston
,
which papers were forwarded to the office. A month elapsed, when one
morning as I entered the publishing room, the Editor handed me a letter mailed
at Philadelphia, and addressed to,
`M. D.'
care
of the Boston Daily .'
I tore it open with excitement and attempted to read it; but my hands shook,
my whole body trembled; I felt my sight swimming, and I should have fallen
but for the support of a chair. I nerved myself to overcome this weakness and
again prepared to read the letter. My feelings, however, were still strong and
I was too much agitated. I felt that it possibly contained a key to the mystery
of my lifeand that in a moment my happiness would be secured or destroyed
forever! At length I recovered composure enough to read:
`Philadelphia,
September 20, 184
Sir,I have seen an advertisement this morning in one of the papers
offering
a reward of one hundred dollars for any information touching a device of an
eagle treading upon a serpent. Although I do not covet the reward, I desire to
serve you, if I can do so. Your advertisement brought to my recollection, a
carriage which I painted twenty years ago (for I am by occupation a painter)
on which I painted this very device, as I find on referring to my book where I
keep patterns of every thing I have ever done in that way. The carriage was a
double barouche, light yellow, and highly burnished. Trusting this little
information
I can give you may be of some service, I remain,
Very respectfully yours,
James Merton
.'
The reader will easily conceive my emotions on reading this. It conveyed,
indeed, nothing definite or positive respecting my parents, but it connected the
broken link to a time prior to that on which they had come to the Inn. It
confirmed
the accuracy of my foster-mother's description of the carriage, and that
this was the very carriage I had no manner of doubt. I had, at least, effected
something! It was one step and might lead to another of infinite importance.
I was filled with joy and hope. The Editor who, a few moments before had
noticed
my paleness and agitation, now looked at my flushed cheek and sparkling
eyes with surprise.
That same forenoon I placed the letter in Dame Darwell's hands, and I was
greatly pleased to listen to her exclamations of surprise at the extraordinary
discovery of the painter of the coach. The letter at once led my thoughts to
Philadelphia, where I now believed my parents had lived. Thither I resolved
to proceed without delay to call in person on the coach painter. My
foster-mother
wept at parting with me, and urged me to write to her and inform her of
the progress I made in my search. The third day after leaving home I reached
Philadelphia. It was already dark when I got to a quiet hotel in Third street.
I immediately examined a directory seeking for the house of Mr. Merton. It
was on Ninth street, near Race, and thither I directed my steps; for till I had
seen him I felt neither like eating nor sleeping. I found the exterior of the
house handsome and prepossessing. On ringing and saying I desierd to see
Mr. Merton, I was ushered into a handsomely furnished parlor. I knew that
many of the mechanics of Philadelphia lived in good style and were rich, or I
should have believed that I had entered the wrong house. An astral lamp was
burning on a marble centre table. An inner door opened and my heart
throbbed
violently at the idea that I was about to meet one whom my unknown
father
had probably spoken with. An elderly gentleman entered and bowed.
`Mr. Merton, I presume,' I said, returning the salutation.
`Yes, sir.'
`I had the pleasure recently of receiving from you a letter addressed to
Boston
in reply to an advertisement,' I said with a nervous agitation, which I have
no doubt my kind readers will deem excusable when they consider how much
reason I had to feel agitated.
`Mr. `M. D?' ' said Mr. Merton interrogtaively.
I bowed.
`Be seated, sir.'
`I have called,' I said, `to thank you for your obliging letter, and to '
`Don't speak of it, my dear sir; and if you were about to say anything about
paying the reward I can't listen to you. I only did my duty. It was by mere
accident that I discovered the advertisement. My little son's eye caught it and
asked me if I ever had painted such a crest as that, and said he believed he had
seen one in my book of cyphers. I took the paper and reading it referred to
my book, found it and recollected distinctly when I painted it. It was in the
fall of '21!'
`Can you now remember, sir,' I tremblingly asked; `who it was that
employed
you to paint the crest?'
`It was a gentlemenan entire stranger to me. He had bought the carriage
new of a builder next door to mine and sent it to me to paint. With it he gave
me the crest.'
`Have you the pattern he gave you?'
`It is pasted in my book. I will show it to you if it will interest you.'
`Deeply sir.'
He left the room and in a moment returned with a large folio of blank leaves,
and opening it to the date of 1821 placed his finger on a crest such as had been
described by me in the advertisement. It was done in colors on a piece of
white paper and very beautifully though hastily executed. While I was
regarding
it attentively and with mixed feelings of awe and curiosity, he said,
`I remember the circumstances perfectly. The stranger came to me and
asked
me if I could paint the carriage and have it done by such a day. I told him
I could. He then said he would like to have a crest upon it, and asking me if I
had a brush and colors, said he would sketch the design. He went into the
shop and in a few seconds sketched this for me to copy. He handled a brush
as though he had been apprenticed to the trade, and I never saw anything done
quicker nor with finer effect. The eagle I painted on the coach had not half
the spirit of this original!'
`Sir,' said I with emotion I could not conceal, this little sketch would be
invaluable
to me. If I dare be so bold as to ask you to part with it!'
`It is at your service, sir; and I am happy to have it in my power to oblige
you. You seem deeply interested in this matter, sir!'
`I am indeed, sir,' I replied; and won by his benevolent and friendly manner,
I related to him briefly my history and the object of my advertisement. He
listened
with deep attention, and after I had ended said,
`I can never too often congratulate myself for having written to you. Your
story is one of touching interest. I regret I cannot contribute more towards
the furtherance of your purpose. I only saw your father (as I have no doubt
he was, for as I recal his form and features I can see a resemblance to them in
you) I saw him but twice, and but for a few moments each time. He was a
tall, noble looking man and under thirty years of age. If now living he must
be fifty.'
`Was he dressed in mourning?'
`No. His dress was strikingly elegant as were his manners. He looked to
me more like a foreigner than an American.'
`Was he accompanied by a lady on either occasion?'
`No.'
`Did you ascertain his name?'
`It is my impression I did at the time, but I have forgotten it!'
`This is indeed unfortunate,' I said with a tone of disappointment. `It might
have led to a discovery.'
`Perhaps I can assist you. The coach maker is still living and doubtless has
his name on the bill for the carriage. Remain with me to-night my young
friend, and to-morrow I will see what I can do. I also remember now that he
stopped at Head's Hotel, which proves he was a stranger in town; and by
going
there to-morrow we may find, by referring back to the date, his name on
the books.'
`This idea gave me fresh hope; and thanking the benevolent Mr. Merton for
his obliging reception of me and my affair, I gratefully declined his invitation
and returned to my hotel, bearing away with me the crest which my father, as
I believed him to be, had sketched with his own eye and hand. I had now a
relic and memento of each;
her
note to my foster mother and this sketch! On
reaching my room I sat down to examine it and gaze upon it and indulge the
feelings the sight had produced. Turning it over I saw to my surprise, writing
upon the back. The paper, I at once saw, had been part of the subscription to
a letter. The letters remaining were
`To
F. R.
Mar
'.
The remainder was gone! The initials were the same as those on the trunk
and thus the link was made stronger. I had also advanced another stepa
great step in gaining two letters after the initial.
CHAPTER XI.
Little Marlboro' makes a visit to Head's HotelThe investigationThe negro
and his testimony to the pastThe trunkThe coachmanThe return of
Little Marlboro' to the InnHis resolution to proceed to EnglandHis
adieus
.
The
unexpected possession of the additional links in the chain of my
destiny
,
mentioned in the last chapter, filled me with bounding hopes. That I had
got hold of the clue to my parentage I had not the least doubt. The crest given
me by the coachmaker was indentical with that upon the Silver Bottle, and the
initials of the name upon the torn letter were the same as those Dame Darwell
had remarked on the trunk of the mysterious travellers who had occupied the
Court Chamber. The gentleman described by Mr. Merton as having sketched
the crest precisely answered the description given by the good dame of the
traveler in black. The time, also, was the same, he being in Philadelphia only
six weeks before the carriage stopped at the Inn, which left time for an easy
journey to this place. All these circumstances formed links of the chain which
I was now resolved to trace to its end.
Early the ensuing morning, after taking a hearty breakfast, I proceeded to
Head's Hotel, a stately building a little retired from the street, and originally
the private mansion of a distinguished citizen. This hotel had a high
reputation
and was much frequented by wealthy Southerners. The fact that the
stranger
had also stopped there, strengthened my belief in the idea I had formed,
from his having a black servant, that he was a southerner. It was this
impression
that had led me to send my advertisement to Charleston and other southern
cities.
On entering the door of the hotel, I felt the blood mounting to my face with
the emotions that came over me at the thought that probably the feet of my
father
had crossed the same threshold! I was also deeply moved at the reflection
that in a moment or two I should be able to learn the name and residence of
the person to whom the torn letter was addressedand which might prove to
be that of my father! The clerk saw my embarrassment and fixed his eyes
with curiosity upon me as after several efforts I finally succeeded in asking him
if he kept the records of the travellers who stopped at the hotel in 1821. The
question was heard by the host who stepping up, surveyed me a moment and
then said with his pleasant smile
`That is a long way back, my dear sir; no register remains for the period.
What do you wish to refer to?'
`The name of a gentleman who with his lady put up there that summer. It
is important that I should ascertain it!'
`Then you don't know it?'
`No, sir.'
`And how then will you ascertain what you wish?' he said smiling.
`I know the initials,' I answered.
`Ah, that is better. What is your object in searching for names so far back.'
`It is connected with some family matters,' I answered, embarrassed for a
reply.
`Well, well, I will see. There is no register, but my books will show. What
are the initials of the person you are inquiring for?'
`F. R. M.'
The kind host, with a look in which surprise and curiosity were mingled,
began
to examine an old account book brought to him from a dusty top shelf in
the office, and after running his eye down the column of M's, while I was
trembling
with hopes and fears, he stopped, placing his finger upon a name. Before
he could utter it I was at his side looking over his shoulder. My quick glance
rested on the name at which his finger had paused. It was, `F. R.
Marlborough
.'
I stood perfectly transfixed with astonishment. It was the very name by
which I had been so singularly christened! What wonderful relation of
circumstances
could have produced such a coincidence! I was speechless with
amazement. The reader will remember that I happened to be christened by
Dame Darwell `Little Marlboro',' because the caps that were left for me by
those who had abandoned me were wrapped in a torn leaf of a singing book,
on which chanced to be the well known tune of `Little Marlboro'!'
And now, by a surprising coincidence the name I had been in search of as
my father's, turned out to be Marlboro! By what mysterious ordering of events
had this thing happened! I now felt a superstitious impression that this
person
was indeed my father!'
After a little recovering my self-possession, I said with considerable
emotion
`Sir, this must be the name I seek. I know not how to express my
obligations
to you for your kindness in taking this trouble. Will you be so good as
to examine the account to which this refers. It is page 335!'
He turned to the page. The bill was made out to F. R. Marlboro, and lady,
and servant, (colored male servant) charging them with three weeks board.
My proofs were augmented by this discovery. Here was the party that had
stopped at Dame Darwell's. I had, however, yet to discover what I had
turned
to the account in search of, viz.: the residence. I was in hopes it might
possibly have been witten in the bill. But it was only made out to the name
simply to F. R. Marlborough, lady, and colored servant, without stating the
place of abode. This I could only expect to find recorded on the register, and
this, was lost. I felt deeply disappointed. I had discovered much. I had
clearly proved the identity of the party that had stopped at the Inn with the
party that had stopped at the Hotel. All the intermediate links were perfect
The proofs were clear and left no room for the shadow of a doubt.
Yet I seemed at once brought to a full stop in my search. I seemed to have
met with a barrier that could not be surmounted.
`Sir,' I said with an earnestness that shewed the depth of my feelings, `is it
not possible that you may be able to recall the gentleman to your mind; to
recollect
when he was with you, and also his residence? Perhaps, sir, you may
have known him well!
I hung upon his answer. After a moment's reflection, he shook his head:
`I cannot recal him, sir! It is many years ago, and I have at my house so
many hundred guests every year, that he is lost among them all. If there was
any particular circumstance by which he could be recalled to my mind?'
`They must have had an infant with them,' I said with a trembling eagerness.
`It is not mentioned in their account, and perhaps would not be likely to be.
But, sir, they
must
have had an infant with them!'
He thought again and a socond time shook his head! `I am not able to
recall
them!'
`Have you no old domestics with you! Perhaps some one of them might
bear these persons in mind!' I said earnestly.
`You seem deeply interested, sir, and excited. I will do all I can. May I
know your motive?'
`Sir,' I said earnestly, `a party answering to this description with these
iniitials
,
stopped in 1821 at an Inn in Massachusetts and left behind them an
infant
boy of six months, which child was afterwards brought up to manhood by
the good landlady. I am that child. I am seeking my parentage!
Circumstances
have favored me thus far, and I have traced them to your house. I
have discovered their name. I desire now to learn their residence!'
On hearing this account of myself and my object the kind-hearted old
gentleman
at once interested himself in my affair. He sent for an old gray-headed
negro and questioned him.
`No, massa,' said the African scratching his forehead, `I doesn't collect
zactly
any sich gemmun as dis Massa Marlbry wot you axes me `bout; yet dis
niggar hab pertikklar good mem'ry too!'
`He is more likely to remember persons of his own color,' I said quickly. He
was then asked to recall any black coachman that he might have seen there.
After a good deal of bothering of his thick brain and naming over every nigger
servant that come with gentlemen, beginning at the one that came yesterday
and going back from year to year, he finally got to the year 1821. It then
occured
to me to mention that they had a new coach with a crest, an eagle
treading
upon a serpent.
I had no sooner named this, than his eyes shone with intelligence.
`Ah, dar he be massa, dem's de man! I 'members de niggar wot druv dat
caryage mighty well! His name was Pompey. He an' I was 'tikkilar friends
ater we'd got 'quainted. Oh, yis! I collects him and his new coach! Now I
'collects his master an' missus too! I 'member's de eagle clawin de rattlesnake!
`Did they have an infant!'
`Lor, yis! I members it jist as well! a
leettle
bit babyyah, yah! Dis
nigger
hab good memory!'
`Where did Pompey say his master lived!'
`Dat am de mistery, massa! I recollecs axing dat question ob him, an he
nebber gib no satesfaktry answer! He keep dark as his own skin! He wos a
genelmen nigger dough, nebberdeless. He wore a crape behind his hat half a
yard long. His master and missus was mighty 'spectable people, or dey'd
nebber hab sich a 'spectable servant.'
`Was he a slave do you remember!'
`Dat am a mystery too. I axed him more dan onct if he wor a free nigger
genlmun or a slave an he neber gib me no satisfaxion. I tink, homsomnebber,
dat he wos a slave and from de West Indgy, coz he look and talk like a Ingy
nigger, and not like ol' Wirginny!'
Nothing further could be elicited from the old African. But, to my joy, mine
host, whose memory had received an impetus from the negro's reminiscence,
now remembered the coach and the party. It was, however, but indistinctly.
He remembered they were very retired, and were in mourning; but nothing
new was gained by me. After thanking him for his politeness, and receiving
his warm wishes for my success, I quitted the hotel. As I was passing out I
placed a dollar in the hands of the negro, who, after a bow and scrape, called
me back, and said,
`Now I tink ob it massa, dat nigger Pompey make me a present ob an old
trunk, dat when dey go away in dar new caryage he couldn't carry. I gib de
nigger a pound ob 'baccy for it! Dar be some writin' or printin in de trunk wot
may be able to tell massa whar it come from, if dat be wot massa arter.'
My heart leaped into my mouth. I desired him instantly to conduct me to
the trunk. It was in the boot-room. It proved to be an old round topped
wooden
trunk, once covered with seal skin, every hair of which was now worn off.
It was shining with blacking, for the old man used it to try his brushes upon
before applying them to the boots.
`Dat am de present dat Pomp gib me for a pound ob 'baccy, massa.'
I opened it, as it had no key, and tumbling out without ceremony the
contents
of coarse clothing upon the floor, I examined it. It was lined inside with
newspapers, and a glance shewed me that they were English papers. The date
was 1818. But all doubt of its being an English trunk was put to an end by a
defaced card on which I was able to decypher the name of `
Sandford
,
Maker
,
London.'
This was all that I could discover in or about the trunk. But it strengthened
a former idea that the stamp upon the Silver Bottle had led me to hold that my
parents might have come from England. But then the bottle and the trunk
might have both been made in London and yet their possessors be Americans.
They might have been purchased in the United States. But then again trunks
were not imported, and a bottle like that could be as easily obtained here as in
England!The result was that I began to be deeply impressed with the idea
that I should have to look yet to England for my parentage! The negro had
probably received the trunk from his master, who had no doubt purchased it in
London.
I had yet one more branch of events to pursue to its source. The maker of
the carriage, Mr. Merton had told me, was still living, I had taken his address;
and after leaving the Hotel I hastened to call on him without delay. I found
him at home and to my surprise and pleasure, Mr. Merton with him, who had
called to see him in my behalf. I related to him the result of my visit to Head's.
They had just been looking over the books and accounts of that year and there
found the name of Ferdinand R. Marlborough. The bill of the carriage was
made out to his name. Beyond this I could learn nothing, save that the
coach-maker
expressed it as his opinion that Mr. Marlborough was an Englishman.
This impression strengthened my own, which were tending to that channel and
I began involuntarily to turn my thoughts towards the other side of the Atlantic.
I had now exhausted all my means of information in Philadelphia and felt
that I must seek for the next link in London. I at once hastened to my kind
foster-mother, and after reporting to her the events which had occurred during
my absence, I made known to her my intention to take passage for Europe. My
only guides were the maker's stamp on the Silver Bottle, whereby I hoped to
trace the purchasers; that upon the trunk, and the crest, by which I hoped to
find my parents, through the Herald office.
The good dame was too sensible, and desired too much my happiness to offer
any objection, and, though not without tears, gave her consent.
I shall, therefore, depart in the Acadia steamship, which sails next Monday
for England. I am, by the generosity of my foster-mother, amply provided
with means. I shall be in England in a few days, and there enter upon the
search, the resources of which I feel that I have exhausted here!
The reader shall hear of my progress after I reach England in a series of
letters
,
which I shall transmit to them in recompense for their indulgence in
following
me thus far in my narrative. Till then I bid you, my dear readers, an
affectionate farewell.
Your friend,
LITTLE MARLBORO'.
Boston, June 20, 184
END OF PART 1.Dear Madam:
I am stranger to you! You may never behold me again, yet I am
about to cast myself upon your heart! I am about to entrust to you what is
dearer to me than lifemy infant child! Circumstances of the most painful
character, which I cannot at present control and which may bind me till death
releases me from this sad world, compel me to deny myself longer the blessed
privilege of a mother. I must separate from my child, perhaps never more to
clasp it to my bleeding bosom. I have been three days seeking somewhere to
leave it,alas, to leave it among strangersunknowing and unknown. But
no where could I desert it hitherto. The hour of delay cannot be extended.
Providence I feel has brought me to your roof. Your heart is kindfor your
voice and face are kindly and benevolent. I have had repeated to me your
language at the table, and my heart has confidence in you. To you, then,
dear madam, I entrust my little boymy babe! my heart's idol. God forgive
me, if I am committing a crime. But it is not mine to choose. I
must
part
with my babe. I shall leave it in the bed. With it you will also find a
package
of its clothing. Take my child, cherish it tenderly for the poor mother's
sake who is denied the trust, she now makes over to you with a broken heart.'`Philadelphia,
September 20, 184
Sir,I have seen an advertisement this morning in one of the papers
offering
a reward of one hundred dollars for any information touching a device of an
eagle treading upon a serpent. Although I do not covet the reward, I desire to
serve you, if I can do so. Your advertisement brought to my recollection, a
carriage which I painted twenty years ago (for I am by occupation a painter)
on which I painted this very device, as I find on referring to my book where I
keep patterns of every thing I have ever done in that way. The carriage was a
double barouche, light yellow, and highly burnished. Trusting this little
information
I can give you may be of some service, I remain,
Very respectfully yours,
James Merton
.'CHAPTER I.
London
,
July
8th, 184.
To
The readers of the First Part of `The Silver Bottle
.'
I DEPARTED from Boston in the Acadia Steamship the Monday following the
close of the First Series of my narration, and arrived here in safety three days
ago. I have already stated that by the generosity of my kind foster-mother,
Dame Darwell, I was amply provided with means to prosecute my search.
According
to my promise the reader shall now hear of my progress in a series of
letters which I shall transmit to them in recompense for their indulgence in
following
me thus far in my narrative
*
*
We have thought best to give the letters as they are, instead of bringing them into a
narrative form.
.
Having, as has been seen, exhausted all my resources of information in the
United States, there remained no alternative but to cross the Atlantic. My
readers will probably remember on what proofs I hoped to find some trace of
my parentage; but I will here recapitulate them:First: was the Silver
Nursery
Bottle which was discovered lying with me in the bed of the `Court
Chamber
,'
with its crest of an eagle treading upon a serpent, and beneath the crest a
cypherthe single letter `M.'
Second: This crest was also upon the harness and carriage and the initial
was upon the brass plate of a trunk behind the carriage! These facts of
coincidence
showed that the bottle must have belonged to the persons in the carriage,
and consequently that both the bottle and myself had been left in the Court
Chamber by these strangers.
Third: I have traced the carriage to the carriage maker's in Philadelphia
and there obtained the original drawing of the crest; and I had discovered at
the hotel that the purchaser of the carriage had entered his name as `F. R.
Marlborough;' (a singular coincidence with my own!) for as these were the
initials on the back of the letter upon which the device of the crest had been
drawn by the stranger for the coach-painter, there was no question of the
identity
of one with the other.
Fourth: The discovery of the old English trunk was a circumstance that I
deemed an important item in my array of discoveries; as it, without doubt,
confirmed my long conceived opinion that I should yet have to look to
England
for my parents.
Fifth: The name of the maker of the Silver Bottle on which I placed great
hopes. It was `Beufort & Co. Lon.'
`Sixth: The crest, if belonging to an English family, could without doubt
be found at the Herald office, and by this means the family which claimed it
might be discovered.
These were the slight grounds upon which I based my hopes of discovering
my parents, and which have led me to cross the Atlantic in search of them. I
am now in London! My hopes are buoyant. I feel I shall yet succeed! At
least I am determined never to cease my efforts to find those to whom I owe
my birth. I have been two days in London. But the fatigue and excitement
of my journey and of reaching the field of my labors has kept me confined to
my room until this morning. I have been engaged all the forenoon in making
my plans. The Herald office cannot be visited on business until next
Wednesday
and it is now Friday. I should first wish to visit that, but I cannot wait so
long an interval. I have, therefore, sent a servant for a directory from one of
the libraries to examine it for the name of `Beufort & Co.,' the makers of the
Silver Bottle. The servant has just returned!
4 P. M. I have examined the directory for this year and those for seven
years back without finding the firm. I find several of the name of Beufort both
alone and with partners, but none of the firm of `Beufort & Co.' I have
despatched
a messenger for a bound catalogue of the trade published, as I learn,
by the company of Silver Smith's of the city of London, and extending back in
volumes for more than a century. I have sent for the volume or twenty-five
years ago.
The man has just returned from `The Silver Smith's Arms,' informing me
that books are not suffered to leave the library, but that I can call and refer to
them. I shall at once proceed to the Hall for this purpose.
8 P. M. I left the house guided by the messenger, for London is a labyrinth
to me, and reached the Silver Smith's Hall after half an hour's walk. I was
guided up a broad flight of steps into a vestibule, where sat an old man who
acted as door-keeper. On informing him of my wishes he asked me if I had a
ticket of admission. I replied in the negative.
`You cannot be admitted without a ticket of permission, sir,' he said.
`Of whom am I to obtain this?'
`Of the President of the Company.'
While I was undecided what to do, a gentleman, advanced in years, came up
the stairs and was about to enter, when observing my perplexity, for he had
overheard what had passed, he said to me politely,
`You are a stranger I peceive, sir!'
`Yes, sir. An American.'
`You may enter, sir, with me. Can I be of service to you?'
`My business in coming here,' I answered, `was to examine the volume of
The Silver Smith's Company for about twenty-four or five years ago!'
`You will find them arrayed on yonder shelf, sir. Whose name can you wish
to search for, of a date so long back?'
`That of `Beufort & Co.'
`That is my own firm?' he said, looking at me fixedly.
`Your own firm!' I repeated with gratified surprise.
Yes, sir. I am the Senior partner of that House!'
`I could not find it on the directory for the last seven years!'
`No, sir. It is twelve years since I withdrew my name from the firm; it is
now `Walley & Beufort,' my son and son-in-law! I should have said I
was
instead of
am
the Senior parter!'
I was so greatly agitated for a few moments after this singular and seemingly
providential discovery, that I could not speak. I trembled and had to place
my hand against a column for support He observed my emotion and said with
alarm,
`What! are you becoming ill, sir?'
`Nono, sir! It is all over. It was only my surprise at meeting you so
singularly for whom I was seekingwhom I crossed the Atlantic almost
purposely
to see!'
`Crossed the Atlantic to see
me?
' he exclaimed with intense astonishment.
`What can you have with me to come so far? I do not remember ever to have
seen yonyet, now I look at you more closely, your features seem somewhat
familiar:'
`You can never have seen me before, sir! I have come to see you and ask
you what (I said coloring at the seeming trivial nature of the subject) I fear
you will regard as a trifling question, but one which is full of the deepest
import
to me!'
`Well, sir, speak!' he said gravely seeing that I paused, and looking at me
as if he suspected I was not exactly in a state of mental soundness.
`Do you remember having sold some twenty-five years ago, a silver nursing
bottle?'
He smiled, but answered benevolently,
`I dare say I have, sir, a good many of them. In those days I know we
manufactured
them?'
`You stamped them with the name of your firmBeufort & Co?'
`Yes. But why do you ask?'
`I have a motive, sir, if you will indulge me! Did you ever sell such an
article to a person by the name of Marlboro'?'
I hung upon his reply. He looked as if he were trying to recollect, and then
answered slowly,
`Not that I remember. My books however will show!'
`Can you refer to them easily?'
`Yes, sir. But this would hardly seem necessary!'
`I owe you a thousand apologies, sir, but it is very necessary I should
ascertain
this. When I tell you, sir, that I am a foster-child and abandoned by my
parents in infancy and that the only clue I have to my parentage is a silver
nursing bottle which they left with me, stamped with your name, I am assured
sir, you will excuse my zeal and overlook the trouble I give you!'
`And this is true that you are such a child and in possession of such a bottle?'
`Yes, sir! Here it is!' I ssid taking it from my pocket and then from two
envelops (the inner one being the leaf from the music book with the tune of
`Little Marlboro' upon it, in which the baby linen had been wrapped) and
handing it to him. He took it and said immediately,
`This is certainly one of my manufacture, with my stamp upon it! From its
shape I know it to be one of the earliest that we had made. I am ready to
assist
you, sir, if you can tell me how I can do so?'
`If you will do me the honor to listen to me, sir, I will tell you all my past
history and my hopes of the future!'
`I will cheerfully hear you. Here are two chairs!'
I then gave him a brief yet sufficiently minute account of the facts the
reader
is already familiar with up to the time of my embarking for England. He
listened with the profoundest attention and at times with emotion he did not
attempt
to disguise. When I had ended he said, grasping my hand,
`Sir, your narrative has deeply interested my feelings. I am obliged to you
for narrating it to me. I agree with you that your search must be now
continued
in England; and you have my prayers for your success. I believe you
will succeed. You shall have all the aid I can give you! The facts you bring
to bear upon the search before you are, as far as they go, of importance. They
are, however, in themselves nothing unless you can connect each link that
follows with its fellow. You deserve all praise for your perseverance. Come
with me, sir, to my counting-room, where my books are, and I will examine them.
I was always in the habit of making a record of each days' sales, and to whom,
if I knew the persons!'
From the Silver Smith's Hall I went with him to his own carriage, which
had been waiting for him at the door of the Hall, to his counting-room. It was
in the rear of a magnificent establishment for the sale of silver wares. We
passed through the glittering room and entered his counting-room, which he
seemed to keep only to preserve his habits of business. There was at the desk
an aged clerk almost as venerable as Mr. Beufort himself.
`Jacob, turn to ledger B,date 1818, and see if there is such a name entered
upon it as F. R. Marlborough!' said his master as he laid down his hat and
stick, and seated himself in his arm-chair. I was too nervous to accept the seat
he offered me, but stood waiting to see what Jacob would discover.
The old clerk having found the huge volume, dusted it and run his eye over
the alphabetical list at length arrested his finger upon the letter `M.' He then
run over the names beginning with this letter, murmuring `MarlMarlMarl,'
in a half tone, as his eye traveled down the column. I watched him with
intense
anxiety. At length at the very bottom of the page, he placed his
fore-finger
upon a name, and emphatically pronounced the word `Marlborough.'
`You've found it!' cried Mr. Beufort half rising up in his chair.
`Yes sir `
Marlborough. F. R
, page 319,' he responded in a formal tone.
`Turn to it quickly,' I said, impatient at his mechanical formality.
He tossed back the heavy leaves of the folio, and laid open the page named.
I was instantly looking over his shoulder. It showed an account opened by the
House of Beufort & Co. with Ferdinand R. Marlborough. I ran my eye
rapidly
over the items, which were a score in number.
Among others was a
`
Silver
bottle
!' I uttered an exclamation of joy, and announced it to Mr. Beufort
He came and looked over the book.
`Extraordinary! Wonderful coincidence! Providence has taken the matter
up, young man! Persevere and you will ultimately succeed! Your Silver
Bottle
will yet make your fortune! Strange, indeed!'
`Have you any recollection of this, Mr. Marlboro?' I asked earnestly.
`I am trying to think. I have had so many customers that I am not sure that
I recollect him. Do you know who it was, Jacob?'
`He was quite a young man, I recollect sir, I sold him most of these articles
myself.'
`Can you describe his appearance?' asked Mr. Beufort.
`He was about the height of this young gentleman, sir, and(here he looked
at me with a sudden gaze of surprise) I never saw two more alike, sir! It is
surprising, sir,' he added, looking at me and bowing, `the astonishing
resemblance
between you and Mr. Marlborough!'
I exchanged looks with Mr. Beufort, who looked very much excited with the
most pleasurable emotions. `Your case is brightening, sir,' he said to me.
I was silent. I was too deeply moved to open my lips to express what I felt.
I trembled between hope and fear.
`What family did he belong to, Jacob?' asked Mr. Beufort.
`I cannot say, sir, though I have no doubt he was one of the nobility. He
used to call in a tilbury when he came alone; but when he came with his lady,
her carriage had a crest of an eagle strangling a snake!'
`The very same!' I exclaimed almost wild with my feelings.
`And he had a wife, Jacob?'
`Yes, Mr. Beufort. A young wife!'
`Let me see the dates,' he said, looking at the account. `His bills begin
January first with the purchase of a diamond necklace, and a set of bridal pearls,
doubtless for new year's or wedding gifts. The silver bottle was bought
December
20th.'
`The bottle I sold to the lady. She came alone in her carriage. I recollect
the circumstance, from her wishing the crest and the initial `M' engraved upon
it!'
`Your memory is not only tenacious, Jacob, but very valuable just now!'
`I always had a good memory, sir. I can recollect biting my fingers with my
first teeth!' answered Jacob gravely.
`I dare say, Jacob. You have shown evidences of it now. Is that the bottle
you sold the lady?'
Jacob took it and examined it closely.
`Yes sir,' he answered confidently.
`It is one of ours; but is it the identical one?'
`Yes, sir. I know it by the crest. I engraved it myself!'
`Then the matter is settled,' said Mr. Beufort, looking at me, and smiling
with gratification. `We have now to find out who Mr. Marlborough was, and
it is my opinion that will amount to the same thing as finding out your parents,
sir! You have clearly proved them to be English, I think! The next step to be
taken is to the Herald office!'
`It is closed,' I said in a tone of disappointment.
`Not so that admittance cannot be obtained on application to the proper
quarter
.
Come and breakfast with me at NoTerrace, at nine to-morrow, and
we will then proceed together to the Herald office!'
This good man then drove me to my lodgings, where I have now written the
progress of events up to this hour. My next letter will make known the result
of my visit to the `Herald's Hall.'
Yours truly,
LITTLE MALBORO.'
CHAPTER II.
London
,
, 1844.
I have just returned from a visit to the Herald's Hall, and with a beating heart
and trembling fingers I proceed to write what has transpired, before I leave
London
,
which I shall do at day-light in a post chaise.
It will be remembered that I was about to proceed to the Herald's office with
Mr. Beufort who was to make use of his personal influence to obtain
admittance
for me. To this gentleman I feel under the profoundest obligations of
gratitude.From the first moment in which I made him acquainted with my
story, he has taken the deepest interest in my researches; and has voluntarily
and most kindly offered to aid me, not only with his influence and experience,
but with money, should I at any time require it. But, thanks to my kind
foster-mother
,
good Dame Darwell, I am amply provided with means to meet
every possible contingency.
I left my rooms this morning at ten, and entering Mr. Beufort's carriage,
which he had sent to receive me, I drove to his handsome mansion on
Terrace. Ho received me at the door, and said he would be at leisure in a few
minutes to accompany me to the Hall, and that in the meanwhile his wife and
daughter would entertain me. Thereupon he ushered me into a pleasant
withdrawing
room opening from the breakfast room, and presented me to Mrs.
Beufort
and her daughter, an accomplished and exceedingly lovely young lady of
eighteen years of age, whose features at once reminded me of Emma Field, a
young person no doubt still remembered by my readers as she will ever be by
me! Indeed this beautiful girl is ever visible to the eye of my imagination
whenever I look into the future! It is she who inspires me to action! To
persevere in establishing my birth! It is for
her
that I would be honoured and
esteemed! If I should hear to-day that she was no more, or what would be as
her death to me, married to another, I feel persuaded that my energies would
be paralysed and that I should be indifferent to the result of my researches after
my family. If I gain honors it is to lay them at her feet! If I gain wealth it is
to share it with her! And without her both would alike be valueless to me!
I could not help betraying some confusion and surprise at the resemblance I
discovered to Emma in Miss Beufort; a resemblance rather of air and general
manner than of feature. The sight of her revived all my emotions of love for
the absent, and I could not withdraw my eyes from her; till, at length, I
discovered
that she was embarrassed by my fixed regards. I immediately apologised
to her, saying that she so surprisingly resembled an American friend of mine
that I could offer no other excuse for my inadvertant gazing. She smiled, and
we entered into a conversation upon my fortunes, of which they were
previously
informed by Mr. Beufort. I could see by Miss Beufort's eyes that she
wished
I might succeed in discovering my parentage and that she sympathized with
me in my situation of doubt and uncertainty. My conversation with Miss
Beufort
only deepened my tender recollections of her whom she so forcibly recalled
to my mind, and inspired me with new ardor in my pursuit of that happiness
and honor I hoped one day to share with Emma.
`Ah, my young friend, so you are agreeably entertaining the ladies, I see!
Perhaps
we are entertaining a Prince,' added he, smiling pleasantly. `Well,
sir, now if you are ready!'
`If my parents prove honest and respectable I shall be satisfied, even if I find
them in humble life,' I answered, understanding his allusion.
We entered the luxurious carriage of the wealthy Silver-Smith, two livered
footmen behind, and the coach rolled with a rapid and easy motion through the
crowded streets of London. We soon left the Strand and stopped in front of
a stately edifice, seemingly of great antiquity. Alighting at the grand entrance
we passed into a large vestibule at the extremity of which was a flight of dark
oaken steps with carved banisters. At the top was a sort of open terrace
leading
upon a low balcony, in which by a door sat in a carved Gothic arm-chair a
man in a Herald's surcoat, who was the porter of the Hall. To him Mr.
Beufort
handed a ticket signed by the nobleman who regulated the affairs of the
Herald's Hall.
`You may enter, gentlemen! It is correct!' he answered, after peeping
closely at the signature and seal through a pair of iron spectacles that looked as
if they might have been worn by one of the Herald's of the days of the
Conqueror
.
We entered a vast hall of Gothic architecture, lighted by a stained window at
either extremity. It was the most remarkable apartment I ever entered, and I
remained a few moments gazing around me. The ceiling was pointed and
groined and formed of groups of light arches supported by columns springing
free from the floor thirty feet in height. The arches, pillars and walls were all
a dark gray, having the appearance of stone; and the original hue has been
changed by time, in many places a deep black. The effect was singularly
venerable
and impressive. Along the roof was suspended hundreds of banners
bearing all sorts of quaint devices, an I presenting a beautiful and strange
comingling
of gay colors. Some of these banners were very old, and torn
doubtless
in battle. Along the walls of the hall, beneath this canopy of suspended
banners, were arranged rows of shields of every shape, and size, and degree of
antiquity, this side the Conquest. Some of them had become perfectly black
with age, others were coated with rust; and many glittered and shone as if
newly burnished. I noticed that all of them, where they were not so much
defaced
as to render it impossible for anything to be discerned upon the surface,
were carved or else inlaid with devices of heraldry. On some were delineated
complete and elaborate coats of arms, by means of gold inserted in grooves cut
into the metal. Most of the shields were battered and indented, and in one I
saw embedded the end of a broken pike-head.
Upon the opposite side of the hall were arranged casques and helmets with
and without visors; and standing around the apartment were numerous
complete
suits of armor
cap-a-pie
, as if enveloping the body of stalwart knights.
Seeing my curiosity in observing all this, Mr. Beufort said,
`You are here in the repository of the insignia of English family honors.
There is not a family in the land of any descent that is not represented in this
Hall by some appropriate device belonging to its name and inheritance. Here
the history of every old British family is recorded from its remotest origin, and
many of them extend their line beyond the Conquest to Norman lineage. Here
are to be found not only their histories, but the causes are recorded which led
to the distinction of each!'
As he spoke one of the ushers of the Hall approached us, and overhearing
Mr. Beufort's words, said courteously, after saluting us,
`Yes; there is not a family above the rank of a simple baron whose name
and lineage is not here on record with a copy of his arms, and how he came by
them. There now,' he said, directing our attention to the rows of shields, `is
a shield bearing simply for its device a rook. It is the device of the noble
family
of Rookley, the founder of which was wounded in battle and lay perishing
in a copse where he had fallen under the weight of his armor; but who was
saved by a rook which lighting upon a tree above him made such a strange
clamor that his followers were led to approach the tree to destroy it, when the
Knight was found lying beneath it nearly dead. He afterwards, in
commemoration
of his preservation, took the name of Rookley and adopted this device
upon his shield! There is a shield with a lance's head sticking in it. It is the
device of the De Lancey family. The founder was a gigantic soldier in the
battle of Croisay, and singly defended his king with this shield against a score
of Cavaliers, all of whom shivered their lances against it, and the last piercing
it broke it in the metal as you see. The soldier saved the king's life, protecting
him till succor arrived, and was knighted, adopting the lance head for his
heraldic
device and designation.
Interesting as these chivalric remeniscences were, I was too impatient to
learn if I was any ways interested in the records of the Hall of Herald's to listen
with undivided attention. My eyes were roaming over the multitude of shields
and banners with the wild hope of possibly seeing that device which had become
so indelibly engraven upon my memory. Mr. Beufort seeing my impatience
and referring it to the true cause, said,
`We have visited the Hall this morning, sir, to ascertain if there is an
English
family which claims a device which we bear with us!'
`If the family is English we will ascertain for you, sir,' answered the usher.
He then led the way into an inner room, the walls of which were piled with
old
tomes
and manuscripts on parchment. Writing tables of black wood were
standing in the middle of the apartment which was hung round with numerous
frames containing on a small scale hundreds of coats of arms, crests and cyphers
with numbers labelled upon each. Upon the table over which it was laid a
scarlet cloth curiously embroidered with silver and gold threads, and containing
in the centre the arms of the kingdom gorgeously done in needle work, and in
brilliant colors, was an enormous volume of immense thickness and bearing
marks of age. The usher advanced towards this ponderous folio and by the aid
of both hands threw it open. I saw that it blazed with paintings of Heraldic
insignia and that the text was all done with the pen instead of being printed.
`Now, Mr. Beufort, if you will explain to me the device you wish to trace?'
he said.
`Mr. Beufort looked at me. I felt my heart leap to my throat, my agitation
was so great. Now that I was about, perhaps, to decide the mystery of my
parentage
I felt nearly unequal to the command of my feelings. But as my
trepidation
was natural, I know that my readers will sympathise in it. With a face
from which I felt all the blood had retreated and with a forced composure which
my trembling hand belied, I handed him the original sketch made for the
carriage-painter
in Philadelphia, by the gentleman whom I supposed to be my
father. He glanced over it with a professional eye and then laying it down
repeated
as if to himself,
`Eagle
rampant
, serpent
couchant
talon grasping the head. He then turned
to the large book and began to throw over the leaves adding, `I ought to know
thisseems familiar! Can't think at this moment! Soon see! Very noble family
am sure! E,
eagle
. Here is the letter.'
He then ran his finger along the column of E's and arrested it on the word
`Eagle!' I had left my place and was looking over his shoulder. The word
was set down several times in conjunction with lions, bears, griffins, and then I
read `Eagle and Serpent.'
`Eagle and Serpent,' he repeated, `page 1009.'
`The Eagle and Serpent is the crest of the House of Arlborough,' said an
assistant
who was writing at the next desk.
`It is so! I thought I knew it! I should have recognised it at once! But then
we have so many, Mr. Beufort, that it is difficult to keep the line of each
running
in one's mind without confusion.'
`What Arlborough bears this device?' asked Mr. Beufort with interest.
`The Duke of Arlborough,' answered the Usher. `Here,' he added, turning
the leaves of the folio, `is the representation of the same crest opposite the name
of Arlborough. And over against it you see the shield and full arms of the
House!'
`Is there any other family in England that bears this crest?' asked Mr. Beufort.
`None. It belongs to the Arlborough's.'
`Then any gentleman bearing this you would set down as belonging to this
noble family?'
`Unquestionably.'
Mr. Beufort looked towards me and smiled encouragingly and well pleased;
but I dared not indulge the hopes struggling with a thousand fears in my
bosom.
`Can you tell me who belong to the existing family of the Duke?'
`Every member of it,' answered the Herald confidently; turning to another
volume and running his eye over a catalogue of initial letters. He then opened
to the page to which the list referred, and among numerous names of the house,
I discovered, with what emotions I cannot express, that of
`FERDINAND RUNDEL ARLBOROUGH,'
SECOND SON OF THE
DUKE OF ARLBOROUGH,
Born
January
6, 1802.
`That must be he who signed himself F. R. Marlborough. He doubtless
perflxed
the `M.' for disguise,' said Mr. Beufort. `Is he living now, Mr. Usher?'
`He isbut I believe dwells abroad. Some years ago there was a
misunderstanding
of some kind between him and his father the Duke, and he has resided
out of England ever since.'
`This fact strengthens your cause, sir,' said Mr. Beufort, turning to me and
grasping my hand. `Further investigation will, I am satisfied, prove your near
relationship to this person. To-morrow morning,' he added to me as we left
the Herald's Hall, not being able to learn any thing further from the Usher,
`you shall go with me in my carriage to visit the Duke. I have met him often
on committees and am known to him! We will see what we can learn there.'
In the morning, therefore, I shall depart from London on this visit. Its
result
shall be duly communicated by the next packet.
Yours truly,
`LITTLE MARLBORO'.'
CHAPTER III.
Arlborough Castle
, Northumberland,
August
2, 1844.
My
last letter, it will be remembered, left me on the eve of my departure for
the seat of the Duke of Arlborough in company with my friend Mr. Beaufort,
for the purpose of following up the investigation which had terminated at the
Herald's office. From the date of the present letter, it will be seen that I write
from the place to which we were destined. Yes, within the walls and beneath
the roof which I firmly believe to belong to the house of my fathers, I address
this letter to those who have taken an interest thus far in my fate. With what
emotions too I write! With what a trembling of the hand and throbbing of the
heart! Yet all is uncertain and doubtful. Nothing is revealednothing
established
to enable me to decide. Yet enough has been discovered to fill me
with hope and to lead me to believe that before twenty-four hours elapse I shall
have found out who are my parents!
I write in front of a deep gothic window which looks forth upon an extensive
park. A league of grand old oaks covering dale and upland stretch away
before
me, with here and there an open lawn in which deer are browsing. Farther
away still, peep from between two green hills a tower and a spire, the latter
like a needle of silver pointing man to his home above and indicating to him
the way. The tower is a huge ancient pile half-ruinous and marks the site of
what was once a cathedral. In the distance swell up blue misty hills with here
and there a sharp, bold peak piercing the sky. A glittering river winds through
the valley of oaks, and all around is visible one wide scene of beauty. And all
this vast domain appertains to the lord of this noble castle, who  but I
forbear
to anticipate! Twenty-four hours will reveal all! In twenty-four hours
all my hopes will be realised or forever crushed!
The room in which I am writing is a noble specimen of the gorgeous
chambers
of the Elizabethan age. It occupies the interior of a spacious tower, and
like it is six sided. It is hung with drapery, which is richly ornamented with
the work of the needle, representing field sports, hawking and fishing scenes,
and one or two battle subjects in which mounted knights with visors closed are
tilting at each other with long lances. The furniture is of a very ancient and
imposing character, being of black wood, elaborately carved, the chairs being
covered with embroidery. There are little ebony secretaries inlaid with ivory,
beaulets, bureaus, desks, supported by the feet of lions, and other articles for
which I have no name, all of curious forms and of the most antique and
elaborate
style of construction. There is in particular a large chair in which I am
now seated, the back of which rises high above the head and projects over the
sitter in the form of a canopy surmounted by a ducal crown. Upon the crown is
perched an eagle of gold holding in his talons a serpent which he seems to be
in the act of strangling. When I compare the device upon the Silver Bottle,
which I always carry with me and now have before me upon the table, with
this, I cannot describe the emotions that occupy my bosom. The one is the
exact connter-part of the other; and it would be more extraordinary if there
should be
no
connection between the two than if there should prove eventually
to be the closest; noble as is the proud family which claims this armorial sign,
humble as I am, without name, country or friends! nay, but have I but
one
friend, Dame Darwell my kind foster-mother! I have another tried friend too
in Mr. Beufort! With what anxious, feverish tumult of hopes and fears I look
forward to the morrow! I will try to banish this solicitude by recording what
has past up to this moment.
It was a beautiful morning when we left London. The sun never shone
brighter, and I looked upon his enlivening presence as a bright harbinger of the
future. After getting clear of the thronged streets, of the crowded suburbs,
we entered upon a magnificent turnpike along which our four post horses flew
at the rate of twelve miles an hour. We were whirled past countless
picturesque
country seats which lined the road, some half hid in foliage, others open
to the view in the midst of some lawn; others buried deeper in the country
amid the stately seclusion of olden parks. Some of them were pointed out to
me by Mr. Beufort as the summer abodes of several distinguished men, such as
Sir Robert Peel, Lord Brougham, the Earl of Lennox, and others. We also
passed in the course of the morning `a box,' as it is called, where Lord
Wellington
used to sojourn for a few weeks of the season, and also the seat of Lord
Cornwallis, who surrendered to Washington. We traversed many quiet
villages
,
picturesque and venerable, with moss grown roofs, centurial trees, and
ancient churches, looking, as all English villages look, as if they stood as they
stand now in the days of King John and bold Robin Hood. There is a repose
and an air of royal peace about these old English villages that are peculiarly
inviting
,
and awaken in the bosom of the observer a hundred agreeable emotions
of domestic happiness and seclusion. There were no new frame houses, new
fences, piles of lumber about the quiet streets, characteristics of all our
growing
American villages. The English towns look as if they were built and
finished
hundreds of years ago.
I have now an incident to record of the deepest interest to me as every one
will acknowledge who has followed me through my adventures. We arrived
at noon to dine and change horses at a pretty rural village, on the banks of one
of the loveliest rivers I ever sawa river that might have adorned the fields of
Eden; for lovelier, greener lawns, more majestic oaks, more secluded groves,
more shady copses and sunny uplands, more romantic islands, more
enchanting
meadows with grazing herds and bounding deer, interspersing and
animating
all, never have been, or will be found on earth.'
The inn at which we stopped was a large old rambling pile that had
entertained
cavalcades of Knights, and as the host informed us, had once in olden
times the honor of entertaining Queen Bess and her train. It looked large
enough to accommodate a hundred persons, yet it was but one story in height,
but it covered with its countless out-houses nearly a good English acre.
Before
the door, over which the eaves of the roof projected full eight feet, grew
two enormous and majestic oaks such as Druids in the pagan ages of the Island
chose for the scenes of their mystic rites. They flung their gigantic branches
not only over two thirds of the moss covered roof of the Inn, but over half the
village street. Between them stood a stone pump carved with grotesque
visages
,
and under the spout was a hospitable trough, at which a score of traveler's
horses might quench their thirst together. The pump bore the date, in quaint
old letters, of 1538. On one of the oaks was a plate, saying that it was planted
in 1375. Every thing in England reminds one of the past. In America all
that we behold raises in the mind the idea of the future! These two emotions
give complexion to the characteristics which distinguish the two nations.
We alighted from our carriage and entered the Inn. The host had come out
to receive us, and to welcome us with a degree of hospitality in his looks, tones
and manner that made us feel at home in his house. I am sorry to say that this
manner of receiving travelers is peculiar to the landlords of English Inns. At
American country Inns, the traveler if received at all, is received by the ostler
who takes his horse. He enters the bar-room and finds several persons seated
about. All stare at him, and he looks round for the landlord. Finally he asks
for him, and one of the persons in his shirt sleeves seated at his ease among the
group, with his feet upon a barrel, it may be, leisurely gets up and replies that
he is the personage, with a look as if he did not like to be intruded upon. On
the contrary the English host meets you as you descend from your carriage with
a smile, escorts you into his best room, with a pleasant word, politely, and
looking
as if he really desired to make you comfortable, asks what you will have;
and while you remain under his roof, he never intermits for a moment his
attention
to your comfort. But this is a digression.
We were ushered into a neat, old fashioned parlor with an oaken floor
polished
like brass; white curtains draped the little ancient windows, and a fire
place, in which an English ox might lie down without inconvenience, occupied
half of one side of the room. Comfortable old-fashioned arm chairs, stuffed or
cushioned, stood around inviting the weary traveler to rest his body in their
capacious
and luxurious embrace.
We ordered dinner and I walked out to look at the village, and survey the
exterior of an Inn which I was told by Mr. Beufort was a fine specimen of the
old English hotel. As I passed along the front, I turned to take a view of its
root with its numerous angular projections, turrets, and tower-like elevations,
when my eyes were arrested by a female figure in one of the windows. The
side of the person was turned to me, and a bonnet and veil concealed her face;
but my heart bounded with that instinctive recognition in which love is never
at fault! I knew that but one person in the world had that air, attitude, and
figure! But how could Emma be in England? Yet I was convinced that I
beheld her standing in the window. She was in conversation with a gentleman
advanced in years.His face was towards me, and I saw with increased hope
that the features were American. At this moment an empty post-chaise drew
up at the door. She turned and glanced out of the window at it, raising her
veil as she did so. It was the lovely face of Emma Field, every lineament of
which was engraven upon heart, soul, and memory!
I stood transfixed to the spot without power of motion. I was making an
effort to realize that I was waking and not dreaming, for such an unexpected
vision in England seemed as if it should belong rather to dreams than the
realities
of life! She directed her eyes towards me, for I was in full view of the
window not ten paces off. Perhaps my attitude of surprise and bewilderment
led her to observe me attentively. As I felt her gaze upon me the blood
mounted
to my cheek and brow! Our eyes met. She recognised me with a start and
an exclamation! I saw with deep, unutterable joy, that the exclamation was
one of pleasurable surprise. She looked a second time, smiled with a blushing,
animated countenance, nodded and her lips moved. Her looks, nevertheless,
expressed surprise at beholding me; while mine were bent on her filled with
adoration and trembling hopes.
The Postilions of the coach drawn up at the door now mounted their horses,
and at the same moment the American gentleman came forth with a lady I had
seen in the coach with Emma in Boston, leaning upon his arm. Emma was
following them attended by Russel Carryl. My pride and natural
sensitiveness
would have led me to shrink from observation, but a nervous desire to
know if she really despised me, and wished no longer to recognise one whom I
had no doubt she knew to be regarded by men with infamy, led me
involuntarily
to advance towards her as as she was about to enter the post-chaise. Her
foot was upon the step, when she hurriedly glanced around as if in search of
some one. Her eyes met mine. They must instinctively have translated their
sad and hopeless expression, for she smiled brightly though stealthily upon me
with a smile full of hope, for me and my love's daring ambition.
The next instant she was borne from my sight seated opposite Russel Carryl!
The sight of this young man whose baseness had led me to resign from the
Navy, and whom I had even in boyhood battled with on account of Emma Field,
the sight of him now in her society, and under circumstances which led me to
believe that he was her accepted suitor, (yet why that glance and smile of
encouragement
towards me from the lovely girl?) filled me with emotions of
wretchedness that drove me almost to madness! I believed that he was my
rival, my successful rival! else why this intimacy and this travelling in the
same carriage? But if he was not her suitor, I felt that he would so paint me
to her, whom I loved above all earthly objects, that I should be an object of pity
if not of contempt in her eyes. Hitherto he had not poisoned her mind against
me, else I should never have felt the sunshine of that parting glance thrilling
through and warming my soul. He had not recognised me now. For this I
was thankful, for I knew I should not be the victim of his malice while they
rode.
`Whither were they going?'
This thought no sooner occurred to me than I hastened to inquire at the Inn,
and ascertained from the host that he had heard one of the postilions say that
they were proceeding to London.
This incident gave a new turn to my thoughts. I confided the circumstance
and all the facts to my friend Mr. Beufort as the only explanation I could give
him of my change of manner.
`Fear nothing,' he said encouragingly. `You will yet triumph over your
enemies, and be rewarded with the hand of the maiden you so much prize!'
May his words be prophetic!
I was now more impatient to bring my investigations to a point. The sight
of Emma Field had inspired me with new ambition to succeed, dark and cloudy
as the horizon of my hopes with respect to her now seemed to me. But I find
I must commence a new letter, this having already been extended to an undue
length.
Yours very truly,
LITTLE MARLBORO'.
CHAPTER IV.
Arlborough Castle
,
Aug. 2, 1844.
For
more than half an hour after leaving the Inn, where I had encountered
in so remarkable a manner, Miss Field, I sat wrapped in my own thoughts,
which Mr. Beufort, (divining their character) suffered me to indulge. I was
inspired with new hopes, yet they were darkened even in their brightest
aspects
by the circumstances under which Emma had crossed my path, as the
travelling companion of a man I had so little reason to love as Russell Carryl.
Still I
hoped
, and being of too sanguine and buoyant a temperament to let
obstacles
stand in my way, I indulged, while I thought of Emma, the happiest
visions of the future. But
all
, all depended on the success of my present
mission
!
This reflection made me more earnest, more resolute in my purpose to
clear up the mystery attending my birth. Should I fail after all in proving
anything
,
I felt that the high hopes I entertained, of which Emma was the object,
would be forever blasted. But I did not suffer myself to contemplate failure.
We rode on through a eharming country, interspersed with villas, castles,
and sprinkled with churches, whose spires and turrets everywhere peeping
above the green oaks, gave a lively and picturesque aspect to the fair scenes
which we beheld from our carriage windows. England may well be called a
garden! It is every where beautiful to the eye! But I could not help
reflecting
as I gazed upon its pleasant vales and quiet villages, its stately country
houses and palace-like mansions of her nobles, how many of her children were
at that moment excluded from the enjoyment of these fair objects, shut up by
thousands in her factories, or immersed by ten thousands in her cavernous
mines! I felt that with all her glory, and beauty and power, and greatness,
England at last was but a land of taskmasters and slaves; that every ninety
nine of her inhabitants were slaves to the one hundredth! And my heart
turned instinctively to American,
`The land of the free, the home of the brave.'
About three in the afternoon, as we rose a hill from which there was a
prospect
of great beauty and extent, Mr. Beufort said, pointing to a noble castle
situated in the midst of the valley, surrounded by a park leagues in
circumference
,
`There, sir, is the seat of the Duke of Arlborough.' I turned my eyes in the
direction in which he pointed, with emotions I am unable to describe. I felt
my heart bound and my pulse leap. About four miles distant in the midst of a
magnificent area of woodland lawn and lake with a back ground of blue moun
tains, I beheld situated the place of my destination. It looked like a royal seat!
like a royal domain. As I surveyed it and let my eyes rove over the towers of
churches and the roofs of half concealed villages, and the far distant spires of
a large town, all of which Mr. Beufort informed me appertained to this estate,
my heart sank within me. I felt that I was daring and foolishly presumptuous
in prosecuting the search. I experienced a feeling of self-reproof for letting my
wishes to discover my parents suffer me to proceed to such lengths as I had
done!That the proprietor of that princely estate, that the proud Duke of
Arlborough
should in any way be any thing to me or I to him, a poor obscure
American, without name or birth, seemed all at once so preposterous and
absurb
and altogether so unlikely, that I suddenly laid my hand on Mr. Beufort's
wrist and said,
`Sir, I feel that I am very foolish! It is impossible that I should be
connected
with this noble house. The circumstances that have seemed to favor the
idea, are only singular coincidence without any reference to my case. My
courage fails me, and I am beginning to accuse myself of presumption.'
`Your feelings are perhaps quite natural, my young friend,' said Mr. Beufort
to me, smiling kindly; `but we must not be governed in this case by feelings.
The sight of the Duke's palace has no doubt presented a powerful contrast to
your own condition, and you view your situation in its light. But you must
take courage! The same motives and circumstances that had such strength in
London are equally potent now. Take courage and we shall see that all will,
somehow or other turn out as it ought to.'
I was in some degree encouraged by his words, and leaning back in the
carriage
I tried to calm myself and prepare my mind for the events that were to
follow. I was at length aroused from my reverie by the stopping of the
Post-Chaise
.
I looked out of the window and a cry of surprise involnntarily escaped
me. Before us was a stately gate-way, above which was an escutcheon, and
over it hovered an eagle in stone trampling upon a serpent. It was the very
gateway I had seen in my dream.
*
*
See Chapter VIII.
While I was looking at it utterly overcome
by this singular circumstance, a man dressed in black came forth from the
lodge by the gate for the purpose of throwing it open, when seeing me he
started
,
gazed earnestly upon my features, and then with great respect bowed and
opened the gate. This very man in black I had also seen in my dream, to
which I request my readers to turn back. We passed through the gate before I
could recover myself from my surprise. Mr. Beufort seeing my great emotion,
inquired the cause, and I related to him my dream!He was confounded with
wonder.
`All,' I said, as I looked out of the window, `is just as I then beheld it. The
same noble avenue of trees, the same lake around which the road wound!'
This identity so faithful filled me all at once with the most painful alarm; the
most distressing fears! for if I had seen the first part of my dream so faithfully
realized, should I not also find the tragical termination the same as I had then
seen it? I turned pale and trembled with feelings of unutterable anguish. We
approached a group of oaks upon a mound. As I beheld it, I said
`Sir, I am fated to find my mother here, and to find her dead! That group
of oaks I distinctly call to mind; and to prove to you how vividly all I beheld is
impressed upon my mind, we shall, after winding round it, come in sight of a
small lake with a fountain in the midst, and after passing round the lake and
crossing a lawn bordered by chesnuts we shall come in sight of the Castle!
It proved precisely as I had said. Mr. Beufort, as we came in front of the
palace, gazed upon me with looks of astonishment.
`A Providence seems to be in this, young man,' he said impressively. `Fear
not the result.'
I could not, however, but fear! The idea that I should prove to be a
descendant
of this noble House was lost in the reflection that my mother's spirit would
depart before I should behold her! This feeling was so strong upon me and
had such an effect upon my mind, that when the carriage drew up before the
terrace I did not wait to have the door opened by the footman, but throwing it
open myself I sprang from the coach and flew up the marble steps of the
Portico
,
up which I had been ushered in my dream! Heedless of the surprised
stare of the attendants I rushed into the hall, and lifting my eyes, anticipating
what I should see, I beheld at the extremity what I looked fora bas relief in
green marble of an eagle with his claw upon the head of a serpent! The double
door beneath it was partly open, and without hesitation I advanced rapidly
towards
it in hopes that I should at least obtain a parting looka glancea word!
from my mother's lips before she expired! For so vividly was my dream
impressed
upon my senses, that I had no doubt that I was hastening to her dying
couch. Passing through the doors I entered a circular chamber of great height
and splendor. It was hung with tapestry worked in gold thread. I recognised
this aparrment at a glance. Even the figures upon the tapestry were familiar to
me!
How then could I be otherwise than impressed with the idea that I was about
to see realized the subsequent portions of my dream? I sought with faltering
eyes for the couch upon which I expected to see the dying form of her who I
had been told was my mother. The place where the couch stood was occupied
by a marble-slab supported by pillars. Upon the slab lay reclined at full length
upon her side, as if asleep, the figure of a female exquisitely carved in the purest
marble. I stood before it petrified with amazement. The features were those
of her I had seen in my dream.
`She is dead then! She is entombed!' I cried in unspeakable anguish and
sorrow. `
I am too, too late
.' At this moment a gentleman entered from a door
behind this cenotaph, and without observing me knelt by the side of the marble
figure and gazed upon the features with sad tenderness. It was the face and
form of the same noble looking gentleman I had seen in my dream! How strange
that the dream so frithful in all else should have changed in the substitution of
the marble figure for the lonely corpse of the dead; a cenotaph for a couch!
When I beheld him enter and saw him kneel, the idea that I had at length
found only the tomb of my mother, overwhelmed me with such griefsuch a
crowd of emotions rushed upon me, that I tell forward and fainted at the base
of the cenotaph!
When I came to myself I found I was in this chamber from which I write and
lying upon a bed. By me sat bending over me with solicitude, the kind,
friendly
Mr. Beufort. Seeing that I was perfectly restored he allowed me to rise and
to put to him a series of rapid questions.
`It is now three hours since we arrived here,' he said, `and since you rushed
so wildly into the castle!'
`I owe, sir,' I said mortified, `a thousand apologies to youbut I recognised
every thing around me! the porticothe saloon, the chamber containing the
cenotaph were all as if I had visited them yesterday' How could I do
otherwise
than believe I should find my dying mother?'
`How extraordinary!' he exclaimed.
`In place of the couch of which I spoke to you was the cenotaph! In place
of the body of my mother, the marble effigy!All else was the same, even the
gentleman who came in and knelt by it! Oh, sir, was it not all a dream a
second
time! Did I really see such a gentleman? Tell me all!'
`Your entrance into the hall astonished every one who saw you! You were
supposed to be insane! I at once divined your object, knowing what I did of
your singular dream! I followed you as tast as I could, but we both being
unknown
to the servants, and our singular mode of entering the castle rousing their
suspicions, I was detained by the steward who seized my arm, while others
were despatched in pursuit of you!'
`How singular my conduct must have appeared!' I said, quite ashamed.
`It is all over now and will turn out right. I sent them for the Duke giving
my name, and was detained till an usher came and informed me that the Duke
was then out, but would return in the morning. I then was about to say I
must be permitted to find you, when I heard a cry of alarm, and a call for aid
from the circular hall in which you had disappeared. I, at once, with the
others
,
rushed forward, believing some fearful event had occurred touching you.
As I entered, I saw a tall man of singular dignity of person clad in mourning
bending over you. You were lying perfectly inanimate. I hastened towards
you, and as I came to your side I saw the gentleman was regarding you with
the most fixed and intense interest. `Is he hurt?' was my first exclamation.
`He has fainted, sir,' he answered, without looking up, still regarding your
features with extraordinary earnestness; and once I saw him glance from your
face to that of the effigy, as if mentally tracing out lines of resemblance!'
`It is astonishing, sir,' I said, deeply moved, as Mr. Beufort related this
incident
.
`I am overwhelmed with what I hear each moment! Is it possible I
shall at last prove to be related to this family? perhaps to be the son of this
noble-looking gentleman! I am lost in amazement!'
`He made no effort to resuscitate you,' continued Mr. Beufort, smiling with
hope and confidence upon me, `and alarmed for you I took upon me to order
the servants to bring water and restoratives. In the meanwhile, I addressed
the gentleman in the hearing of all, saying that you were a young friend of
mine, who with me had come to see the Duke on business of importance, but
that circumstances connected with the visit had rendered you highly nervous,
and that you had left the carriage and flown into the castle under a temporary
state of nervous impulse which was beyond your control!
`This was the best explanation I could offer; and it proved satisfactory to the
Steward, who immediately ordered a chamber to be prepared for you, and you
to be conducted thither. The gentleman had seemed to pay no regard to what
I said, but only continued comparing your faco with that of the sculptured
female
.
And on regarding it myself I was struck with the resemblance which
had evidently struck him.'
`Is it possible,' I exclaimed. `How singular is my destiny being wrought
out!'
`Wonderfully,' said Mr. Beufort. `I have no question whatever that you are
closely related to the Duke or some member of his family' The Steward
ordered
you to be raised from the marble floor, I saw without asking the
gentleman
,
who silently rising to his feet walked away and disappeared through a
door in the rear of the cenotaph!'
`The same by which I saw him appear,' I said.
`I followed you to this chamber where you were soon revived, and then fell
into a deep slumber!'
`How long have I slept?' I asked.
`Three hours!'
`It has refreshed and fully restored me. How strange are all these events!
Who is this noble gentleman?' I asked earnestly.
`I have not inquired,' answered Mr. Beufort. `I have not left the room
since you were conveyed hither. The Duke will be at home early in the
morning
,
and before twenty-four hours we shall know all that regards your fate!'
Such were the words of my benevolent friend; and being now quite
recovered
I urged upon him to go and walk in the Park, while I sat down to write to
good Dame Darwell what had occurred; a duty I have done as faithfully as
that I have enjoined upon myself in writing these letters. To-morrow,
therefore
,
on the return of the Duke all will be known! I tremble as the cries of my
fate approaches. Twenty-four hours may confirm all my hopes, or dash them
to the earth forever.
Yours truly,
`LITTLE MARLBORO'.'
CHAPTER V.
Arlborough Castle
,
August
4, 1844.
It
is with emotions of the deepest gratitude and happiness that I prepare to
address this letter to those who have taken sufficient interest in my affairs to
follow me through all the vicisitudes which have attended them. I address this
letter to such with feelings in which I am persuaded they will deeply
sympathise
,
sharing with me heartily my joysjoys tempered with sadness and
tender
regrets.
In my last letter I said that a few hours would decide whether the web of my
destiny would prove to be interwoven with that of the noble family under whose
roof I was then a guest. I will proceed with the events subsequent to that
letter
as they occurred.
After I had finished it and sealed it in the same package with one to good
Dame Darwell, I sat indulging the train of reflections to which the
circumstances
of which I found myself the centre naturally gave rise. I sat before
the gothic window which looked forth upon the town and park. The evening
was just closing upon the lovely woodland landscape; and the light of the
room was rich and mellow with the glow of the crimson sky. I thought of the
wonderful train of events by which I had been brought beneath the roof where
I then found myself! I recalled the wondrous dream and its almost exact
realization
.
Then came sad thoughts which clouded the bright and ambitious hopes
that I might yet prove allied to this noble house, sad thoughts if I were proved
to be so I should find no mother's smile to welcome back her long lost child!
This feeling modified the natural pride which would have filled my bosom at
the prospect of so noble a lineage. I felt if I could see my mother and be once
more embraced by her maternal arms, I would rather find her in a humble
cottage
,
than share the honors of a ducal palace without her!' From these thoughts
I dwelt upon the appearance of the noble looking gentleman, and recollected
that in my dream he had called himself my father! Could he be so? Would
the dream then be realized? If so, who was my father? Why is he in
mourning
?
Why is the cenotaph before which he kneels erected in the very centre
of the castle halls? Why did he bend over me with such tenderness? and
what connection is there between me and that lovely effigy that he should so
earnestly have been engaged in comparing with its lineaments my own? Why
did he suddenly resign me with such apathy? Had he been deceived in the
resemblance he fancied it excited, and which evidently had first struck him
on beholding me lying upon the pavement? Was he a person of importance in
the house? Why then did the Steward disregard him in removing me from
before
him without addressing to him a word or look?'
Such were the questions I put to myself! Such were the thoughts which
filled my mind. Then I let my imagination go forward and revel in power, and
rank, and praise of men! In these visions appeared Emma but I could never
disassociate her with the hateful form of Russel Carryl! Ever to my
imagination
he siood smiling triumphantly by her side! Wherefore was she now in
England? Suddenly an appalling thought flashed across my mind! I felt the
blood leave my heart and fill my brain! My head swam, and the windowthe
landscapethe room whirled round! Horrible, maddening thought! It was
that she was on her bridal tour! that she was Russel Carryl's
wife!
'
I sprung from my chair! I walked the room till I was in a fever! A knock
at the door recalled me to myself. Mr. Beufort entered. He was surprised to
see my agitation. I frankly told him the cause; for I kept nothing from him.
I poured out all my feelings into his bosom as into the heart of a father or elder
brother beloved! His arguments to disprove this notion allayed in a measure
my suspicions and greatly modified my fears. I again hoped! To-morrow I
felt would decide my fate in respect to my birth, and on the issue depended life
and happiness; for it I failed what other lineage could I claim! If I failed
how should I
dare
, branded as I was, appear in her presence as a suitor! I
should even shrink before the eye of Carryl.
But I will not detain my friends with my feelings. At an early hour I took
leave of Mr. Beufort, who sought his room; and being fatigued in body and
mind I threw myself immediately upon my bed without undressing. I know not
how long I slept, but it was dark and still when I suddenly awoke! A man stood
above my couch bending over me with a lamp in his hand, the light of which
he cast full upon my face! It was the stranger I had seen in my dream! It
was the gentleman whom I had beheld kneel before the marble figure upon the
cenotaph! His face was pale and haggard! The dark eyes were unnaturally
distended and brilliant. Yet over the whole countenance was a sad, touching,
tender expression as if deep grief lay upon his soul. He was steadfastly gazing
upon me when I opened my eyes I did not start! I did not feel alarm. I
lay passive and regarded him with an interest that left me no room for fear. Sad
and sorrowful though it was, a more noble, dignified human countenance I
never
beheld, and his stature was as commanding as befitted such an aspect! He
did not seem to notice that I had opened my eyes. He was speaking as if to
himself:
`Such, such would he have been! But Heaven has robbed me of my reason
that my memory of all the past may perish and I never behold him again! It
is her brow! and such was the expression of her mouth! In infancy my boy
had it thus, and in manhood thus would he have looked! But I am mad! I
am accursed!
She
sleeps in death and I live as if there were no more death!
He opens his eyes and looks upon me, and such eyes were hers! Thus Isidore
looked when alive!'
I was deeply moved by his words and tone of his voice. They thrilled to my
soul. They awakened chords which had never been stirred to the sound of a
human voice before. Tears came into my eyes I knew not wherefore. But I
could not restrain them! A sudden impulse seized me! I felt that I could not
resist crying out `my father!' and rising and casting myself at his feet! But I
could not stir! I lay powerless, while he steadily regarded me a moment longer,
and then slowly turned away and crossing the chamber disappeared by a door
near the table at which I had been writing, but before unnoticed by me as it
was hid by the tapestry. I was left alone and in darkness! I could not sleep!
This incident filled my thoughts and gave them food for hours! That this
gentleman
was my father I arrived at a suspicion that amounted almost to a
certainty
!
Had I discovered my parents to find one in the
tomb
, the other
mad
?
The thought filled me with anguish and horror!
At dawn I fell asleep, and three hours afterwards was awaked by the entrance
of Mr. Beufort. I told him what had passed during the night, and repeated to
him what had been said by the mysterious visitant! Mr. Beufort was for a few
moments thoughtful. He then looked up and divining my thought, said,
`I see what conclusion you have come to! It is irresistible in my own
mind! There is no doubt that you have discovered your father! But who he
is, remains yet to be ascertained; but he is, without doubt, of the Arlborough
lineage! We shall soon learn all. His Grace is looked for every moment. I
have foreborne to make any inquiries, or seek any information till I see him.
Breakfast is served in the anti-room to my chamber. Come and take it with
me. By the time we get through, the Duke will doubtless be here.'
I followed him with heavy and foreboding feelings. The idea that my
father
might prove a lunatic, my mother no more, filled me with sadness; and
qualified materially the pleasure I should otherwise have felt at the prospect of
discovering my parentage, and finding myself in alliance with one of the
noblest
houses in England.
I had just completed a hasty meal, when the sound of carriage wheels caught
my quick ear. I rose from the table and sprung to the window which
over-looked
the approach to the Castle. In the avenue was a travelling chariot and
two horses with out riders, dashing at speed up to the terrace. Upon the
panels
of the chariot I saw emblazoned the ducal coronet, and above it the crest,
an eagle trampling upon a serpent! My heart throbbed at the near approach
of the crisis of my fate! The carriage stopped; the door was opened, and,
attended
by two footmen, a stout, martial, noble-looking person of sixty-eight or
seventy, with locks as white as snow, and plainly dressed in an olive surtout
and white hat with a broad brim, got out without assistance. He aided to alight
a beautiful girl of twenty and a stately elderly female of sixty still handsome,
whom Mr. Beufort, who was now at the window with me, said was the
Duchess
,
whom he had seen often in his ware-rooms in London when he was in
business. The younger female from her resemblance, he concluded was a
daughter; `Though,' added he, `I am not acquainted with any of the Duke's
children, nor do I know what family he and the Duchess has! But we shall
know soon. An important era of your life is at hand now, sir,' he said
benevolently
,
seeing that I was becoming a little restless and nervous, `but do not
have any fears. I have all confidence in the issue! After the Duke has
breakfasted
,
I will ring for a servant and send him my card, with a request to be
allowed
the honor of an interview with him!'
`What shall you first say? How shall you introduce the subject, sir? You
are infinite kind to take all this trouble upon you,' I said, filled with gratitude
`If I was left to myself, I fear I should illy do my part.'
`That same energy which brought you to England would carry you through
whatever duty lay before you,' he answered me. `I have confidence in your
firmness and strength of character. All you are called upon for now is decision
and hope. The issue will be favorable.
While he was speaking a servant appeared, and said that the Duke, hearing
that two gentlemen from London were in waiting to see him, desired them to
be conducted at once to his presence.
`This promptness is characteristic of His Grace,' said Mr. Beufort. `In the
House of Lords he was always the most active and energetic man there, and
could get through more business in an hour than any other person in a day. He
is now in his seventieth year, yet has all the vigor and vivacity of forty-five!
You need not accompany me, sir,' he said as he was leaving the room. `I will
speak with his Grace first alone!'
Thus speaking he left me. I know not how I passed the interval of his
absence
.
It seemed to me to be hours. I paced my room! I tried to read! I
looked from the window! I busily run over in my fancy all that was
transpiring
in the progress of the interview on which depended so much!
At length I heard Mr. Beufort's foot-step. I flew, and opening the door,
admitted
him. His face wore a smile that chased a thousand dark thoughts from
my mind. He closed the door! I watched his countenance with painful
intensity
.
I dared not open my lips to ask him a single question; yet my bosom was
bursting with its fullness!
`My young friend,' he said, taking my hand after seating himself, `I have
had a most interesting interview with his Grace. He wishes to see you in a
little
while. In the meantime I will give you an account of what passed between
us! I followed the servant down stairs into his Grace's library, where he was
seated at a table opening and reading his letters by that morning's mail. On
seeing me he laid down a letter he was perusing, and rising, offered me his hand.
`Mr. Beufort, I am happy to see you, sir,' he said with that frank cordiality
and ease of address which has made him so popular in public life and given such
a charm to his social intercourse. `To what lucky circumstance am I indebted
for this visit from you. It is not light occasions that brings London gentlemen
so far down into the country. It is long since we have met! Time, I am glad
to discover, has treated you kindly as well as myself!'
`Your Grace,' I replied, `I am most happy to find you enjoying such vigor
and health. Time has indeed spared you!'
He smiled and said, `Yes; I find I can yet engage in the sports of the field,
and sometimes take a five-barred gate still, if I am sure the ground is soft on
the other side! Caution comes with old bones and sixteen stone, Mr. Beufort!
Sit down sir. You arrived last night, my Steward informs me!
`Yes, your Grace. I have come,' I added, thinking it best to bring the
subject
before him at once, `to see you in reference to a subject of the most
extraordinary
nature, and one in which is deeply involved, the happiness and hopes
of an estimable person.'
He looked at me with surprise and curiosity, and said courteously,
`Proceed, Mr. Beufort. I will hear whatever you have to communicate.'
`My lord,' said I, `if I seem bold, and appear to you to tresspass the limits of
that courtesy which is due from so humble an individual as myself to one of
your exalted rank, I trust you will extend to me your clemency!'
`Speak freely, sir,' he answered`From your manner, I see your business
with me is of no trifling import. I will be obliged to you to open the matter
freely to me!'
`I profoundly thank your Grace,' I replied; and then began by saying,
`Your Grace had a son by the name of Ferdinand?'
But the reply of the Duke, and the further account of the progress of the
interview
,
I shall leave to another letter.
Yours truly,
MARLBORO'.
CHAPTER VI.
Arlborough Castle
,
August 4, 184
I WILL now proceed to relate the particulars which my good friend Mr.
Beufort
made known to me touching his interview with the Duke. I will give the
account in his own words:
`My first question,' said Mr. Beufort, `after being seated, was, as I have just
repeated to you. Did your Grace ever have a son by the name of Ferdinand?'
I watched his countenance as I asked this question which I had put boldly
and at once as being most likely to bring the matter to a point. He became
suddenly pale, and I saw was deeply agitated. He fixed his eyes upon me in
silence with painful earnestness for a few moments and then said in a broken
voice,
`Mr. Beufort, be so good, I beseech you, as to explain why you have
addressed
so unexpected a question to me? I perceive there is something deeper in
your motive than mere curiosity.'
`I have a very strong motive, your Grace,' I replied; `I am influenced by
considerations that intimately concern the happiness and honor of a young
friend in whose behalt I have visited you and solicited the honor of this
interview
!'
`Will you first be so good as to name your motive in making this inquiry?'
he asked, still regarding me with intense emotion in his countenance.
`It will give me pleasure to do so, your Grace,' I replied, `if you will
condescend
to listen to me a few moments.'
`Proceed, Mr. Beufort,' said the Duke in a low voice, waving his hand to me,
and still looking distressed. I then began to relate to him the principal events
connected with your being left an infant at the Inn in America, and your
subsequent
course up to the time I saw you in London, with your hopes, wishes,
and researches in reference to your parentage. But I did not mention the
tokens
by which you were led to believe that you were related to his House. I
did not speak of the Silver Bottle, nor of the crest, nor the initials, nor the name
you had discovered. I gave him no reason, in the whole narration, to lead him
to suppose that your history had any reference to himself or any of his family.
He heard me through with patience, and not without interest at times apparent
in his countenance; but as I proceeded, the anxiety and agitation disappeared
from his expression, and towards the close he had recovered his calmness and
ease of manner.
`When I had ended he was silent and thoughtful a moment, and then said,
`This relation, Mr. Beufort, is certainly a very interesting one. The young
man you say reached London last week in this adventurous search for his
family
.
You told me he had certain tokens by which he hoped to trace his
parentage
.
I trust he will be successful, particularly as you say he is so worthy a
person, and, moreover, as you manifest so deep an interest in his welfare. Your
object, doubtless, in calling upon me is to enlist my interest in his behalf. I
assure you, my dear Mr. Beufort, it will afford me great pleasure if I can in any
way favor your views touching your young American friend!'
`I am under infinite obligations to your Grace,' I said; `the end I seek can
be advanced by your grace, by a reply to the question I put to you. That you
had a son of the name of Ferdinand I believe to be true; but I wish to know
particularly if he still lives, and if there has been any event of unusual
occurrence
in his life!'
`This is a surprising question, sir?' he said somewhat sternly.
`I beg pardon of your grace, but I must be plain and bold to come to what I
want.'
`I
had
a son, named Ferdinand, Mr. Beufort,' he said, after a moment's
agitation
.
`He is dead then,' I remarked.
The Duke looked keenly at me, and then said in a sorrowful and peculiar
tone, `Yes, he
is
dead,
dead
, Mr. Beufort!Why do you interest yourself in
him?'
`Pardon me, my lord; but I have reason to believe that the destiny of the
young American is, in a very intimate relationship, linked with his!'
As I made this assertion the Duke fairly started from his chair, and bent his
eyes upon me with extraordinary surprise.
`
How
mean you, sir? Your words seem full of some mysterious meaning.'
`I will explain, my lord Duke. If you will deign me a moment's calm
attention
,
you will understand the subject as clearly as I do myself. I hold here in
my possession the nursery bottle which was left on the bed with the infant!
Upon it is a crest doubtless that of the parents of the child. Here is the bottle
which the young man has had in his possession from infancy!'
I handed it to him. He looked at the crest and was transfixed with
amazement
.
`It is the crest of my house!' he cried with surprise. `Do you say this was
left with the child?'
`It was, my lord!'
`It is very extraordinary He mused a moment gazing upon it, and then
said, looking at me,
`On this you base your supposition, that there is some connexion between
this young man and my family?'
`I do, my lord Duke!' I answered.
`It is without doubt a singular comcidence,' he said, `and there are
circumstances
'
Here he suddenly paused, and a deep emotion passed across his features,
`It is singular, sir; but this alone is not enough to prove him to be attached to
my house!'
`Was Ferdinand, your son, never married?'
`Yes,' answered the Duke in a voice of deep agitation, and for a moment he
turned his face from me, and hid it in his hands. I was silent till he was
composed
;
but was convinced that there lay at the bottom of all this emotion a
secret
in which you, my young friend, were most deeply interested.
`Did he have any issue?' I asked, seeing him look at me.
`No!' he answered. `He had no issue!'
`It is very strange,' I said, perplexed at the reply so contrary from the
affirmation
I looked for. He spoke, too, as if he was not deceiving me, or disguising
the truth.
`Why is it strange? Why do you refer to Ferdinand in this manner, Mr.
Beufort?'
`For this reason, my lord. Circumstances lead me to believe that the young
American is the child of Ferdinand, and doubtless by a private marriage,
unknown
to your Grace; I mean a marriage prior to the one to which you have
alluded!'
I was proceeding when the Duke's expression arrested me. His face became
deadly pale, and he breathed quickly, while his lips trembled with powerful
emotion. He looked as if some strong and painful recollections of the past
were rushing upon him; at the same time I discovered in his countenance what
appeared to me to be awakened suspicion of the truth of what I had suggested.
Yet I was not sure that I rightly read it! I was moved by his distress and
regretted
I had gone so far; for I was satisfied that with this son were associated
the most painful recollections. At length he said, forcing a calmness I saw he
was far from feeling,
`I must apologise to you, Mr. Beufort, for this emotion. I can best do it by
explaining to you the cause. I feel you are a man of judgment and feeling,
Perhaps something yet may come of all this; for your words have awakened in
my mind suspicions that I confess may have some foundation. Hear the
history
of my hapless son, and then let us judge together touching the subject
more immediately before us.
`I
had
a son Ferdinand. He was my oldest son. Up to his twenty-seventh
year I never knew what it was to grieve for his conduct. He was handsome,
intelligent, high-spirited, generous, and devoted to me and his mother. He
possessed
every grace that could adorn the high rank to which he had been born.
He was our pride and the honour of our house. It was our wish to have him
suitably allied in marriage, and we had selected for him the lady Charlotte
Bellingham
,
the only daughter of the Earl of Neville, a lady of great beauty, and
endowed with every charm to fascinate and please, and possessed of every
quality
that could adorn a wife! She was five years Ferdinand's junior; and we
knew that already her prepossessions were in his favor. We one day, without
anticipating a refusal, for Ferdinand had long known her, and seemed to be
pleased with her society, laid open to him our hearts upon the subject. To our
surprise he said firmly that he could never regard Lady Charlotte otherwise
than as a sister! After recovering from the first shock of his refusal, I
endeavored
to urge upon him a change of opinion, and to show him that lady Char
lotte was the only suitable person by age and rank for his wife in the kingdom,
and that it was his duty to marry her. He firmly refused, and at length, to our
amazement, informed us that he was privately married to the daughter of a poor
baronet who lived not far distant, and a man whom I personally disliked. He
gave as the only reason for this step that he loved her, and that he could not be
happy out of her society, and that he would not purchase his own happiness by
her personal degradation. I threatened him with the displeasure of the King,
with immediate disinheritance in favor of his next brother, unless he at once
consented to a divorce; for this ill-advised union as you are well aware, Mr.
Beufort, was far beneath him, and it was my duty to annul it by the exercise of
my authority. He at once manifested a spirit of independence that surprised
and grieved us, and said that he would rather resign his rank than his wife!
Finding it impossible to prevail upon him, I dropped the subject. But, in the
meanwhile, I formed secretly a plan for separating them, by sending her away
privately to the Continent, where he should never hear of her again, trusting
time would cause him to forget this foolish passion!'
`Was the lady young and beautiful?' I asked.
`There was no fault to find with her youth or beauty, save that to her charms
was owing all this mischief. She was also of good temper and a
well-cultivated
mind. But still she was no equal for the heir of Arlborough. By some
means Ferdinand discovered our plot, and defeated it by flying with his wife to
the continent. There, being found out by my spies, he fled France, and, as we
supposed, went to Italy!'
`He may instead have gone to America,' I said quickly.
`I have had reason to believe that while he was supposed to be secreted in
Italy he was in America. What you have said has deepened this impression!
At length weary of persecuting my son, for he was still loved, I wrote to his
last address promising to restore him to favor and his rank, provided he had yet
no issue; for none of the blood of Sir Richard  should inherit the ducal
crown of my house. My chief object in inducing him to return to England
was with the hope that I should yet be able to induce his wife by large sums of
money to leave him forever. But I saw that if he had issue, their union would
be yet more closely cemented.'
`And did he return?' I asked earnestly.
`Yes. Within three months after my letter was written he appeared in
England
and came to visit me. To my question if he had any heir, his reply was,
I and my wife, my lord Duke, are alone in England. Your letter reached me
where I was self-exiled, and I accepted the terms. I am not insensible to the
rank and dignity of my birth and condition. I am proud of its honors. The
name of my fathers is precious to me. But I should feel unworthy to inherit or
to wear either if I could prove false to the lovely and confiding woman who has
in hour and trust given her hand and heart to me! Receive us both, my lord,
or receive neither of us! If I am to be honored as your son, honor her as your
daughter; otherwise we once more leave England, and leave it forever!'
`I felt it my duty for the present to assent to his views, and he and his wife
became inmates of the castle. But there was a settled sadness visible upon her
countenance. She seldom smiled. If she had not been the daughter of Sir
Richard  I should have felt interested in her; but as to this was added
the fact that she was the cause of our disappointment in the alliance we
contemplated
for Ferdinand, she was regarded by us with coldness and displeasure
that I now feel,' added the Duke with a tremulous voice, `deeply sorry for.
Day by day she failed, and seemed rapidly approaching the grave.'
`Doubtless the reflection that she had marred the high hopes of your House,'
I said to the Duke, as he paused as if checked by emotion; `preyed upon her
mind and brought on a deeline!'
Yes, and something evidently deeper still was upon her heart,' said the Duke
huskily. `Well,
she died!
Ferdinand up to the moment of her death had
watched over her with a devotion that was most lovely to contemplate. As I
regarded his tender devotion I almost repented my harshness to her; but this
feeling it was necessary to sacrifice to those higher ones which affected the
honor of my house. She died! From that moment a change came over the
mind of the widowed husband. He seemed to have buried his heart with her
in the grave. He would not quit the chapel where she lay entombed, and food
had to be brought to him or he would have perished. He spoke to no one!
He answered no questions! He did not smile! When I would approach him,
he would fix his haggard eyes sternly upon me, and with one hand pointing to
her tomb and the fore finger of the other raised to heaven, seemed to arraign
me before the tribunal of the Almighty as her murderer!'
CHAPTER VII.
Arlborough Castle
,
August, 4th, 1844.
`
When
the Duke had thus spoken,' continued Mr. Beufort, `he buried his
face in his hands, sighed heavily, and seemed to be overcome with the most
touching anguish. There was a few moment's silence: and when at length he
raised his head and looked at me I saw he was deadly pale.
`You see me, sir, a wretched man,' he said bitterly. `I can never forgive
myself the wrong done that innocent wife. I am punished in my son! He is
a maniac, sir! not fierce and intractable, but quiet, touching, gentle. As he
would not leave the tomb where his wife lay buried, I caused to be erected the
cenotaph which you beheld in the circular hall, to draw him from it I
succeeded
.
Near it he has a room which he only leaves to kneel almost every
hour before the marble figure of her he loved so well. It is so long,' continued
the Duke after a sorrowful pause, `it is so long since these events occurred that
my son is supposed to be dead, for no one sees him. He receives from me
every attention and kindness, but seems to regard me with cold indifferene.
It was he whom you beheld bending over the young man.'
`I then related to the Duke what I had observed,' continued Mr. Beufort,
`and how he seemed to be comparing your features with that of the marble face.
At this the Duke started and regarding me fixedly, oried
`Is it possible, Mr. Beufort that there was a resemblance?'
`There was a very close one, your grace. I was struck with it.'
`Then what do you thinkwhat do you suppose this young man is in whom
both you and my son have taken such an interest?'
`I have no doubt, your Grace,' I answered, `that he is the child of Lord
Ferdinand, your son!'
`It cannot be. They had no child!'
`They may have withheld, and doubtless did conceal from you the fact they
had any offspring when we recall the condition upon which your son was to be
re-instated. I have no doubt, my lord duke, that a son was born to them and
that he was left in the charge of this hostess of the Silver Bottle Inn. In a
word, the child whose history I have previously given you, is unquestionably
their son. They left him in America probably with the intention at some early
period to reclaim him; but the early death of the mother and the madness of
the father prevented the fulfilment of their wishes. The child, therefore,
remained
and grew up to a young man, when circumstances combined to induce
him to make efforts to ascertain his parentage. You have before you the Silver
Bottle left with him. Here is the sketch of the coat of arms made for the
carriage
.
On the back you see is a torn address to F. R. Mar. All the
other circumstances unite with
t
hese to prove this young man's title to your
name and blood!'
The Duke remained silent and thoughtful, and I could see that he was
deeply
moved. Suddenly he rose up and said impressively
`Mr. Beufort, if I could think this young gentleman should turn out to be
my grandson, I should be perfectly happy. I would acknowledge him with
joy. You say he his in the house. Let me see him. I would behold him!
Hasten and bring him hither!'
`I then left the library,' continued Mr. Beufort. `and came hither to seek
you! You must prepare yourself, my friend, for the interview. It is evident
that on your resemblance to his son your acknowledgment by him will depend.
He is satisfied, as far as the circumstantial evidence goes, that you
may
be the
son of Lord Ferdmand. Come with me and take courage!'
I took Mr. Beufort's arm, and, trembling with deep feeling, for I was greatly
agitated, as upon this interview hung all my hopes, I accompanied him through
a long arched gallery elegantly sculptured and adorned with paintings and
statuary
.
At its extremity we stopped before a door at which Mr. Beufort
knocked
lightly.
`Enter,' said the voice of the Duke. The sound sent the blood from my
heart to my brain like lightning.
Mr. Beufort opened the door and I entered with him into the presence of the
venerable nobleman. He was standing in the middle of the room and had his
eyes fixed stedfastly in the direction of the door. As I entered and he saw me
clearly, he clasped his hands together and uttered an exclamation of mingled
amazement aud joy.
`It isit
is
my son. It is Ferdinand. Come hither and let me see thee
more fully.
I advanced and impulsively knelt before him. He gazed upon me a few
moments
with deep earnestness and then bending down took my hands and bade
me rise that he might embrace me. He folded me to his heart and his tears
bedewed
my cheeks mingling with my own.
At length he became composed; and leading me to a seat bade me to sit
down, while he took a seat close by my side and held my hand in his. In this
manner he sat and studied the lineaments of my countenance. Finally, he
turned to Mr. Beaufort and said
`I am satisfied, sir. He looks like my son at his age. One is the other's
counterpart! I also see about the mouth the likeness of that injured woman,
his mother! Young man,' he sald, addressing me, `I have heard all your story
and am convinced that you are my own blood!'
`And my fathermy mother, sir?' I asked eagerly. `Is it true that I shall
never behold them?'
`She, alas, is no more. He is alive, but he cannot know you. He knows no
one. I will be to thee in his stead, my child! But this is sad talking. Let
me hear you relate your history! I would know all from your own lips.'
As soon as I was able to compose myself, I proceeded to give him a brief
account
of the circumstances of my life, as they have been made known to the
reader. He listened attentively for full two hours. When I had ended he
knelt down and lifting his hands thanked God for vouchsafing to him in his
old age so great a blessing as beholding the child of her who had died beneath
his roof, that he might atone in him for the wrong of which she had been the
innocent victim. He then warmly embraced me; and taking Mr. Beufort by
the hand thanked him with the most grateful sincerity and fervor for the deep
interest he had taken in my fortunes, and for placing in his possession one so
long an exile from the house of his ancestors.
My feelings at this happy crisis of my fortunes I will not attempt to
describe
.
I was full of joy, gratitude, hope and love. I found it difficult to
realize
the truth, and had to make an effort to convince my reason that all was
real and not a dream. At length the full force of my happiness rushed upon
me, mingled with which were the loved features of Emma Field, and I wept
for very joy. There was now no obstacle to my love. How did my heart throb
with impatience to throw myself at her feet and assure her that I was no longer
unworthy of her, an adventurer without name or birth!
In the meanwhile the Duke and Mr. Beufort were talking together.
`It is possible his father, Lord Ferdinand, may recognize him,' said Mr.
Beufort
.
`The trial shall be made! You say he was comparing his features with that
of the effigy upon the sarcophagus?'
`Yes, my lord.'
`Then an interest has been awakened. It is as you say, barely possible the
son may succeed in drawing him out of himself. They must meet.'
`It were best to let our noble young friend enter the vestibule as if by
accidentt
,
and when he comes forth to kneel beside the sarcophagus, as he is wont
to do, to let himself be seen. I have no doubt that from the intelligence and
memory the sight of him before awakened in him that by judicious
management
he might gradually be brought out of himself and restored to his
intellect
.
Like things have been in the history of lunacy, my lord.'
`It is too much to hope for,' answered the Duke.
`I will do all that my heart and filial love can dictate,' I answered earnestly.
`If lord Ferdinand could be restored by any means, his acknowledgment of
having left an infant son in America would forever put to silence every doubt.
I do not question this dear young man's right to my name and lineage, Mr.
Beufort. I freely and will openly acknowledge him my grandson. He bears
the impress of his ancestral name upon his brow and form. He who looks upon
him will bear witness he is an Arlborough. No, Mr. Beufort, I only desire, as
you must, the seal of this confirmation, which none can give but my poor
Ferdinand
.
Shall we make the trial to-day? This evening, at sundown, he will
be sure to be kneeling there. Perhaps then will be the best time to make trial
of the effect his son may have upon him. If the Interest he took in him at
first arose from broken and confused images of memory it is probable they may
a second time unite, and link, and form a continuous chain from the past to the
present. It may prove the key to the restoration of his reason.'
`God grant it may, my lord,' answered Mr. Beufort, to which I devoutly
responded
an audible `Amen' from my soul's depths.
This evening, therefore, I am to make the trial to endeavor to obtain my
father's
recognition. I tiemble lest all should prove vain, and I shall be unknown
to him for ever. Alas? for my mother, I have already wept bitter tears. To
feel her maternal heart throbbing against mine would give me more joy than to
have bound upon my brow the ducal coronet of my ancestors.
CHAPTER VIII.
Arlbororough Castle
,
August
4, 184.
I have now to record one of the most interesting events of my life, and one
which has been to me the cause of infinite happiness and gratitude. In a
word, I
have been recognized and acknowledged by my father!
His reason at
my interview returned, and  But I anticipate the narrative of the
circumstances
,
and will at once proceed to relate them as I promised in my last
letter.
It will be remembered that the time set for me to see him was at the hour
of sunset, at which season it had been long his custom to leave his private
chamber adjoining the cenotaph and kneel beside it as if in worship. As the
moment approached in which I was to make this trial, in its results so
interesting
to me, I became greatly agitated, and feared that my feelings would so
far overcome me as to render it impossible to go through with the painful
scene I had to enter upon. At length the shadows of the setting day began to
gather upon the woodlands, and the last lingering glow of sunlight fade from
the edges of the hills, and the moment of trial was at hand!
His Grace came to me and taking me by the hand embraced me like a
father
,
and then, attended by Mr. Beufort, we left my chamber and proceeded
towards the hall of the cenotaph. At the outer door the two gentlemen
remained
,
and opening the door I entered alone, leaving it ajar, that they might
be spectators of what ensued. The saloon was unoccupied, for it wanted yet
three minutes to the vesper hour. I had intentionally come in before him, that
I might better compose myself for the part I had to act in this interesting affair.
With feelings that I find it impossible to describe I slowly approached the
cenotaph
,
and kneeling reverently by its side, I gazed with awe and filial
tenderness
upon the marble resemblance of her who I believed to be my mother. As
I gazed I insensibly forgot my object in being there, and with tears in my
eyes and clasped hands I let my thoughts wander to the past days of her
unhappiness
,
and in recalling these I then ceased to regret that she had passed
away to scenes of unalloyed enjoyment. In my imagination also, I began to
invest the white, cold and immoveable marble with the hues and motion of life,
till I seemed to be kneeling by the side of her who only slept, and whom a
touch, a whisper from her child would awaken.Impressed with this feeling,
I impulsively extended my hand and laid it lightly upon her clasped fingers,
and said in a voice that startled myself for its depth and intensity of mingled
love and grief,
`Mother! mother, arise! It is your son who calls you!'
At this moment I heard a step, and looking up beheld gazing down upon
me across the cenotaph, Lord Ferdinand! He stood looking calm, sorrowful,
and yet fearfully stern, his tall person and dignified air giving him an
appearance
at once lofty and commanding. I was instantly recalled to a sense of the
task before me, and my self-possession returned. I saw his eye was fixed upon
me with a look of mingled wonder and anger. He surveyed me, as I kneeled,
for some moments in silence! At length he addressed me in a voice that
thrilled to my soulfor nature told me that it was the voice of my father:
`Who art thou that darest to kneel by this sacred shrine? Who art thou
that callest upon the dead? Speak! This spot is sacred, and he who
profanes
it must purify it with his blood! Say, who art thou?'
`Father!' I answered, scarcely able to articulate the word from the strength
of my emotions, which well nigh suffocated me.
`
Father!
' he repeated slowly; and thrice he repeated the word, each time
with increased bitterness. `Yes, I had a father! But I will not tell to strange
ears the tale! No! I had a wife, too! Oh,
such
a wife! Angels did love
her while yet she lived, and angels are her companions now!' And elevating
his finger he remained a few moments silently and impressively pointing
heavenward
.
All at once he cried in a voice of thunder,
`But who art thou that darest to kneel here?'
`Her child!'
`Her child! Ha, ha, ha!' and he laughed wildly and fiercely. The
expression
of his features was truly terrible. `Yes, she had a child! But  but
Oh, my poor mad brain! Oh, thou Duke! Thou  but hist! he is my
father
!
I may not speak against him. She lies here now! Oh how full of
gentleness
and joy was thy spirit, my beloved! How soft with love beamed thy
eyes upon me, how like chords of a well-tuned harp my heart-strings sounded
the touches of thy gentle words! But thou livest now only in memory!'
`She was very lovely, my lord?' I said, seeing him pause and gaze with
sorrowful
tenderness upon the beauteous features of the marble face, wishing to
draw him to converse with me.
`Her countenance, fair as thou seest it there, was but a rude mirror
imperfectly
reflecting the divine beauty of her soul!'
`My lord, you said but now she was a mother! What became of her child?
`Did I say she was a mother?' he cried hoarsely. `Hush then, and do not
repeat it! It must be kept a secret! The dukedom rests upon it! Aye it
does hang upon it! Be silent, if thou knowest it! By and by he will be
found, and then upon his noble brow I will place the coronet of his house!
But hush! It must not be breathed to the winds!
She
who lies there, and
I
are sole keepers of the secret!'
The loud, cautious, impressive voice in which he spoke this thrilled to my
soul. Every word was overheard by the Duke and Mr. Beufort, for though he
spoke in a whisper, it was singularly deep and distinct, reaching the remotest
corner of the saloon. While he was speaking he came round the cenotaph
and stood by my side. I still knelt; for in such a presence! my mad father
and my mother's shade! I could only kneel in awe.
`I will keep the secret, my lord!'
`I know that you may be trusted. I know thee not, nor why thou art here;
but there is a spirit looks out through thine eyes that I love!'
`Where, my lord, is your child?' I asked, with as much composure and
firmness
as I could command.
`Breathe it not above thy breath!' he said, seating himself upon the
pedestal
of the cenotaph and laying his hand impressively upon my arm, while his
eyes surveyed me with a peculiar intensity mingled with kindness that seemed
to me to be parental, though he himself was unconscious of the source of this
regard. `I
had
a boy! A brave, beautiful boy! He was an infant! I saw
him only as an infant, but he is gone!
gone!
gone
too?
' This was uttered
with the most touching melancholy.
`Dead?' I asked with my heart on my lips.
`Dead! Yes, dead,' he replied, speaking to himself rather than to me. `Are
not the lost dead? Yes, he is dead, for I know not where he is! My poor,
cracked brain! I cannot guide its thoughts or memories! When I would think,
all becomes chaos! Oh, if I could remember
where!
I should not be mad.'
He rose up and walked to and fro before the shrine, his hands clasped across
his forehead, and his face eloquent with the anguish of the bitterest woe. I
rose, also, and gently placed my hand upon his arm: for I knew I held the key
the talismanwhich if properly used would unlock the store-house of
memory
.
I felt that if he could once be brought to a certain definite point of past
time so as to recognise it, he could then be led down to the present moment,
and reason would once more recover her lost path.
`My lord,' I said, in the kindest tones I could assume, `you have been
pleased to regard me with favor! Will you suffer me to hold a few words of
conversation with you?'
He looked me steadfastly in the face and then smiling with an affection in
his glance that brought tears to my eyes, answered,
`Yes, I will listen to you, for you speak to me in the tones of her I loved!
Speak! but I will gaze on you, for you look upon me with the eyes of my
beloved
!'
`My lord,' I said, `I will speak of your son.'
`
Softly
, though,' he said, with an air of fear. `Softly; for this must be
known only
to us three!
Did I not tell thee how the Dukedom hangs upon it!
No, it must not be known! But I care not for the Dukedom! I did once, and
did wickedly by deserting my poor boy! hoping to get him again; but God
has punished me in taking away my memory. Dost thou know, young man, I
am mad for the cause that I have forgotten where we left our boy! Sometimes
I fancy 'twas at an Inn in the vallies of Switzerland; then I think 'twas in an
auberge
in the South of France! Then again I am persuaded he was drowned
in the Atlantic.'
He said this with a painful expression of perplexity and grief upon his
haggard
yet noble countenance.
`You crossed the Atlantic then, my lord?' I asked eagerly.
`I forgetmethinks we were cast away and lost on the voyage! I remember
a great storm! Yet, no! if we had been lost I had not been here, you know,
nor
she there
.' [It will have been observed that in alluding to his wife, that he
invariably seemed to regard her as actually before him in the cenotaph] `But
my poor brain wanders!' and he placed his hand to his brow.
`My lord,' I said taking his hand and seating him upon the pedestal, `I will
tell you a tale.'
`Marry, I should be right glad to listen! I could listen and look in thine
eyes forever.'
`In America, my lord, twenty-six years ago, there drew up to a small inn
not far from Boston, a carriage, containing a gentleman and his wife, both in
mourning. Does my lord listen?'
I received no reply, but with both hands he laid a firm grasp upon my wrist
and rivetted his eyes earnestly upon my face.
`The carriage was yellow and driven by a negro man! They alighted, this
gentleman and lady, who seemed overcome with grief. They entered the inn
and were followed to a distant chamber by the negro, who carried beneath his
arm a covered basket, about the safety of which the lady seemed to be very
watchful, giving the man many an anxious and careful caution. They
remained
an hour or two and then ordering their carriage, though it was already
sun-set, they left the inn, taking the basket with them. But now comes the
point of my story, my lord. An hour after their departure, the landlady
hearing
the cry of an infant followed the sound and entering the room they had
left, found lying upon the bed'
`A child? An infant? a boy?
my
boy!
Her
son!' cried out lord
Ferdidinand
,
catching the words from my mouth and speaking in a loud and
terribly
excited tone, a tone in which the wildest joy was mingled with trembling
hopes. I had watched the glad dawning of intelligence as I spoke, diffusing
slowly yet surely, the light of intelligence over the night of reason and
oblivion
.
I had seen with joy, the progressive unfolding of the portals of his
memory
,
and anticipated the certain recognition which followed.
`It was a male infant, my lord, and doubtless left by travellers. In its
hands it held grasped this Silver Bottle.'
As I said this I drew from my bosom the bottle and placed it in his hands.
He looked at it a few moments with an indescribable expression, or rather
crowd of expressions upon his face; for his countenance underwent
surprising
changes as he held it. Slowly he sank upon his knees and lifting his hands
to heaven he bowed his head with a look of inexpressible gratitude upon his
breast, and said in a voice I shall never forget,
`God, I thank thee?'
He remained silent a few moments, and then rising turned to me and said
in words broken by emotion
`And the childthe childthe infant? Diddidit
live?
'
`It did, my lordit lives still!'
`Still! Oh, tell me where! tell me that I may fly to him! He is my child!
He is
her
son! Heaven has sent thee here to throw the light of memory upon
my shattered brain, and I once more behold the past. That gentleman and lady
were myself and she who sleeps there! We did wickedly in deserting our
little one, but we knew in whose kindly hands we left it, hoping in a few short
months to have it restored! But the wickedness of those who compelled us
to this step is greater far. And I, in my ambition, did urge thee to it, gentle
wife! But I know thy gentle spirit forgave me ere it fled!' He paused,
overcome
with inward feelings. At length he raised his head and said earnestly,
`You tell me my boy lives!'
`He does, my lord!' I answered scarcely audible, and trembling with the
deepest emotion.
`Where? I will fly to embrace him. I will kneel at his feet and implore
his pardon. Tell me where my boy is: my
child
. That I may fly to his
embrace
!'
`
Here
, my noble lord!
here
, my
father!
Behold!
your son kneels to you for
your blessing!
'
He gazed upon me for a moment with the light of instinctive recognition
growing brighter and clearer in his parental eyes and then, with a loud cry,
cast himself into my arms.
CHAPTER IX.
The author of `Silver Bottle' to the reader:
Dear Reader
,
Having, in the last chapter, brought our story down to that point where our
hero is recognized and acknowledged by his father, we shall now pursue the
narrative in our own words, `Little Marlboro' having
with this event
, closed his
correspondence.
After his extraordinary recognition by his father of his claim there
remained
no doubt whatever of its validity in the mind of the Duke, if there had
been any before. He was acknowledged by him with new testimonials of
affection
;
and lord Ferdinand, entirely restored to his reason, tenderly
embraced
the Duke, and then in a very clear manner gave a full account of the
circumstances
connected with the desertion of his infant.
`It was my
fault
and my
crime
,' he said with emotion. `My lovely wife with
tears, entreated me to regard more my child's and her happiness than the rank
and title, with the loss of which I was threatened. But too ambitious, yet
loving my wife and infant with the deepest tenderness, I urged the step we
finally took, though it nearly broke her heart. We then returned to England,
andthe rest is known!'
Lord Ferdinand then embraced his son, and it being noised that a son of
Lord Ferdinand had arrived and that he recovered his reason on seeing him,
the castle was filled with the greatest rejoicings.
After the lapse of a week spent in congratulations and festivities, during
which time our hero, `Little Marlborough,' had been re-baptized by the name
of
Henry Frederick
, Mr. Beufort said that it was now full time for him to
return to London. He said he had never been so happy in his life and
should always congratulate himself on having been instrumental in bringing
about so much joy. Our hero having now been fully recognized to be the son
of Lord Ferdinand and his claim to the title unquestionable, it is to be
presumed
that he experienced that high degree of happiness that must necessarily flow
from the favorable result of his long and persevering researches after his
parentage
.
The high rank he had acquired, the elevated position in society he
all at once found himself in, did not so much fill him with gratification, as
the reflection that it rendered him worthy of her whose love had been the
guiding
star of his wandering barque through all his reveries. Of the beautiful
Emma Field he first thought, and he felt that his happiness could not be
perfect
unless shared by her. He therefore resolved to obtain permission of his
newly recovered friends, and, in company with Mr. Beufort, visit London.
Reluctant as the Duke and his father were to part with him, they finally
consented
on the condition that he would be absent but a week.
`If you are away longer than that, my lord Henry,' said his Grace, `I and
your father will be posting up to London after you. But as you say you have
some private businets you desire to transact before you appear before the
world in your own proper rank, go with Mr. Beufort. By the by, Mr. Beufort
I wish you to be my grandson's banker to any amount he may require while
in London, and pray, my good lord, take care of your health. We have found
you too recently to lose you again!'
`I assure your grace,' answered lord Henry, `that I shall do nothing that
may bring upon me the reproof of those to whom I owe so much! Farewell,
my honored father! I trust on my return your health will be quite restored.
Nothing but the most pressing affairs would draw me from you at this time!'
Taking a tender farewell of these and others of the family who were
present
,
lord Henry sprung into the carriage which was in waiting. He saw that
its pannels bore the crest of an eagle strangling a serpent; and his bosom
glowed with pride and gratitude that he was now no longer a wanderer
without
any other clue to his family than the Silver Bottle and its device.
After a rapid and pleasant journey they reached London. As they were
entering the metropolis Mr. Beufort said,
`Now, my lord, as you have frankly told me that you have come to town to
find out your American beauty, what are your first movements?'
`To ascertain where she isseek her, declare my passion, and if she will
make me so happy, I will make her my wife!'
`If you find she is engaged or really married to Mr. Russel Carryl?'
`Impossible! I am convinced their meeting was the merest accident. He
could never be any thing to her!'
`Well, there is no doubt now that you will eclipse him!'
`I do not intend to do it by my rank and title, Mr. Beufort. I mean to keep
them secret from her!'
`And if she accepts you?'
`Declare
then
my true name and rank!'
`If she refuses, you can also declare them, and no doubt greatly to her
vexation
!'
`Do not speak of refusal. I am persuaded I have an interest in her heart.
She knows my past history, and the cloud that hung over my name has been
the only obstacle both to her more open demonstrations of affection as well as
it has been of my own!'
`If such is your intended course, my lord, you had best drive, as the coach
is yours and bears your arms, to the C Hotel in Regent street, and put up
there under your proper title and rank. You need not be seen, but take
private
rooms and remain in them till I can ascertain for you where about your
American friends are putting up. I will go about it at once, as soon as we
reach London. Possibly they may be at the C. We can inquire as we
drive there!'
Shortly after this conversation, the travelling carriage of the Duke of A
was announced as being drawn up before the door of the C Hotel. The
excitement among the servants and so up to the proprietor was in proportion
with the rank of the personage named. From it alighted not the Duke, but a
young gentlemen and an elderly gentleman, in whom the host recognized Mr.
Beufort.
`I thought my lord Duke had honored us,' said the proprietor looking a
little
disappointed.
`Not the Duke in person, but his grand-son, lord Henry.' answered Mr.
Beufort
.
`He has been absent abroad for years, and but recently returned!'
This explanation was sufficient. Lord Henry was ushered into the hotel,
and escorted to the finest suit of apartments; and it was not long before it
was known to most of the nobility sojourning in the C, that a grandson of
the Duke of A had arrived in England and was then in the house.
Lord Henry kept himself very close for the remainder of the day, leaving
his good friend Mr. Beufort, to make such inquiries touching the Field family
as would be necessary, he being better acquainted with London, and more
likely
to be successful; besides our hero did not wish to appear abroad as lord
Henry
A until he had seen Emma. About eight o'clock in the evening a
servant entered and said with that profound respect characteristic of English
footmen in addresing titled personages,
`My lord, a gentleman below desires an interview. He had no card, but he
gave his name as Buffet!'
`Mr. Beufort! Show him up!'
`I will, my lord!'
Our hero's heart throbbed violently during the absence of the servant; for
he expected that his friend was the bearer of news, from the party in which
he was so much interested. The next moment Mr. Beufort entered, and lord
Henry saw at a glance that he had pleasant news.
`You have seen them?'
`Yes, my lord. But sit down and I will tell you all about it. After some
little inquiry I learned that the family you seek, were at No.  R
Terrace
.
Thither I drove at once, and as it was a hotel, I alighted and went in. I
soon found that the party consisted of Colonel Field and lady, Miss Field, and
Mr. Russel Carryl!'
Lord Henry turned pale and bit his lips, while he took a quick turn across
the room and back again. He then repeated impressively, `
Miss
Field! They
are
not
married!'
`Be calm, my friend. You have nothing to fear from that quarter!'
`Are you sure?' cried lord Henry earnestly.
`Quite. I will tell you how I learned. Taking advantage of my years, I
thought I would call upon the lady in person, and have a quiet
tete a tete!
I
first, however, ascertained that her father and mother had gone out. I then
sent up my name to see him, closely following upon the heels of the servant.
On opening the parlor door and announcing me, a piano which was playing
ceased, and I heard a very sweet, pleasant young lady's voice reply, that her
father had gone out, but would return in half an hour.
`I will then, with your permission, Miss, wait his return, I said, entering the
room. Seeing my grey hairs, and doubtless observing that I had a
respectable
appearance, at least that I didn't look like a burglar, she rose and politely
invited me to be seated!'
`Emma! beautiful, charming Emma! Oh, how greatly do I envy you, my
dear Mr. Beaufort, the having been in her presence.'
`We soon entered into conversation, and I must give you credit, my lord, for
excellent taste and judgment; for a young person of greater personal charms
or a more cultivated mind, I have rarely seen. From one thing to another I
led her on, till I learned that they were travelling for the benefit of her father's
health, and had been in England two months, and were in a few days to leave
for Paris!'
`Not if I have the eloquence and influence to detain her,' said our hero very
positively.
`Perhaps it will turn out that you have, my lord,' answered Mr. Beufort,
smiling. `I then remarked that there were many Americans in England, and
that I had recently met with one, a young gentleman in whom I had been
deeply
interested. I saw at once by her countenance that she was thinking of you,
for love's object is always uppermost in the thoughts.
`Of whom do you speak, sir?' she asked, coloring, and her voice slightly
tremulous, as if she feared, yet hoped I should name you!'
`Me? Oh, could it be that I held such quick place in her thoughts! Ah,
Mr. Beufort, I dare not hope!'
`Hear me, and then judge, my lord. I answered her, that the young
gentleman
I alluded to had, when an infant, been left by his parents at an Inn in
America, near Boston, kept by a certain Dame Darwell. That this good
woman had reared him as her own son: but that having come of age, and
through rivalry, having incurred the hostility of a young man of wealth and
birth, he had been defamed by him as a person of infamous birth! This fired
the young man to seek proof of his lineage; and after various adventures, he
was led by circumstances to visit England, believing he should here find what
he sought, viz., proofs of his honorable birth. One chief motive that spurred
him on,' I added, seeing that she listened with the deepest and most earnest
attention
,
as if she was aware I spoke of you, `one chief motive that led him to
make such exertions to discover his parents was
love!
'
`Love?' she repeated with a glowing cheek, and with an animated manner,
that showed how profoundly her senses were enlisted in my words.
`Yes, lady,' I answered. `He had from earliest youth loved a beautiful
maiden, and this love grew with years, till manhood confirmed his passion, and
it became part and parcel of his being. He at length would have woed her,
and doubtless would have won her, for he was worthy of her; but that cloud
upon his birth, darkened by the gratuitous calumnies of a rival deterred him;
and hiding his deep love in the secret chambers of his own bosom, he went
forth to seek for proof to confute this calumny, and clear his name from an
imputed
stain which would else forever bar him from seeking an honorable
alliance
with the idol of his soul. His researches, as I have said, brought him to
Enaland, where a singular circumstance connected with his search, brought
me in contact with him!'
`His name, sir?' she gasped, clasping her hands together, and bending
earnestly towards me.
`Marlboro' Darwell!'
`The same!' she answered; and turning deadly pale (for she had been
alarmingly red and pale by times, as I was speaking, I had to support her with
my arm to save her from falling. She soon revived and said, with an
embarrassment
that made her most interesting.
`Pardon me, sir! I suffered my feelings for a moment to get the better of me!
Your narrative has interested me. But, sir, did  (here she hesitated, and
then continued with greater firmness), did this young gentleman tell you who
who
.' She stopped short. But I finished the sentence for her, by
saying,
`Who the young lady was?' Yes, the lady. But I don't know that I ought
to tell it. But as I trust you will keep the secret, I will divulge it. There it
is!' And I placed in her hands
one of her own cards
, which I had taken up from
the table. She blushed as crimson as a peony at sun-rise, and then the bright
tears, like great globules of dew rolled sparkling over her cheeks. She smiled
through them a moment afterwards, and said sweetly,
`Sir, I do not know, but as you are a friend to Mr. Darwell, you shall be my
friend. I freely confess to you that .'
`What?' cried lord Henry, rising, and seizing his friend by both hands.
`Sit down, good, my lord, and you shall learn,' answered Mr. Beufort,
smiling
.
Lord Henry re-seated himself and remained as composed as he could, while
Mr. Beufort thus continued:
`Said she to me, `As you, sir, are Mr. Darwell's friend I will also regard
you as mine. Frankly, sir, I confess to you that he is a person by no means
indifferent to me. I have long entertained the kindest feelings towards him.'
`Said she so much in so many words, sir?' cried our hero.
`In so many words, my lord. I give her own language. I then expressed
to her the happiness I knew this intelligence would give you, and when I
answered
her that you almost adored her, you should have seen the happy
expression
,
the joyous lighting up of her beautiful countenance. Her bosom
heaved with emotion, and her eyes over-run with gratitude. But all at once a
cloud came over her features, and sadness took the place of hope and joy. She
looked earnestly at me and said,
`Sir, you know my heart now, and you must know it only to pity me. Mr.
Darwell though having so strong a hold upon my regards, you are aware can
never be more to me than a friend! It is this reflection that has cast a sadness
over my happiness! I think only of himself, sir, but my parents, the large
circle
of my friends would look only to his birth.'
`But if I could show you that he has succeeded in finding his family and
proving his title to an honorable parentage?' I said.
`Can you do it, sir?' she cried earnestly.
`I can, Madam,' I replied. `He has within the last ten days discovered his
father and grandfather also, and been recognised and acknowledged by them.
They are very respectable people, and he will do honor to them I am sure.'
`Then, if this be true, how I sympathise with him in his happiness,' she said
gratefully. `Oh, sir; can this be indeed true?'
`I assure you, madam, it is so. If you desire it, I will prove it to your
parents
!'
`No, no, not just now! Is Mr. Darwell still in England?' she asked with
embarrassment.
`Yes. He is now in London.'
`In London?' she exclaimed with almost a cry of joy.
`He is, madam, and I assure you it would give him the greatest happiness
to permit him to pay his respects to you.'
`Well, my dear lord, the upshot of the whole pleasant matter was that she
said she should be most happy to see you to-morrow. Don't fly
now
.
Tomorrow
will come in due time! As I was going to leave, Col. Field entered
with his lady, and with him the American Minister, whom I well knew. As
I was about to introduce myself to the Colonel, the Minister did it for me, and
so at once I was placed in a position to enlist his confidence. I then, as soon
as I could conveniently, began to tell your story, addressing myself to His
Excellency
,
but intending my narration for the especial benefit of Colonel Field
and his lady. I gave the whole account, only concealing the name and rank
of your family, which I said I was not at liberty to divulge, but which I
pledged
myself as highly respectable and wealthy. When I had done, his
Excellency
begged that I would bring you to see him, and also Colonel and Mrs.
Field seconded the invitation for you to visit them with me; and they were
warm in their congratulations upon your good fortune in removing so
successfully
the stain upon your birth, of which they had been made acquainted by
Russel Carryl.'
`I must meet that man,' cried lord Henry, angrily.
`Only to treat him with contempt, my lord! He is beneath your notice. I
learned he only travelled
with
, but is not
of
, the party, being only an intruder
for the purpose of pressing his attentions upon Miss Field. He called while I
was there; and while the parents received him with sufficient friendship, I
noted that Miss Field was cold and distant, and seemed to regard him with
positive dislike. So you see, my lord, as the way is now open before you, you
have only to make the best use of your time; for you must return to A
Castle at the end of the week, or the Duke will be here after you! In the
meanwhile, I would advise you to live as becomes your rank at the hotel here,
and receive the attentions and notice which the nobility will extend towards
you. To the world you must be Lord Henry A, the representative of
the Afamily; but to Miss Field, and Mr. Carryl, and the family, you
may, still be plain Mr. Darwell. It is not probable that you will meet them as
Lord Henry, or that they will recognise you to be one and the same person
until
you choose to make yourself known.'
The following day about twelve o'clock our hero took a cab and drove
privately
to the lodgings of Col. Field. Sending up his name as Mr. Darwell of
the United States, he was ushered into the drawing room. Emma was alone.
On seeing him she arose, advanced a step to offer her hand in welcome and
then stopped short covered with blushes, and her cheeks in beautiful confusion.
Our hero approached her with equal embarrassment. She raised her eyes,
their glances met, and with a bright smile she extended her hand, which he
took and pressed to his lips.
`It is long since we have met, Mr. Darwell,' she said with a trembling tone
in her voice and making an effort to be firm.
`It is, in person, Miss Field, save for a moment at long intervals,' he
answered
,
`but in memory you have not been absent from me a day since first I
met you as a school-boy and received from your hand a boquet of flowers. A
bud of that gift I still retain, and the memory of the giver confers upon them,
still, both life and fragrance.'
We will not attempt here to record the conversation between two true and
loving hearts, which for years had lived in each other's light though that light
had been long obscured by the dark clouds of circumstances, now dissipated
forever. Before they parted, our hero had wooed and won her as Mr. Darwell,
assuring her that in a few days she should see his father and know more
intimately
all that related to his family.
As he was descending to the hall he encountered Russel Carryl upon the
stairs with two young men, one of whom he recognised as the midshipman with
whom he had fought. On seeing him, Carryl, suspecting whom he had been
to call on, looked angrily upon him and then sneeringly said, so that he might
hear:
`There goes the widow Darwell's protege! I wonder if he has got so wise
as to know his own father?'
This infamous insult lord Henry took no notice of, feeling that when Carryl
came to know his true rank and his acceptance by Miss Field, he would be
sufficiently punished.
`There he goes in a wretched hired cab,' said Carryl, who kept his own
tilbury
and affected the excess of London fashion, and whose chief ambition
was to
know
a nobleman. To have walked arm and arm with a
lord
down
Regent street, he would cheerfully have given a hundred guineas!
`I wonder,' he added, `if he has had the audacity to call on Miss Field. If
he has, I will cane him.'
He sent in his card and that of his friend, and was confounded and
indignant
by the reply brought by the footman, `that Miss Field was engaged and
could not see him.'
`This is all that nameless fellow's work. He has been to see her, and as
I know she has long had a liking for him, I dare say he has succeeded in
blinding
her eyes to his low birth, and doubtless has been defaming me.'
Here, however, this young gentleman was wrong. His rival had too noble
a soul to condescend to such means to ingratiate himself into the regards of
Miss Field; but, as he himself had adopted them and made the defamation of
our hero to be an instrument towards his own success, he naturally attributed
similar motives of action to another.
The following evening an unusually magnificent assembly was to be held at
the palace of the Earl of. Lord Henry was a great card, and although
the invitations had some days been issued, he received one, and by the advice
of Mr. Beufort accepted it. As he was desirous Emma should be present, he
succeeded in getting an invitation for her to go in company with the family of
the American Minister.
All the nobility in London was present. It was soon noised that the heir of
the Duke of  was in the room, and our hero soon found himself the lion
of the evening. But he thought little of the honors and adulations so long as
they were not shared with Emma. At length he discovered her and was
about to approach her, when he was detained to have presented to him some
members of the House of Lords. In the meanwhile Emma, who knew her
lover was to be there, was looking for him amid the crowd.
`How would you like to be presented to this young nobleman whom every
body is taking about?' said his Excellency to her with a smile; for he had
our hero's whole story from Mr. Beufort, together with whom he had dined
that afternoon at C Hotel. Therefore, knowing all the history of our hero
and his love, the Minister had prepared himself for an interesting scene.
`I have no wish,' she answered, smiling.
`Well then perhaps I can find Mr. Darwell. Wait here till I cross the hall.
I will seek him and bring him here. I dare say you won't object to seeing
him
!'
Mr.  did not wait to observe her confusion, but soon disappeared in the
throng. In three minutes afterwards he returned, leading up our hero.
`You can't help yourself now, Miss Field,' said his Excellency. `Here is
his lordship come to be presented to you.Miss Field this is Lord Henry A.
Lord Henry, allow me to present you to Miss Field.'
Emma stood confounded! Could it be true? Could the minister be trifling
with her? Lord Henry approached and taking her hand said in a low voice, but
with a smile,
`Emma, I trust that you will keep the promise you made to me as Mr.
Darwell
,
now that you see me before you under the name and rank of Lord
Arlborough
.'
`Is this indeed true?' she asked with a deep flush of joy.
`It is. My father is the Lord Ferdinand, eldest son of the Duke of A.'
At this moment several persons of high rank came up to be presented to the
lion of the evening, and the formality of the presentation convinced her that
all was true. She now trembled for herself, and would have feared that she
should be no longer regarded by him, but for the sweet echo of the words he
had spoken to her.
As His Excellency had been pressingly importuned by Mr. Russel Carryl
to use his influence to get him an invitation to this noble party, he finally
consented
and was so far successful as to have permission to attach Mr. Carryl to
his suite. Russel Carryl was therefore present; but he had not yet seen Miss
Field, nor encountered our hero.
`Where, sir, is this distinguished young nobleman, the heir of the title of
Duke of Arlborough, every one is talking about, as just arrived from the
continent
,
where he has been since a boy?' asked Russel Carryl of the American
minister, coming up to him with his back towards lord Henry.
`Would you like to be presented?'
`Above all things,' answered the young man.
`There he stands talking with Miss Field, his back towards us. I will
present
you if you will approach with me. My lord, allow me to present '
`That
that
is not the Lord A!' suddenly exclaimed Russel Carryl,
starting back in the utmost surprise and confusion, on getting a glimpse at the
profile of his rival.
`It is the same! My lord, I beg leave to present to you,
at his particular
desire
.
Mr. Russel Carryl, who .'
Both our hero and Miss Field turned round at this name. Russel Carryl
stood for a moment petrified with astonishment, enduring the cold and haughty
gaze of the man he had injured, and then covered with confusion and vexation
which no words can describe, he abruptly broke from the minister and
hastened
to bury his disgrace and well merited contempt amid the crowd. The
triumph
of our hero was complete! He felt at that moment of triumph fully
avenged of all the wrongs then man had heaped upon him!
We have now only to close our story in the good old fashioned way, that is
with announcing the marriage of the hero and heroine, which took place with
great splendor three months afterwards, at the Palace of the Duke of A
in London. It would have been celebrated earlier; but our hero as faithful in
his love and attachment to good Dame Darwell, as he had been in his
devotion
to the maiden who had won his young heart, would not have the marriage
take place without the worthy Dame's presence. He, therefore, sent over for
her, and sure enough Dame Darwell was there in person present at the
wedding
;
but to tell how happy the good Dame was, we should have to write
another
book! It is hardly necessary to say that she recognised Lord
Ferdinand
,
and that
he
recognised
her
as the hostess of the Inn where they had left
the infant! The good Dame has consented to remain in England with her
foster son; and with this end she has made over her Inn and other property to
Aunt Keezia and cousin Mariah the minister's wife, and `The Silver Bottle
Inn' has now become the village parsonage. Russel Carryl left England
precipitately
,
and soon after returned to the United States, where, after running
through his fortune, he became intemperate, lost his character, and is now
become
an idle and despised frequenter of low coffee-houses, and the
moneyless
haunter of the vile precincts of gambling halls!
Thus we end our story. Its progress will show that virtue and perseverance
will overcome every obstacle of birth, fortune, and circumstances; and that the
depraved and unprincipled, though favored by these in the outset, will
ultimately
sink to the level of their true characters.
THE END.